CHAPTER I.
They come, impatient for the fight,
Burning to rush into the slaughter,
Ready to pour their blood like water
For what they deem the right;
Like men, preferring glorious graves
To life, if it must be the life of slaves!
It
seems to be universally conceded that the first
settlers of Vermont were men of an iron mould, and
of an indomitable spirit. And it is no less true, we
apprehend, that with corporeal frames, unusually
large and muscular, and constitutions peculiarly
robust
and enduring, they possessed, also, intelligence
and mental energies, which, considering what might
naturally be expected of men of their condition in
life, and in their situation in a wilderness affording
none of the ordinary means of intellectual culture,
were equally remarkable. The proof of these
assertions
is to be abundantly found, we think, in the
unequalled
stand taken by them for their rights, in their
memorable controversy with New York, and in the
multiplied documents that grew out of it, in the
shape of resolves and decrees of conventions,
addresses
to the people, memorials and remonstrances
to the governor of that province, and to the British
throne itself, all drawn up with great clearness and
cogency of reasoning, and evincing a knowledge of
natural and constitutional rights in a people, among
whom law as a profession was then entirely
unknown
,
which are generally to be found only in the
courts and councils of old and highly civilized
countries
.
And even were these testimonials to their
character wholly wanting, ample evidence, that they
were a generation of no ordinary men, may still be
seen in the scattered remnant of this noble band of
heroes yet lingering among us, like the few and aged
pines on their evergreen mountains, and, though
now bowed down by the weight of nearly a
century
of years, exhibiting frames, which would almost
seem to indicate them as men belonging to another
race, and which are still animated by the light of
wisdom and intelligence, and warmed by the
unconquerable
spirit of freedom yet burning unwasted
within them.
Those who have treated on this subject, when
alluding
to the facts we have stated, have generally
coupled them with observations upon the
invigorating
effects of mountain air, &c., leaving us to infer
that these peculiarities of the early settlers were
attributable
only to such causes. It is, indeed,
doubtless
the case, that the wild scenery, and the pure
elastic air of mountainous countries, are the most
favorable, under the same degree of culture, to the
formation of the highest grade of physical, as well
as moral and intellectual characterimparting, in
the one instance, that health and peculiar vigor
which brings the human system to all the perfection
that it is capable of attaining, and, in the other,
engendering
,
with firmness of nerves, and firmness of
purpose, the usual attendants of great bodily
powers
,
2
a healthy and high-toned imagination, and the
lofty aspirations that exalt the character, and prompt
to great and noble actions. But whatever influence
the peculiar climate and scenery of this Switzerland
of America, as Vermont may, perhaps, be
appropriately
termed, may have had, in this respect, on the
descendants of these hardy settlers, little of this
influence
,
probably, would have been perceptible to
the settlers themselves: they, it must be recollected,
were not natives of these mountains, but recent
immigrants
from other New England colonies. And
whatever
peculiarities they possessed must mainly be
originated in other causesfrom the very nature
of the enterprise, probably, which brought them
together
,
that of settling a wild and rough frontier
country, known to be attended by a thousand
difficulties
and hardships, and beset by a thousand
dangers
,
in which men of ordinary stamina would not
think of engaging. They, indeed, may be looked
upon in the light of picked men, or more properly
perhaps, in that of volunteers, stepping boldly and
confidently forth for some extraordinary enterprise
of which the hazard and difficulty are so great, that
nothing but an uncommon union of courage and
strength ean accomplish it, and of which the
success
,
or even the attempt, it may be, furnishes the
best evidence of these qualities in those who
voluntarily
enlist in the undertaking. And as regards
intelligence and mental character of these settlers,
their educations were generally equal to those
usually
received among the better classes of the old
settlements
where they were obtained, and superior
probably, to what the same men were able to
furnish
to their immediate descendants. And this fact,
together with the emergencies, which not only
called
all the energies of their minds into action, but
constantly improved them, and enlarged their
information
by the investigations they were induced to
make for the successful prosecution of their cause in
the New York controversy, will sufficiently account
for their intellectual superiority over the ordinary
settlers of other new countries.
With these observations, here thrown in by way
of showing our warrant for many of the descriptions
of character which we have introduced, and which,
we thought it not impossible, might otherwise
subject
us to the charge of indulging in improbabilities,
we will now proceed with the incidents of our story.
The morning of the ninth of May broke brightly
upon the encampment of our troops at Castleton,
disclosing to the view, now for the first time, an
organized
band of about three hundred as brave and
hardy men as ever assembled for deeds of daring
and danger. Of this number more than three fourths
were Green Mountain Boys. The remainder were
men collected from the nearest parts of
Massachusetts
and Connecticut, and led on by several
enterprising
militia officers of those colonies, who had
actively
co-operated in getting up the expedition. A
council had been held the night previous, for the
purpose of organizing these united forces, which had
been dropping in irregularly through the day and a
greater part of the night, and also for making all
other necessary arrangements to march for their
destination
on the following morning. At this council
Ethan Allen had been unanimously appointed the
commander in chief of the expedition. Colonel
Easton
,
one of the Massachusetts officers, was placed
second in command. And the third grade was
assigned
to Warrington; while Selden, in making the
subordinate appointments, was raised to the post of
captain to supply the place left vacant by the
promotion
of his superior. Even our friend, Pete Jones,
though now absent, was not forgotten in the
distribution
of honors, but named to take charge of the
scouts, provided he joined the expedition. All these
arrangements having been made the night before, as
just stated, the troops by sunrise had breakfasted,
and were now under arms, and undergoing a review
preparatory to marching. All were in high spirits,
and animated at the thought of being immediately
led to the important object of their enterprise.
Their gallant leader, now dressed and equipped in
a manner appropriate to his rank, and mounted on
his own noble charger, was riding proudly along
their imposing frontnow pausing to give some
directions
to an officer, now to inspect the equipments
of a company, and now backing his curvetting steed
to take a view of the whole; while his towering
form seemed to dilate, and rise still higher to the
view, his bosom heave with pride, and his eyes
glisten
with delight, as they ran along the lines of his
stout and broad-chested Green Mountain Boys, and
read in their hardy features, lit up with enthusiasm,
and eagerness for action in a cause which every man
had made his own, the same high resolves, the same
burning desires to signalize themselves that
animated
his own bosom.
At this moment a stranger, who, with a single
attendant
in the capacity of a servant, had but a short
time before arrived, came on to the ground, and
took a conspicuous stand in front of the troops. He
was of about the middle age, stout, well made, and
handsomely featured, while a Roman nose, a thin
curling lip, and a black flashing eye, with the
peculiarly
contemptuous, and even sinister expression,
and reckless air, which they combined to give his
countenance, denoted no ordinary degree of self
esteem
,
and a fiery and impetuous disposition. He
was richly and fashionably dressed, and wore a
sword, epaulett, and other insignia usually worn by
field officers of the times.
`Captain Blagden,' said Selden, turning to a
Connecticut
officer near him, and pointing to the
stranger
just described, `can you inform me who that
proud and scornful looking fellow yonder may be?
He belongs not to us of the Green Mountains; nor
does he appear to have any connection with the
troops from Massachusetts, or with those from your
own colony; and yet his demeanor, and showy
military
appendages, would lead one to suppose that he
came here to take command of the whole of us.'
`I have been looking at the man myself,' replied
the person addressed, `and, though not quite
certain
,
yet I believe I know him. I think he must be
one whom I well knew when we were boys, and of
whose singular career I have since been often
informed
.
And, if my conjectures are right, his name is
Arnold, Benedict Arnold of New Haven.'
`But what do you imagine has brought him here,
with these apparent assumptions?'
`Well, now I bethink me, sir, I remember, that
the day I left home, a townsman of mine, who had
just returned from New Haven, reported that, when
the news of the battle of Lexington arrived at that
place, Captain Arnold, who is the commander of an
independent company there, started, with several
other military men, post haste for the scene of
action
.
And as he is said to be a good officer,
having
been a soldier in the army (into which he run
2*
away and enlisted in his youth,) I should not be
surprised
to learn he had received a commission from
the Massachusetts Committee of Safety. And
further
,
as he was stationed, while a boy-soldier, at
Ticonderoga
,
and knows, doubtless, considerable of
its situation, I will hazard a bottle with you,
Captain
Selden, that he has craved, and obtained,
permission
of that committee, to take charge of the
troops which they probably heard were collecting
for this expedition.'
`Aha? Colonel Allen, I imagine, will have a
word to say to that bargain. It would fairly break
his heart to be deprived of the chance of receiving
the first charge of grape or canister that shall salute
us from the wide-mouthed war-dogs of Old Ti. And
if your surmises are correct, a collision, I fear, is
unavoidable
,
unless Mr. Arnold should, as I think he
certainly ought, waive his pretensions to the
command
.'
`A collision it will be then: for Arnold, it is said,
was never yet known to yield to any thing, when
his purposes were fixed. A more reckless
dare-devil
,
I suppose, never trod the foot-stool. Why, sir,
when we were but boys, I have known him spring
upon a large water-wheel in full motion, grasp one
of its arms, with his head towards the
circumference
,
and there remain till he had been dashed
through the back-water beneath, during forty
revolutions
!
I have known him, single handed, seize
and overcome a mad ox, which had broke away
from, and nearly killed a dozen men. One or more
duels he has fought abroad; while scores of bullies
have been cudgeled and conquered by him, about
home. Indeed, if one half that is told of him is true,
the wild bulls of Bashan had not a spirit more
untameable
,
nor scarcely more bodily strength to back
it.'
`All that may be, sir, but those who know Ethan
Allen will laugh at the very idea of there being
found a man in New England who can outdo him
in feats of either strength or courage. And when
they tell you, as they truly may, that they have seen
him bite off the heads of board nails by dozens,
seize by his teeth, and throw over his head, bags
containing each a bushel of salt, as fast as two men
could bring them round to him,grasp two
opponents
who had beset him, one in each hand, and
lifting
them clear of the ground, hold them out at
arms length, and beat them together till they cried
for mercy,engage alone with a York Sheriff and
his posse of six common men, rout the whole, and
leave them sprawling on the groundyou will
probably
allow, that such a man will not be very likely
to succumb to your hero. Let this Arnold but
offer
to assume the command, and, unless I am sadly
mistaken, you will see what kind of stuff our old
Green Mountain lion is made off. But see! the
fellow
is beckoning the officers to approach him. Let
us move up to the spot, and hear what he has to
offer
on the occasion.'
Understanding and heeding the intimation of the
stranger officer, who was indeed no other than
Benedict
Arnold, afterwards so infamously conspicuous
in the annals of our revolution, most of the officers,
including Allen, who had dismounted for the
purpose
,
immediately advanced, and formed an
irregular
line before him.
`Gentlemen,' said he, with a perfectly assured
and confident air, after waiting till all had
approached
and assumed a listening attitude, `I am
personally
unknown, I presume, to most, or all of you, but
having been clothed with the proper authority, and
directed to proceed to this place for the purpose, I
have the honor to announce myself to you as the
commander of this expedition,consequently it is
now my duty to take charge of these troops.'
`Sir?' said Allen, taking a step in advance of his
fellow officers, placing his arms akimbo, and turning
up his ear, as if the better to catch the words of
the speaker, whom he eyed askance with a look of
queerly blended doubt and scorn: `Sir? Did I hear
aright? Did you say that you thought it your duty
to take charge of these troops?'
`I did, sir, and still so consider it,' replied
Arnold
,
rather restively.
`Do you, indeed, sir,' rejoined Allen, with a look
of cool derision. `Then it was altogether a
mistake
of mine in supposing that the reverse of your
proposition would have made out a more probable
case?'
`I know not what you mean,' said Arnold, his
voice trembling with stifled anger at the biting
significance of the other's remark. `You may
learn, however, that I am not a person to be trifled
with, sir.'
`Well, I can't pretend to say what, or who, you
are not,' replied Allen, waxing warm, and giving
token of a direct onset, `but I should like to know
who the devil you are, that come here from another
colony to take the control of men who now own
allegiance
to no power short of that of the God of
Heaven?'
`My name is Arnold,' replied the other, biting his
lips in suppressed rage, `and I hold a commission
of Colonel, with the orders I named, from the
Massachusetts
Committee of Safety. There! examine
it for yourselves!' he added, pulling out a
parchment
,
and disdainfully hurling it at their feet.
The roll was instantly picked up, and attentively
examined by several of the officers; while Arnold
stood aloof in contemptuous silence, scarcely
deigning
to bestow a glance on the company thus
engaged
.
It indeeed proved, as he had stated, a
colonel's
commission, from the source above mentioned,
enclosing another document, signed by the same
committee, authorizing Arnold to raise troops in
Massachusetts, or elsewhere, to the number of four
hundred, and march them for the reduction of
Ticonderoga
.
`Now, sir, where is
your
commission? I should
like to see it in turn,' said Arnold, addressing Allen,
and advancing with an air of triumph, as soon as
the examination of his credentials, which he
supposed
must silence all further question of the right he
had assumed, was completed.
`My commission?' promptly replied Allen, by no
means disturbed by this unexpected demand, though
in fact he had no paper commission to show, as the
council appointing him had not deemed such an
instrument
essential: `where is my commission, do you
ask? There, sir!' he continued, pointing to his
troops, who, understanding Arnold's claim to take
command of them, already began to exhibit visible
tokens of displeasure at the thought of having their
idolized leader superceded by a stranger, `there,
sir! there it is, engraven on the hearts of these
two hundred and thirty Green Mountain Boys!
Trace it out there for yourself! Read it in their
eyes, in every lineament of their countenances! and
if that is not enough for you, then ask them
whether
Ethan Allen, who is getting gray in their service,
is to be thrust aside for a commander whom they
have never before seen?'
`Never! no, never!' fiercely burst from a
hundred
lips along the the lines, while many
indignantly
threw down their arms, and all, either by word,
look or gesture, gave unequivocal indication of their
determination to allow no man to usurp the place of
their chosen leader.
The countenance of Arnold, with all his
assurance
,
instantly fell at so decided, and to him, so
unexpected
a manifestation of the disposition of the
troops; and he bit his lips in vexation and mortified
pride at his defeat.
At this crisis of the affair, Warrington, fearing, in
common with the other officers, that the altercation
might prove ruinous to the enterprise, stepped
forward
and interposed. He first, respectfully, and in
a manner calculated to soothe the irritated feelings
of Arnold, set forth the doubtfulness of his right,
even under the instructions and commission he had
received, to assume the command of troops who had
not been enlisted by him, but who had volunteered,
without any knowledge of him or his instructions,
and with the implied condition that they should be
left to the choice of their own leaders. He then
appealed to him as a gentleman, a patriot, and friend
to the common cause, whether he would do well to
insist on his claim, since doing so, as he must see,
would prove destructive of their expedition. This
courteous and well-timed appeal, which opened a
door by which Arnold might honorably retreat from
his awkward position, seemed to produce on his
mind an instantaneous effect. The dark and angry
frown, which had settled on his countenance, gave
way to a bright and cheerful look. With one hand
he instantly tore the epauletts from his shoulders,
while with the other he drew his sword and threw it
on the ground, gallantly exclaiming,
`Gentlemen, I most cheerfully waive all pretensions
to the command, which of right, I am now
convinced
,
belongs to the brave leader of the far-famed
Green Mountain Boys. But as to going with you
on this glorious enterprise, it is a privilege which,
by  I wont relinquish! Gentlemen, will you
furnish me with a common musket, and accept me
as a volunteer soldier of your gallant band?'
Allen appeared to be taken completely aback by
this sudden declaration of Arnold. His naturally
forgiving and noble disposition, and quick feelings,
were instantly touched with this mark of
magnanimity
,
as unexpected to him, as it was remarkable
in the man, being the most striking, and perhaps the
only instance of the kind, ever displayed by this
brave, but unprincipled officer in his whole public
career.
`Done like a man, by Jove!' exclaimed the
chivalrous
leader of the Green Mountain Boys,
advancing
and cordially proffering the other his hand, while
the tears of admiring and grateful emotion fairly
started out on to his brawny cheeks. `Done like a
man and a hero! Here, God bless you, give us your
fist! There is about the right kind of stuff in you
after all, my friend. Will you accept the post of my
aidecamp, with the rank your commission gives you?'
`Most cheerfully, sir,' replied the flattered Arnold,
waving his hand with easy and grateful courtesy.
`Pick up your sword and badges, then, sir,'
resumed
Allen. `Call for your horse, and we will now
on together, like brothers, in the cause of God and
the people. Officers and soldiers!' he continued,
in a loud and cheering voice, that rung like a
deeptoned
trumpet far and wide over field and forest
around, while he sprang upon his impatient charger,
and waved his sword on high; `prepare to march!
Ethan Allen still commands you. Peace is in the
camp, the Lord on our side, and victory before us!
Forward march!'
Three loud and lively cheers told the satisfaction
of the men at this double announcement; and, in
another moment, the whole corps, wheeling off to
the brisk and stirring notes of shrieking fife and
rattling
drum, were sweeping down the road in full
march towards the object of their destination.
The rout of the troops was along the old military
road, which, in the French war of 1759, had been
opened from Charleston on Connecticut river across
the Green Mountains to lake Champlain, by a New
Hampshire regiment, acting under the orders of
General Amherst. This road, leading directly through
Castleton, and taking a northerly direction, branched
off within a few miles of the lake, one fork running
down to the shore opposite to Ticonderoga, and the
other proceeding onward to Crown Point. Although
this, at the period, was perhaps the best road in the
settlement, still it was little more than a roughly cut
path through the wilderness, abounding, at this
season
,
with deep sloughs, fallen trees and other
obstacles
calculated to prevent much expedition in
travelling
.
But such was the spirit and constitutional
vigor of the men, that a march of four or five hours
brought them over half the distance from their late
rendezvous to their destined landing on the lake,
the former place being about thirty miles from the
latter. They had now, for several miles, been
passing
through a heavy unbroken forest, and the
mounted
officers, riding a short distance in advance of the
men, were anxiously looking forward for a clearing,
or some suitable place to halt for a mid-day
refreshment
.
`There!' said Allen, turning to his companions,
as the sound of a falling tree came booming through
the forest from a distance, `did you hear that? We
are nearly through these endless woods at last, it
seems.'
`Is that so clearly proved by the falling of a tree?'
asked Arnold, who was but little of a woodsman.
`Old trees, I thought, like old men, often fell
without
human agency.'
`True sir,' rejoined Allen, `but human agency
brought that tree to the ground; and it stood beside
some opening, too, or I will agree to be reckoned,
like the prophets of old, without honor in my own
country.'
`Colonel Allen is right,' observed Warrington:
`The falling of a green tree always produces a dull,
heavy, lumbering sound, such as we just heard,
occasioned
by the air it gathers, or more properly,
perhaps
,
disturbs in its course; while the sound of a
dry tree in falling is sharper, and comes with a
single
jar to the ear. That this tree stood near an
opening, is sufficiently evident from the echoes that
followed the first sound, which, in this flat land, could
only be produced by the reverberating woods-wall
of an opening. Yes, the Colonel is correct: I can
now hear the chopper's blows quite distinctly.'
The falling of another tree in the same direction
here interrupted the conversation; while the
axe-man's
blows, sounding, in the distance, and in the
tranquil medium through which they were conveyed
3
to the ear, like the ticking of a clock in the stillness
of night, could now plainly be heard by all. In two
or three moments a third tree came thundering to
the earth. Another, and yet another followed at
equally brief intervals,the noise attending each
successive fall, as well as that of the fast repeating
blows of the chopper, who was causing such
destruction
among the sturdy tenants of the forest, all
growing more loud and distinct as the party
approached
.
`There must be more than one of them,'
observed
Colonel Easton, `to level so large trees at that
rapid rate.'
`No, sir,' replied Warrington; `the regular, and
non-interfering sounds of those blows indicate but
one axe-man. You have not witnessed so much of
the execution of which our Green Mountain Boys
are capable, as I trust you will within twenty-four
hours, Colonel. At all events, the fate of a tree,
under
the sinewy arms of one of them, is very soon
decided.'
`This fellow, however,' remarked Allen, `does,
indeed
,
lay to it, with a will. I think he must make
a good soldier; and as such, he shall go with us, if
of the right way of thinkingif not, as a prisoner:
for it behoves us now, to know pretty well the
character
of every man who is permitted to remain
behind
.'
The party now soon came in sight of the man
who had been the subject of their conversation. He
had made an opening in the forest of about two
acres, which he was rapidly enlarging. Having just
leveled one large tree, he was now bending his tall
frame in an attack upon another, a giant hemlock,
standing near the road, and had struck two or three
blows, sending the blade of his axe into the huge
circumference up to the helve at every stroke; when
the tramp of the approaching party reached his ear,
causing him to suspend and look around him.
`As I live, it is Pete Jones!' exclaimed
Warrington
,
`just begining upon his new pitch, which he
mentioned to us.'
`Good!' said Allen, `I am glad we have come
across the droll devil. But we will furnish him with
business a notch or two above that: the Red Coats
need leveling a cursed sight more than the trees, at
this crisis. If nothing more, he shall lend us that
everlasting long body of his for a ladder to scale the
walls of Old Ti! Jupiter! if Frederick of Prussia
had a regiment of such chaps, how the fellow
would brag! Hallo, there!' he added, dashing
forward
towards the woodsman, who stood gazing with
an expression of quizzical wonder, now at the
approaching
cavalcade of officers near by, and now
straining forward his long neck to get a view of the
lengthened columns of the men, just beginning to
make their appearance in the distance.
`Well, hallo it is, then, Colonel, if there's
nothing
better to be said,' responded Jones, after waiting
an instant to see if the other was going to proceed.
`But now I think on't, Colonel, where did you get
so much folks? By Jehu! how they string along
yonder! Why, there's more than a hundred slew
of men coming! And then what pokerish looking
tools they've all got! Now I wonder if they an't a
going a visiting over to Old Ti, or somewheres?'
`I should not be surprised if something of that
kind should prove the case,' replied Allen, laughing.
`But what are you about, that you have not joined
as in the proposed visit?'
`Why, I calculate to be about this old hemlock
till I get it down, Colonel.'
`Nonsense, you ninny! Why were you not up
to Castleton last night?'
`Now, don't fret, Colonel,I did think of it,
honestly; but knowing you must all come this way,
I thought I might as well be making a small
beginning
here till you got on. And so I put in
yesterday
a little, and have now let in heaven's light on
something over two acres, I calculate. But if you
are expecting to have pretty funny times of it over
there, I don't much care if Ithat is, I'll think of
it, after I have brought the top of this old hemlock
a little lower'
`Your most obedient, Captain Jones,' gaily
exclaimed
Warrington, now riding up.
`Captain of what?' asked Jones, a little puzzled
to know whether he was to receive this address as a
joke, and let off one of his own in return, or
whether
something seriouswas intended by it: `Captain of
what?of the Surveyor, that I sent over the York
line, a day or two ago, by a gentle touch with my
foot on his northerly parts?'
`No, seriously Jones,' said Allen, `in organizing,
last night, we deemed it best to have a small band of
scouts, of whom you was fairly voted in the Captain,
or Scout-master, if you like the name better. No
man in the settlement can go before you in
performing
the duties of this post. Will you, without more
words, accept it, and join us?'
`Can't you let me stop to cut this tree down first?
'Twon't take scarce a minute, Colonel.'
`No, the men are at hand. We did think to
find a spot to halt and dine here, but as I see
neither
place nor water, we must on till we find them.
How soon shall we meet with such a place?'
`Let me see, as the blind man saidOh! there
is a cute little beauty of a brook, with smooth banks,
that's jest your sorts, not half a mile ahead.'
`Fall in here with the troops then. But where is
your rifle?'
`Hard by there, under a log,' replied Pete. `I'll
warrant, you never catch me far seperated from old
Trusty, with a good store of bullets to go on such
errands, as she and I have a mind to send them.
Well, old axe,' he added, in an under tone, as he
took up the implement to which he seemed to be
addressing
himself, and carried it round to the back
side of the tree, `the Colonel thinks it best, that
you and I should bid each other good-bye, for a short
time; and there! you may sit in that nook between
those two roots till I come back again.'
So now to the wars I go, I go,
All for to go a sodgering.
Trol, lol, lol de larly.
And thus, in the prompt spirit of the times, and
with the characteristic sang froid of the man, this
jolly and fearless woodsman, drawing out his rifle
from under an old log, and cheerily troulling the
above quoted catch of some homely old song, with
a chorus of his own making, fell into the ranks of the
troops then passing, having left his favorite axe, for
which he seemed to have contracted a sort of
fellow-feeling
,
standing behind the tree, on which we
found him engaged, where it was destined to
remain
unregarded by its owner, during a great part
of the revolutionary war;and where, on returning,
after many years of hardship and danger, spent in
3*
bravely battling for his country's freedom, he found
it, in the same place and position, safe and
uninjured
,
except in the thick coat of rust that had
gathered
over itan incident of olden times, well known
as a historical fact by many in that section of the
country where it occurred.
The spot described by Jones being found and
appropriated
,
the troops partook of a dinner from the
provisions of their packs, after which they were
allowed
an hour's rest, which was enlivened, as they
were seated along the mossy banks of the gurgling
rivulet, with song, tale and jest, till the deep
recesses
of the forest rang with the sounds of their
merriment
.
While the officers, who were seated in a
group by themselves, were consulting their watches,
and awaiting the moment set by them for resuming
their march, a horseman, approaching from the west,
suddenly rode up, dismounted, and stood before
them.
`Ah! Phelps!' exclaimed Colonel Allen,
springing
up and shaking the new comer heartily by the
hand, `is it possible?a spy returned unhung from
a British fort? Well, sir, what news from the camp
of the Philistines?'
`Almost every thing we could wish, gentlemen,'
replied the person addressed, a Connecticut
gentleman
of considerable shrewdness and address, who
had been dispatched a day or two previous to go
over to the fort, enter it on some feigned errand, and
gain the best knowledge of its situation the
circumstances
would permit. `I have been within the fort
mostly over the worksstaid there last night, and
came away ususpected this morning.'
Phelps then proceeded to give an account of the
manner he had effected his discoveries at the fort,
without exciting the suspicions of the garrison,
relative
to the object of his visithow, in the assumed
character of a green country bumpkin, he made it
his ostensible errand to see a war-cannon, and also
the strange man what shaved other men, called a
barberhow the soldiers laughed at his pretended
ignorance, and the officers coming to see the green
Yankee, amused themselves by questioning him, and
listening to his replies, at which they were
amazingly
tickled, and then ordered a twenty-four pounder
to be fired, for the fun of witnessing the prodigious
fright, into which the report appeared to throw him.
And finally, having induced him, after many
intreaties
,
to permit the barber to shave him, how they all
stood by to see the performance, laughing
heartily
at the wincing and woful countenance he
assumed
,
and the fears he pretended of having his throat
cut.
After finishing his diverting description of this
part of his adventures, he detailed with great
accuracy
,
the situation of the fortress, the names and
grades of the officers, and the number of the
garrison
.
`But, gentlemen,' said he, in conclusion, `there is
one question, which I will no longer delay to ask
you. Have you made provision for boats to
transport
the troops across the lake? There is not a
single
craft larger than a skiff on this side, just now,
within ten miles of the fort.'
`God forgive me the oversight!' exclaimed Allen.
`We must instantly set measures on foot for
repairing
it. Douglass, Lieutenant Douglass, step forward
here a moment! What boats are there this side the
take to the north of this?'
`An excellent scow for our purpose is owned by
the Smiths, a few miles this side of Crown Point,'
replied the blue eyed and broad shouldered
descendant
of his Caledonian namesakes, stepping promptly
forward, and comprehending at a glance the
emergency
that produced the question.
`The Smiths? Good! They are with us, too, in
heart, and should be also in person,' rejoined the
Colonel. `Well, their scow we must have, at all
events. And you, Douglass, are the very man to go
and get it. Will you do it?'
`I am the very man who is willing to try,
Colonel
Allen,' answered the other.
`And can you reach the landing against Ti with
it by nine o'clock this evening?'
`Hardly, I fear. It is nearly a dozen miles; but
I'll do my best, Colonel.'
`Go, then, as if the devil kicked you an end. The
salvation of our project may depend upon your
getting
back in season. But stay! we must have more
boats than one. To the South, I know of none.
Perhaps you may meet with some going up or down
the lake, which might be pressed into the service;
or, as the last resort, one might possibly be got away
from Crown Point, without a discovery which would
endanger us. Another man, however, will be
wanted
for any of these purposes, besides the oarsmen
you will pick up on your way. AndJones! this
way! Have you heard what we are at? Very well.
You are just the chap to go on this haphazard
errand
.
What say you?Can you bring any thing to
pass, if we send you?'
`Why, I can't exactly say, Colonel,' replied Jones,
placing his feet astride, and looking up with one eye
queerly cocked on his interrogator, while the other
was tightly closed: `I an't so much of a water fowl
as some; but, perhaps, I mought make fetch come a
little.'
`Pack up, then, and be off with Douglass in two
minutes; and remember, both of you, if you fail
us'
`Then what?' asked Jones, suddenly stopping and
looking back, `I don't calculate to be over
particular
,
Colonel, but if it wouldn't be too much trouble,
I should like to know that, before we start.'
`You shall be doomed to sit forty days and nights
in sackcloth and ashes,' humorously said Allen.
`By Jonah!' exclaimed Pete, `the boats shall be
there by the time, Colonel!'
While the latter part of this dialogue was going
on, Warrington stood with his back to the company,
with one foot on a log, busily engaged in writing
with his pencil on a blank leaf, torn from his pocket
book and placed on his knee.
`Aha? my lad,' said Allen, in a playful
undertone
as he approached the former, and significantly
placed one finger on his shoulder, `more faith now,
than when we two were lying on the hay in the
Captain's
barn, waiting for our rifles, eh?'
`I really wish you would mind your own business,
Colonel,' replied Warrington, with affected anger.
`Well, well,' resumed Allen, laughing, `send it,
my boy. Mars, they say, never prospers so well as
when he has Cupid in his train, in any case. But
with such a piece of God's handy work, as yours, to
incite to actionheavens! if the knights of old had
been blest with such lady-loves, they would never
have needed to carry a half a hundred weight of old
iron on their lubberly carcasses to make them
heroes
?'
Stripping off their coats to fit them for a rapid
march, these athletic and resolute woodsmen now
seized their rifles, took a glance at the sun for a
hasty
calculation of the bearing of the course to be
taken
to lead them to their proposed destination, and,
plunging into the woods, were soon lost to the sight
of their companions.
A small guard was then sent on in advance, with
orders to pick up and detain every man on the road,
not in the secret of the expedition. Scouts, to range
the woods on the right and left, were also
dispatched
for the same purpose; after which the main body
of the forces quietly resumed their march for the
lake.
CHAPTER II.
There are strange movements among all the troops,
And no one knows the cause.
Leaving
Allen and his companions in arms to
make their way to the lake shore, we will now, by way
of marking the progress of the two active foresters,
who had been dispatched northward for boats, change
the scene, for a short time, to the quiet residence
of Captain Hendee.
It was a little past sunset on the evening of the
day, on which the events last described transpired.
It had been a day of unusual stillness in the
northern
part of the Grants. The lively sounds of the
plying axe men, which were usually heard ringing
through the forest in every direction, were all
hushed
.
The women went a visiting, and were seen to
whisper in the corners apart from the children. The
boys finished their tasks by noon, and for the
remainder
of the day were sauntering round the brooks
with their fish-poles. All the active men had
disappeared
;
though no one mentioned aloud the cause
of their absence. And a sort of Sabbath day quiet
and inaction seemed to prevail over all this section
of the settlement. Captain Hendee was sitting in
his open door, enjoying, as usual, his evening pipe,
and wrapped in that placid and contemplative mood
to which this indulgence generally disposes. His
daughter was seated near him at a window, in an
attitude equally calm and contemplative, though
engrossed
with reflections, probably, of a far different
nature: for her fair white hand rested on a small
volume lying on the window sill before her, opened
upon those heart melting strains of the hapless
Eloise
,
which Pope, that master of rhyme and marrer of
reason, sung with such seductive sweetness; and her
tear-moistened eye was fixed pensively and
unobservant
,
on the slumbering waters of the outspread lake;
while occasionally a gentle sigh, betokening the
inward
conflicts of hope and fear, was heaving her
snowy bosom. While the father and daughter were
thus seated, and their minds thus absorbed in their
different trains of reflection, their attention was
suddenly
arrested by the sounds of advancing footsteps.
`By all the saints in the calandar!' exclaimed the
Captain, after gazing an instant in surprise at the
striking proportions of our young Anak of the woods,
for it was no other than Pete Jones, who, at the
distance
of eight or ten rods, was now seen stalking
towards the house; `what a cloud brusher is there,
Alma! Can you imagine who he may be?'
`No, father,' replied Alma, who was also looking
at the approaching visitor with an expression of
mingled
wonder and curiosity; `but I just noticed that
Young Tyler and Wilcox of this neighborhood
passed
behind the barn yonder, and I conclude that this
man is some friend of theirs. They are probably
all going on some fishing excursion. The man, I
presume, wishes to get a little fire for this purpose.'
By this time Jones had reached the door in which
the Captain was sitting.
`Good evening! Will you walk in, sir?' said
the latter in an indifferent tone, and without moving,
as if he expected the other would decline the
invitation
,
and announce his errand at his door.
`Why, yes, I may as well, perhaps,' replied Jones,
offering to pass in without appearing to notice the
hesitating and enquiring look of the Captain, who
now at once yielded the space to his guest. `You
see I was bred to manners,' continued the
woodsman
,
jocosely bowing, so as to enable him to enter
the door.
The Captain, smiling good naturedly at the
remark
,
handed Jones a chair, took another himself,
and waited in silence, and with the same expecting
air as before, for the stranger to name his business,
This, however, Jones did not seem ready to make
known, but continued sitting in silence, with a
puzzled
and undecided air, as if greatly at loss what to
say, or how to bring about some object he had in
view, now glancing at the Captain, now at the
different
objects about the room, and now at Miss
Hendee
,
on whom his eyes lingered with an expression
of unfeigned admiration.
`Very fine weather, this,' remarked the Captain,
by way of breaking the silence, which he seemed to
think was becoming a little awkward.
`Very; considering the times, and the state of
the nation,' responded Pete, dryly, and with the
manner of one who would show that he is too busy
in thought to engage in conversation.
The Captain then made some other common-place
observation, which met with no reply of any kind;
when finding himself thus defeated in every attempt
to draw the other into conversation, and tired of
waiting for him to name his errand, he withdrew his
attention, and sunk into his own reveries.
After Jones had set awhile longer chewing his
cud of perplexity, a change appeared suddenly to
come over him. A flash of intelligence and
decision
lit upon his countenance. And, after dropping
his head an instant, as if settling the details of a
plan which he appeared to have hit upon, he slowly
drew up his features into a sober and troubled air,
and began to catch his breath, and shiver all over,
like a man taken with an ague fit. He then rose,
tottled across the floor to the hearth, raked open the
fire and spread his shaking hands over the coals, at
the same time attempting to speak, as he observed
the eyes of the Captain and his daughter were
turned
upon him with a look of lively concern.
`O, nevnever mind!'he said, articulating with
great apparent difficulty, in his attempt to quiet their
alarm,` 'twill sssoon be ooover now
though thethethese swamp agagagues are
bad while they last. You, you don'tkeepkeep
great fireshereIII see.'
`We will have one in a moment, my friend,' said
the Captain, leaping up at this hint, and hobbling
out of doors after wood, with unwonted activity.
4
No sooner was the old gentleman fairly out of
sight
than Jones' malady entirely disappeared. He
quickly drew out a billet, and turning, tossed it into
the lap of the astonished Miss Hendee.
`Here, mum,' said he, in a low, confidential tone,
`there's no time to be polite; but read that, and if
you want to scrabble off two lines, or so, in answer,
contrive to get it into my old hat there on the table,
in almost no time, as I'm in a taking of a hurry.
But stay, where's the Indian?'
`He has gone to take a letter for me to Major
Skene's colored man, now lying with his boat down
here at the landing, I believe,' replied the blushing
girl, already on her way to her apartment to read
and answer the billet, which a glance at the hand
writing told her was from her accepted lover.
`That's lucky,' said Jones; `now I want that
chap to go with us. We have got a trifling chore
to do to-night somewhere in the neighborhood of
Old Ti. Had I better speak to the old gentleman
about his going, or not?'
`My father should be consulted, and yet'
answered
Alma, hesitating, lest the suggested
application
to Captain Hendee might in some way lead to
a discovery of her own secret`I heard him
promise
Neshobee's services to Colonel Allen, for such an
emergency. Perhaps you had better consult no one
but Neshobee himself, and if he is willing to go, I
will stand his friend in defending the delinquency,
if such it be.'
Captain Hendee now returned with the wood, and
found Pete's ague much as he left it. But as the
fire blazed up from the light combustibles which had
been thrown on to it, the attack seemed gradually
to subside. Meanwhile, Alma had retired, read the
brief out-pouring of her lover's heart, and penned
in answer
From my heart I thank you for your kind note.
All as yet remains undiscovered,painful, painful
exigency! which compels concealment of so
important
a step from an only parent! And yet I regret
not my troth; and whatever of sorrow it may cost
me, I will not repine at the fruit of a tree of my
own planting. Heaven preserve you, my very dear
friend, in the hour of peril, and crown with success
your efforts in the cause of freedom.
Yours, but too truly,
A. H.
By the time Alma had completed her note, and
managed, on her return to the room, to slip it,
unobserved
,
into the designated place of deposit, Jones
had so far recovered from his pretended
indisposition
,
that he announced himself in a condition for
proceeding on his way. And taking a coal of fire
between a couple of chips, by way of accounting to
the Captain for his call, and stopping a moment to
listen to the sage nostrums recommended by his host
to prevent the recurrence of his ague, he departed,
and joined his two newly enlisted associates, who
were impatiently awaiting his coming in the
adjoining
field. It being now sufficiently dusk to prevent
all observation from the opposite garrison, they
proceeded
immediately to the landing, which they found
guarded by two Green Mountain Boys, who, making
fishing their ostensible business, had, in pursuance of
the arrangement before mentioned, closely watched
the place during the two preceding days. Here,
also, they met Neshobee, who had just returned in a
skiff, from Major Skene's scow, in possession, as
before
intimated, of a stout negro, who, with two low,
sottish fellows under his command, having spent
that day at the fort to take in some loading, and
visit
the soldiers previous to starting for home, as they
intended to do, the next morning, had come over
just at night and taken a fishing station near the
landing
.
Jones and his companions hesitated not to
open their project of obtaining this boat to Neshobee,
who very cheerfully agreed to co-operate with them
in duping the negro, and to assist in rowing the boat
up to the landing, where they were to be met by
Allen's
forces. The boat was lying about a dozen rods
from the shore; and black Jack, as he was called,
and his men, having pulled up their anchor, were
now on the point of putting back for the fort; when
the party on shore, their plan of operations being
all arranged, hailed the black commander, and
desired
him to haul up to the landing.
`Who the debil you, who want me do all dat for
notting?' replied Jack, in a swaggering,
consequential
tone.
`O, pull up to the shore,' said Wilcox, `there are
three or four of us here who are wishing to make a
bargain with you.'
`Bargain, hey? you shackaroons, you! You
tink for play some deblish trick, don't you? Guess
you find out you no catch weasel sleep so easy as all
dat come to!' responded the negro, chuckling at his
own wit and sagacity.
`No, now, honestly, Captain Jack,' rejoined the
first speaker, `we want to go to Shoreham landing
to night, to be ready to join a wolf hunt which they
are going to start there early to-morrow morning.'
`Gosh all fire-lock!' exclaimed the black, whose
opinion of his own importance was greatly raised by
being addressed as Captain: `You tink I row my
boat all de way up dare in de dark jest for
commodate
you? No! see you all dam fus!'
`Now you are too bad, Captain; but you won't
damn our jug of old Jamaica, that we intended to
offer
you for carrying us up there, will you?' said the
other, taking a jug from under his coat and
swinging
it over his head, so that the black, whose taste
for liquor was well known to the young men, might
catch a view of it in the twilight.
`What you say, dere?' eagerly said Jack,
stretching
forward his neck to see, and make sure of the
existence of the tempting impliment.
`We say,' replied the former, `that here is a
gallon
of as good rum as ever run down your throat,
which is at your service, if you will close the bargain.
Come, give us your answer, for if we can't make a
trade with you, we must be off for a boat somewhere
else. What say you?and mind ye, we will lend
you a stiff hand at the oars to boot.'
`You help row de boat, you say?' answered Jack,
in an altered and yielding tone. `Why de debil
you no say so fore? Dat be a case dat alter de
circumstance
.
You wery much to blame, gemmen,
dat you no mention so portant a difference in fus
place,' added the negro, while he and his men
headed
round the boat, and handled the oars with such
effect that nearly the next moment she was lying at
the landing.
Within five minutes from this time, the magic
jug, which had effected such a wonderful change in
the aspect of affairs, having been well tested in the
meanwhile by Jack and his associates, all hands
were stripped and bending to the oars of the old
*4
scow, which, under the forceful strokes of Jones and
his party, aided by the rum-power of Jack's two
besotted
boatmen, was surging through the waters
towards
the south, as fast as their united strength
would drive her.
They were soon met, however, by puffs of south
wind, against which they found it impossible to make
but a very slow head way. And it was not till
considerable
past midnight that they came to the last
reach, and hove in sight of the destined landing.
But here, overhauling Douglas with the other scow,
and the party he had enlisted to help man it, both
boats with renewed efforts of rival speed, pushed
forward for the appointed shore.
`Boat ahoy!' called out Allen from the landing
where, as the boats neared the place, his huge,
tower-like
form, rising in bold relief over the
stationary
group of officers around him, could now plainly
be discerned by the approaching crews: `boat ahoy!
who comes there?'
`Douglas and friends, in this,' was the reply from
the first boat, coming in about its length in advance
of the other.
`And who in the next?' asked Allen.
`Jones and a thunder cloud!' responded the well
known voice of the jolly woodsman. `Now you
needn't think I am fibbing, Colonel; for you will
see it lighten when we get ashore.'
`All is well, then,' said Allen, without heeding
the remarks of Jones, further than his
announcement
of himself with a boat: `all is well, and glory
to God in the highest, that you have got here at last!
I thought you would have never come. Why, it has
been an age since dark! Some old sun-stopping
Joshua must be fighting on the other side of the
earth, or, I swear, it would have been day light long
ago!'
By this time the first boat had struck the shore,
and the crew leaping out, were all readily
recognized
by the leader, who then turned to the other boat,
at that instant driving up, with the astonished and
frightened negro, (now for the first time mistrusting
a trick,) gibbering and sputtering aloud,
`What de hell all dis?who all dese? what
pretty
dam scrape you got me into here, you shackaroon
debils, you?'
`What in the name of all that is black and red
have you got here, Jones?' cried Allen, in surprise,
stepping up and peering into the boat, on hearing
Jack's exclamations.
`Why, just what I told you, Colonel. Here!
don't you see it lighten, now?' said Pete, pointing
to the negro's eyes, which, glaring wide with fear
and astonishment, at what he saw and heard,
glimmered
like fire bugs in the dark. `But the English
of it is, Colonel, that we came across Major Skene's
scow, commanded by Captain Darkey, with his two
oarsmen, here, who for a gallon of rum were kind
enough to bring us along to join a hunting match at
Shoreham, where we have now arrived, safe and
sound:' he continued, turning to the black, `so
now, Captain Jack, you have fulfilled your bargain
with us; and we have nothing more to say, as far
as we are concerned. If these rough looking chaps
here want to employ you further, they will let you
know it, likely.'
`Jones, you deserve a pension for life!'
exclaimed
Allen, comprehending the whole affair in an
instant
.
`You, and your friends here, have killed more
birds with one stone than you dreamed of yourselves,
perhaps. But we have not a moment to lose, so
leap out my lads. And as to Major Skene's boat,
it is my lawful prize; and Major Skene's negro, and
Major Skene's negro's understrappers here, are all
my prisoners!'
`O, no, totally unpossible to stop, gemmen!' said
Jack, in a good lord, good devil sort of tone, being
doubtful whether they really intended to make him
prisoner, or engage him and his boat to carry them
to some other place: `I have provision for de Major's
family, aboard. Dey all out ob supply for dere
necessity
.
Quite unpossible, gemmen.'
`We will take care of the provisions. So out with
you in no time, you black Satan!' said Allen,
impatiently
.
`O, it be out ob all question I stop!' persisted the
negro with increasing alarm, `I have odder portant
businessI have letter from de young leddy at
Captain
Hendee's to de young leddy ob Colonel Reed
at de Major's dat I oblige for deliver, early in de
morning.'
`We will undertake the delivery of the letter,'
said Selden and Warrington, simultaneously.
`Tumble them out, boys!' sternly exclaimed
Allen
.
`O, Lordy, I den be ruin! totally, foreber ruin!'
groaned the distressed and frightened black, as the
men seized him and his two drunken associates, and
led them to the rear to be put under guard.
The boats were now instantly headed round, the
oars muffled, careful oarsmen selected and placed in
their seats; when, after each boat had been filled
with as many troops as their respective burthens
would safely permit, they pushed off from the shore,
preceded a short hailing distance by a skiff,
occupied
by Allen and Arnold, with Phelps to pilot them to
their contemplated landing, on the opposite shore.
The wind had some time since died wholly away;
and the elements were now all hushed, as if in the
slumbers of death; while the deeply freighted crafts
glided slowly on, impelled by the light dip of the
feathery oars, which, in the hands of the
experienced
and careful men who plied them, unitedly rose
and fell as noiseless as the feet of fairies on beds of
flowers. At length the dark, massy walls of the
fortress, looming up, and marking their broad
outlines
against the western sky, became discernable to
the men. And yet, as they drew near these
frowning
walls, pierced by a hundred cannon, over which,
for aught they knew, the lighted matches were
suspended
,
awaiting but the signal to send their iron
showers of death to every man of their devoted band,
on misgivings, no weak relentings came over them: but
at a moment like this, and that which followed at
the onset,moments, furnishing, perhaps, a more
undoubted test of courage than those of the half
frantic, half mechanical charges of the disciplined
legions of Napoleon, at the later fields of Austerlitz
and Marengoat a moment like this, we say, their
stout hearts, nothing daunted at the dangers before
them, beat high and proudly at the thought of the
coming encounter, and with stern determination
gleaming in every eye, and with the low whispered
words of impatience for the moment of action to
arrive
,
they moved steadily on to their daring purpose.
Passing down obliquely by the works, they landed
some distance to the north of them. The instant
they touched the shore the troops leaped on the
banks; and scarcely had the last foot been lifted
from the boats before they were backed, wheeled,
and on their return for another load, leaving those
on shore to await in silence the arrival of a
reinforcement
from their companions left behind, before
marching to the onset. Those companions,
howevever
,
were not destined to share in the glory of this
splendid achievement of the eighty Green Mountain
Boys who had landed: for in a few moments, to the
dismay of Allen, the faint suffusions of dawning
day became visible in the east. Cursing the luck
which had caused such delays, and chafing like a
chained lion held back from his prey, that impetuous
leader for a few moments rapidly paced the shore
before
his men, in an agony of impatience,now casting
an eager look at the fort, still silent and undisturbed,
now straining his vision after the receding boats,
which, to him, seemed to move like snails across the
waters, and now throwing an uneasy glance at the
reddening east, whose twilight glow, growing
broader
and brighter every instant, plainly told him that
before another detachment of troops could arrive,
his forces would be discovered, and the enterprise,
in all probability, would thus be defeated.
Maddened
at the thought, he stopped short in his walk,
paused an instant, and brought his foot with a
significant
stamp to the ground, showing that his
resolution
was taken. And quickly calling out Jones and
Neshobee, he dispatched them to go forward,
cautiously
reconnoiter the fort on all sides, and return
as speedily as possible to report their discoveries.
He then formed his men in three ranks and
addressed
them.
`You see, my friends and fellow soldiers,' he
commenced
,
pointing his sword towards the east, `that
day light will reveal us to the enemy before a
reinforcement
can possibly arrive. But can you, who
have so long been the scourge of tyrants, bring your
minds to relinquish this noble enterprise, and with it
the proud name you have achieved, by turning your
backs on the glorious prize, when it is now almost
within your grasp?'
He paused for a reply; when `no! no! no!' ran
through the lines in eager response.
`I see, I see, my brave fellows,' resumed the
gratified
leader, `I see what you would do. I read it in
your deeply breathed tenes of determinationin
your quick and short drawn respirations, and in your
restless and impatient movements. But have you all
well considered? I now propose to lead you through
yonder gate; and I fear not to tell men of your
stamp, that we incur no small hazard of life in the
attempt. And, as I would urge no man to engage
against his own free will, I now give free and full
permission to all, who choose, to remain behind.
You, therefore, who will voluntarily accompany me,
poise your guns!'
Every man's gun was instantly brought to a poise,
with a motion which told with what good will it was
made.
`God bless you, my noble fellows!' exclaimed
Allen, proudly, and with emotion: `Courage like
that'he continued, in tenes of concentrated
energy
,
`courage like that, with hearts of oak, and nerves
of steel like yours, must, will, and, by the help of the
God of hosts, shall triumph! Come on, then!
follow
memarch while I marchrun and rush when
I set the example; and if I fall, still rush on, and
over me, to vengeance and victory! To the right
wheel! march!'
When the band arrived within about a furlong of
the ramparts, they were met by the scouts, who
reported
that all was quiet in and about the fort, while
the open gate was guarded only by one sluggish and
sleepy looking sentinel. Halting no longer than was
necessary to hear this report, Allen, placing himself
at the head of the centre column, silently waved
his sword to the troops as a signal for resuming the
march; when they all again moved forward with
rapid but cautious steps towards the guarded
gateway
.
And so noiseless and unexpected was their
approach, that they came within twenty paces of
the entrance before they were discovered by the
drowsy sentry, who was slowly pacing to and fro,
with shouldered musket before it. Turning round
with a start, the aroused soldier glared an instant at
the advancing array, in mute astonishment and alarm;
when he hastily cocked, and levelled his piece at
Allen, who was striding towards him, several yards
in advance of his men. It was an instant on which
hung the fate of the hero of the Green Mountains,
and probably, also the destinies of Ticonderoga.
But the gun missed fire. The life of the daring
leader was safe, and the garrison slept on,
unalarmed
,
and unconscious of their danger. Leaping
forward
like the bounding tiger on his victim, Allen
followed
up the retreating soldier so hotly that, with
all the speed which fear could lend him, he could
scarcely keep clear of the rapidly whirling sword of
his fiery pursuer, till he gained the interior of the
fortress; when he gave a loud screech of alarm, and,
making a desperate leap for a bomb proof,
disappeared
within its recesses. Meanwhile, the rushing
column of troops came sweeping like a whirlwind
through the gate; when, fairly gaining the parade
ground in front of the barracks, they gave three
cheers which made the old walls tremble with the
deafening reverberations, and caused the slumbering
garrison to start from their beds in wild dismay at
the unwonted sound. Scarcely had the last huzza
escaped the lips of the men and their leader, who
disdained not to mingle his own stentorian voice in
the peals of exultation and defiance, which rose in
thunders to heaven, before the latter was rapidly
threading his way through flying sentries and half
dressed officers, towards the quarters of the
commandant
of the fortress. Pausing an instant on his
way, to chastize a dastard sentinel whom he caught
making a pass at one of our officers with his
bayonet
,
and whom, with one blow with the flat of his
sword, he sent reeling to the earth with the cry of
mercy on his lips, the daring leader bounded up the
stair-way leading to the commandant's room, and
thundering at the door, called loudly to that
officer
to come forth. Captain La Place, who had
just leaped from his bed, on hearing the tumult
below, soon made his appearance with his clothes in
his hand, but suddenly recoiling a step, he stood
gazing
in mute amazement at the stern and
threatening
air, and the powerful and commanding figure of
the man before him.
`I come, sir, to demand the immediate surrender
of this fortress!' sternly said Allen, to the
astonished
commander.
`By what authority do you make this bold demand
of His Majesty's fort, sir?' said the other, almost
distrusting his senses.
`By what authority?' thundered Allen. `I
demand
it, sir, in the name of the Great Jehovah and
the Continental Congress!'
`The continental Congress?' stammered the
hesitating
5
officer, `I know of no rightI don't
acknowledge
it, sir'
`But you soon will acknowledge it, sir!' fiercely
interrupted the impatient leader. `And hesitate to
obey me one instant longer, and by the eternal
heavens
!
I will sacrifice every man in your fort!
beginning
the work, sir,' he added, whirling his sword
furiously over the head of the other, and bringing
the murderous blade at every glittering circle it made
in the air, nearer and nearer the head of its
threatened
victim, `beginning the work, sir, by sending
your own head dancing across this floor!'
`I yield, I yield!' cried the shrinking
commandant
.
`Down! down, then, instantly!' exclaimed
Allen
,
`and communicate the surrender to your men
while any of them are left alive to hear it!'
Scarcely allowing the crest-fallen officer time to
encase
his legs in his breeches, Allen hurried him down to
the scene of action, in the open parade below. Here
they found the Green Mountain Boys eagerly
engaged
in the work of capturing the garrison, who were
making considerable show of resistance. Two of
the barrack doors had been beaten down, and about a
third of the enemy already made prisoners. And
the fiery Arnold was on the point of blowing a third
door from its hinges with a swivel, which he had
caused to be drawn up for the purpose; while a
fourth was shaking and tottering under the
tremendous
blows of an axe, wielded by the long and
powerful
arms of Pete Jones, who was found among the
foremost in the contest.
`Cease, cease ye, all!' cried Allen, in the loud
voice of command, as he appeared among them with
La Place by his side.
`Now, raaly, Colonel,' said Jones, suspending his
elevated implement, and holding it back over his
head in readiness for another blow, `I wish you
would let me settle with this deivelish old oak door
before I stop. Why, I never was so bothered with
such a small potato in my life!'
`No, no!' answered the other, smiling, `let us
have silence a moment, and we will save you all
troubles of that kind.'
`Well, then, here goes for a parting blessing!'
exclaimed
the woodsman, bringing down his axe with
a tremendous blow, which brought the shattered door
tumbling to the ground.
The British commandant then calling his officers
around him, informed them that he had surrendered
the fortress, and ordered them to parade the men
without arms. While this was in performance, a
second detachment of Green Mountain Boys
reached
the shore, and, having eagerly hastened on to the
fort to join their companions, now with Warrington
at their head, came pouring into the arena. A
single
glance sufficed to tell the latter, that he was too
late to participate in aught but the fruits of the
victory
.
With a disappointed and mortified air he
halted
his men, and approached to the side of his
leader
.
`Ah! Colonel,' said he, `is this the way you
appropriate
all the laurels to yourself, entirely forgetful
of your friends?'
`Pooh! pooh! Charles,' replied Allen, turning to
the other with a soothing, yet self complaisant smile,
at the half reproachful compliment thus conveyed,
`you need not mourn much lost glory in this affair.
Why, the stupid devils did not give us fight enough
to whet our appetites for breakfast! But never
mind, Charles, there is more business yet to be done;
Crown Point and Major Skene's stone castle must
both be ours to-night. The taking of the first shall
be yours to perform. And after breakfast and a few
bumpers in honor of our victory, we will dispatch
you for that purpose, with a corps of your own
selection
.'
`Thank you, thank you, Colonel,' replied the
other
with a grateful smile. But the expedition to
Skenesboro'may I not speak a word for our friend,
Selden?'
`Aha?' replied Allen, laughing, `then his offer
to take charge of the negro's letter had its meaning,
eh? I don't know exactly about that chip of a
British
Colonel for a Yankee patriot. Now, yours,
Major
,
I acknowledge to be a true Cynosure. But his,
I fear, will prove a Dog-star. However, that is his
own hunt; and as he is a finished fellow, and
doubtless
,
brave and true, I think I will give him the
command
of the expedition, unless claimed by Easton.
But hush! the commandant is about to go through
the forms of the surrender. I must away, but will
see you again.'
The brief ceremonies of the surrender were soon
over; when, as the fortress was pronounced to be in
full possession of the conquerors, the heavens were
again rent by the reiterated huzzas of the Green
Mountain Boys, while British cannon were made to
peal forth with their deep-mouthed thunders to the
trembling hills and reverberating mountains of the
country around, the proclamation of victory!the
first triumph of Young Freedom over the arms of
her haughty oppressor.
CHAPTER III.
A thousand evil things there are that hate
To look on happiness; these hurt impeae,
And leagued with time, circumstance and fate,
Keep kindred heart from heart, to pine and pant and bleed.
Mrs. Brooks
.
It
is time, perhaps, that we should recur a little,
to trace the operations of some personages of our
story, whose agency, though unnoted by us through
several of the last chapters, had yet, in the mean
while, been actively exercised in bringing about the
events that were destined to follow. And it is with
a sort of reluctance of feeling that we turn from the
soul-kindling task of describing the noble exploits
of Allen and his patriot companions, to the low and
despicable plottings of the base Sherwood, and his
still more execrable associate in crime. Though
twice foiled in his attempts to procure the
destruction
of Warrington, under the sanction of a
despotic
law, of which advantage was taken mainly to
cloak the true motives of the act,though signally
defeated in this, and the bolder attempt at
assassination
,
which was subsequently made at his
instigation
,
yet still restless as the dark spirit of evil, this
plotter of mischief, instead of relinquishing his
object
,
was now only the more intently engaged in
devising
and putting in practice, new ways of
accomplishing
his nefarious designs.
On the evening that Darrow had attempted the
life of Warrington in the woods, Sherwood was
sitting
in his house, which was kept by a simple
couple
,
5*
wholly in the interests of their employer. He
had just arrived from a visit to the house of Captain
Hendee, where, as the reader has been apprised, he
had been sowing the seeds of discord in that hapless
family. And the chilly reception, with which his
parting advances had been met by the indignant
girl, whom they were intended to soften and deceive,
more than ever confirming him in what his jealousy
had long since suggested, that her inclinations were
setting strongly towards his hated rival, and
foreseeing
that some thing must speedily be done to
counteract
the current, he was now revolving over the
different schemes that rose in his teeming brain for
effecting his purpose, in case of the failure of his
minion to remove the object, alike of his hatred and
his fears. While thus occupied in mind, Darrow,
whose coming was not wholly unlooked for, arrived,
and sulkily entered the apartment.
`Ah, Darrow!' exclaimed Sherwood, with his
usual hypocritical smile, `very glad to see you. I
knew not whether you would come to night, or
return
to the fort.'
`Why,' replied the other, `when I concluded to
give it up for a dn bad day's work, I found
myself
nearer your house than the fort; so I came,
that's all.'
`Glad you did. So come, unrig, and sit down.
The old woman, in the other room, will have us
some supper ready soon. But no luck with your
rifle
to day?' said Sherwood with a significant smile.
`Noneexcept getting half tired to death, in this
cursed wild goose chase of yours,' petulantly replied
the surly minion.
`What! not even get a sight of the game, after
so much beating of the bush?'
`Yes, twice; and failed both times, as the devil,
who sent me on the errand, would have it,'
answered
Darrow, with an equivocal glance at the other.
`Failed! how?' said Sherwood, without
appearing
to notice the half intentional sarcasm of
Darrow
.
`Why, the first time, the devilish rifle missed fire,
for a raritythe second, its owner missed his aim,
and had to take to his legs to save his bacon.'
`All this is very singular, Mr. Darrow,' observed
Sherwood, with a disappointed, and somewhat
incredulous
look.
`Yes, but true for all that. Believe it or not, just
as you please, I care not a groat.'
`What mean you, Darrow?'
`Exactly what I say; and I am beginning to
mean something more, too.'
`You are a strange fellow, Darrow. But let us
have all your meanings, wants, and wishes, in a lump.
I am now in no humour for riddles.'
`Nor I neither. Well, then, though the fellow
escaped my bullet by no intended fault of mine, yet
I am not sorry I missed him. I have been thinking
over the business coming along, and for all your talk
about his life being forfeited, I can't make it out
much better than killingnot to use a worse word,
which they say gives a fellow ugly dreams. So I
have made up my mind to let you do your own jobs
of this sort, in future. And if you persist in urging
me further'
`Killing! who asked you to kill him?'
interrupted
Sherwood in feigned surprise.
`Curse you, Jake, you know well enough you
meant that. But I am still willing to help take the
fellow, and hand him over to the Yorkers to punish,
or lend you a hand to carry any other point, if you
will do the clean thing by me. But in the first
place you must tell me what you fear from this
fellow
,
and why you are so specially set on having him
taken, more than Allen, or any other outlaw?'
`That is more than I intended to tell any one;
but as I suppose you will better serve my interests
by understanding this, you shall know the whole
business
:
well, after I had been here awhile, I noticed
that the girl, when the Captain said any thing in
praise of this Howard, as he supposed his name was,
never joined her father in praises of the fellow,
though she never had any ears for any thing else
while the slightest mention was made of him. And
if I so much as asked a question implying a doubt
about the fellow's perfection, she would show
resentment
as plain as looks could do it. Now, Darrow,
if you would discover whether a girl entertains any
secret liking for a man, just introduce his name in
her presence, contriving both to praise and censure
him, and if she refuse to join you in either, but is all
attention when you praise, and grows restless when
you censure him, you may safely set it down that
love is secretly lurking about her heart. It was
something like this that led me to think, that this
Howard had made an impression, which I little
relished
.
This suspicion caused me to to obtain from
the old Captain a minute description of the fellow,
and having before had one of Warrington, it
occurred
to me that this favorite might be no other than
the outlaw, himself. And being determined to
ascertain whether my conjectures were correct, I
made a secret journey to Bennington, where I got a
sight at Warrington, and where, by professing great
wrath against the Yorkers, I was let into secrets
which confirmed me in my suspicions. There, also,
I made arrangements for being apprised of
Warrington's
future movements with one Willoughby,
who sent the word, which enabled me to ferret out
him and his band at Lake Dunmore. All this,
however
,
I kept secret from the Hendees, but took
especial
pains to inspire the old man, and more
particularly
his daughter, with a horror of the character of
Warrington. And now, Darrow, after the
insufferable
scoundrel has caused me to be tied up and
whipped
like a dog, and, to cap the climax, has found
his way into this family, and attempted to beguile
from me my betrothed, can you ask why I wish to
see him brought to justice?'
`Why, you seem to make out considerable of a
case of it, to be sure,' replied the other carelessly, as he
rolled his tobacco quid in his lips. `But betrothed
do you call her? Why, I thought you cared so
little
about the girl, that you was quite undetermined
whether you would have her, or not?'
`Well, whatever I may have said before, I am not
undetermined now,for the girl, in spite of men, or
devils, I swear I will have!'
`What mighty object is there, Jake, in breaking
your neck for her? Besure, she is a snug piece
enough, but you can catch other fish as fair, and
those, too, who will bring you hundreds to her none.'
`I have plenty of objects to answer: one is to
defeat
this hated scoundrel,another, to punish her
for presuming to like him. I don't say now I will
marry her. But she shall be mine, to do with as I
choose. I will have her, and keep her in a spot
where it shall be mine, not hers, to decide whose
wife she shall become. That, indeed, was mainly
my motive in drawing her into an engagement in the
first place: for you know, Darrow, that in case the
old concerns should happen to be ripped up, a
matrimonial
plaster would cure all. And so long as I
kept things in this posture, I should have the
remedy
at hand.'
`Yes, but what chance do you consider there is
of ripping up old matters?' asked the Sergeant,
throwing a keen enquiring glance at the other.
`Why, such a thing is possible, you know. The
old man, my father, I mean, as he grows weak and
childish, may repent, and kick over his own kettle,
and, of course, mine. Indeed, I have great fears of
this: for, though he never said any thing to me of
the kind, not dreaming that I ever met with you
here, or discovered by any other means the secrets
of his former management, yet I have lately
observed
in him a sort of growing uneasiness, a whining,
melancholly way, which, with his great anxiety that
I should marry this girl, has made me rather jealous,
that his firmness is giving way in this quarter.
Besides
this, there are other dangers: that boy, who,
you say the old man still thinks, was done for, may
yet be alive, and return to make me trouble.'
`Well, if he should, he would be a no very lousy
foe for you to contend with, Jake,that is, if he is
as smart for a man as he was for a boyI tell you,
he was a bright one for a four-year old. I liked him,
and never had the least notion of harming a hair of
his head.'
`What object had you, then, in making the old
man believe as you did?'
`Why, I mistrusted that would please the old man
best, and I'll be hanged if I don't believe it did,
Jake, if he is your father.'
`Well, there are these chances against me, and
then'
`And then Bill Darrow may leak, you was going
to say, was you, Jake?' sneeringly asked the
minion
.
`O, no!' quickly responded the consummate
dissembler
with a gracious smile, and a surprised air,
as if such a thought never entered his head. `No,
indeed. I should as soon fear myself. But I was
thinking, and about to say, that besides these
chances
,
Warrington's communication with the girl will
prove dangerous to my plans, and that they must be
stopped.'
`Well, how are you a going to do it, short of
following
up the plan we have already been acting on
to so little purpose?'
`Why, I have already taken one step to day, by
informing Hendee, that his friend Howard was no
less than the outlaw Warrington in disguise. This,
was touching fire to his gun-powder temper; and
has pretty effectually blown the fellow up as regards
any open communication with the girl.'
`That may be, but it has also blown up your best
trap for taking him, you see, don't you?'
`Perhaps so, but I dare not risk his visits with the
standing he evidently held in their minds. And now
having broken off all open intercourse between the
girl and the audacious rascal, we must go to work
to sunder those ties, which may yet secretly remain.'
`Hum! That, I should think, would be like
trying
to cut off sun-beams with a jack-knife. I should
like to know how the old boy you calculate to do
that?'
`O, easy enough, though my plan is not quite
made up. I will tell you in the morning. But will
you assist me in carrying it out?'
`Don't know but I will. But supposing I do, and
see you fairly through the whole scrape, what do
you finally intend to do for me?'
`Any thing almost that you may ask, Darrow.
You will own that the earnest money I gave you the
other day was a handsome affair?'
`Hum!Yes, decent.'
`Well, from the late news, I suppose we shall
have war. Warrington and most of these rascally
settlers will be with the rebels. I, from several
motives
,
shall go for the king. And I have made up
my mind to get a Captain's commission, and raise a
company to act in this quarter. You shall be my
Lieutenant. And then we will use up these
refractory
settlers in a way they little dream of. But hark!
The old woman is rapping for us to come to supper.
I will mature my plans, and open them to you, as I
said, in the morning.'
CHAPTER IV.
I something fear my father's wrath; but nothing
(Always reserv'd my holy duty,) what
His rage can do on me. You must begone
And I shall here abide the hourly shot
Of angry eyes; not comforted to live,
But that there is this jewel in the world,
That I may see again.
The
developement made by Sherwood, at his late
visit, seemed to produce on Captain Hendee, whose
mind had been previously prejudiced and poisoned
for the purpose, all the effect which the former could
have desired. The Captain's feelings of pride were
deeply touched at the thought of having entertained,
and welcomed in his family, a man acting under the
disguise of an assumed name, and consequently
harboring
,
as he reasoned, no honorable purposes. And
these views going to confirm all the falsehoods and
dark insinuations, by which that Iago in malice and
subtlety had accompanied his disclosures concerning
Warrington, the mind of the irritable old gentleman
had been wrought up to a pitch of exasperation and
bitterness, which he pretended neither to disguise
nor control, and which he failed not to vent on all
around him, but more particularly upon his
unhappy
daughter. To her, indeed, his whole demeanor
became changed; and his treatment was marked by
a distrustful coldness, and continued austerity of
manner, which she had never before, for so long a
time, experienced from her passionate, but hitherto
quickly relenting, parent. And yet she, who was
happily the very reverse of her father in temper, had
6
neither manifested, nor felt, the least wish to resent
the unkindness; but calm and aimiable in
disposition
,
as she was fearless and spirited in action, she
had borne all with the most forgiving patience,
prudently
awaiting the subsiding of the tempest of his
passion, before she should attempt, as she was
resolved
to do, to exculpate Warrington, and gradually
bring about a change in his views and feelings, in
regard to the connection with Sherwood. She well
knew that he was now laboring under many false
impressions, which she felt conscious of her ability
to remove, as soon as he should become sufficiently
calm to listen to the voice of reason. Day after
day, therefore, she had anxiously watched for some
appearance of relenting, some more softened mood,
which should afford her an opportunity of making
this attempt with a reasonable hope of success. But
till the evening on which Jones called at the house,
she had observed nothing that indicated the least
relaxation
in her father's feelings. And being then
interrupted
by the woodsman's call, at an hour which
usually afforded her the only opportunity she had
through the day of conversing with her parent alone,
she deferred her purpose to another day. But the next
day brought along with it events, which so
engrossed
her time and attention, that this desired object
was not again sought to be obtained, till
circumstances
intervened, which destroyed every motive and
wish she could entertain for accomplishing it.
Such was the state of feelings, and such the
relative
position in which the father and daughter stood
towards each other on the day which proved so
triumphant
to the American arms on lake Champlain.
In the early part of that day the attention of this
family, as well as that of all the inhabitants of the
vicinity of the lake, was aroused by heavy and
repeated
discharges of cannon, in the direction of
Ticonderoga
.
Little dreaming of the fact that this
cannonading, which was filling the whole valley of
the lake with its echoing thunders, was the harbinger
of a victory already won, the whole neighborhood
was instantly in commotion,some riding post haste
into the interior to carry the news, or rally
volunteers
,
some flying from house to house to interchange
the expressions of their fears and sympathies, and
the greater number, rushing down to the nearest
landing on the lake shore, to gain the first tidings
of their friends engaged in the deadly conflict, which
they supposed was at that moment raging round the
walls of the hostile fortress. In a short time the door
yard of Captain Hendee's cottage was filled with a
group of excited boys and anxious females. And
agonizing were the sensations of many an
affectionate
wife and sister, and oft and fervent their
trembling
ejaculations to Heaven for the preservation of
husbands, brothers and lovers, in this hour of
danger
.
And not the most indifferent among those
thus oppressed with painful solicitude for the event,
which they believed involved the fate of all they held
dear on earth, was Alma Hendee. To her, whose
lover might be expected to be among the foremost
of those engaged in the perilous assault, every gun
that came booming over the waters brought with it
a pang for her agitated bosom. Nor was her
anxiety
the less painfully felt, because circumstances
compelled
her to endure it in silence. The firing at
length ceased, and all awaited in trembling
solicitude
some arrival, which should bring them
information
of the result. This, however, continued for
several, and to most of them, long and tedious hours,
to rest in uncertainty. But at length a horseman,
covered with dust, and lashing his foaming horse to
speed, came furiously galloping down the road
from the south. All, with beating hearts and
breathless
expectation, awaited the announcement of the
rapidly approaching messenger. The next moment,
as he neared them, he swung his hat round his head,
exclaiming `Victory! victory! hurra for the Green
Mountain Boys! Ticonderoga is taken, and not a
man killed! hurra! hurra!' and, without scarcely
checking the speed of his horse, on he dashed, to
carry to others the joyful tidings. The cracked
voice of the war-worn and veteran Hendee was the
next instant mingling with the shrill and high keyed
cry of the boys around him, in the responsive hurra
that now involuntarily burst from their lips. With
tears of joy and thankfulness gushing over many a
fair cheek, the females hurried on such habiliments
as they had laid aside, and the company,
immediately
dispersing, hastened to their respective homes
with the gladdening news, leaving Captain Hendee
and his daughter again by themselves, and their
cottage
to relapse into its usual quietness. The day,
however, was not destined to close upon them
without
the occurrence of other events of stirring
interest
.
Towards sunset, several batteaux filled with
armed men, made their appearance on the lake,
approaching
from the south, and as they neared, were
soon discovered to be bearing down upon the
fortress
of Crown Point.
`Bring me out my old spy glass, Alma!' cried
Captain Hendee, hobbling from the garden, where
he had been to work, towards the house, and
turning
round every few steps to look at the little
armament
,
which he had discovered approaching. `Here
comes more trouble for the Britishor else that
fellow
fooled us with his news, and these are a
reinforcement
for the garrison. Come, step quick, girl, I
can't make them out with certainty.'
`Would British troops be likely to come in that
direction, father?' asked Alma, in accents tremulous
with emotion, as she approached, and handed the
required instrument to the other.
`Why, no, I should hardly have expected it; but
let us see,' replied the Captain, adjusting his glass
and placing it to his eye. `By heavens, the girl is
right! Those boats contain any thing but British
regulars. No, they must be Green Mountain Boys,
about to make an onset on the fort. See! how
stiffly they bear down towards the old walls!' he
continued with animation. `Gad! they are bold
fellows, to say the least, to be sailing directly in the
teeth of yonder war-dogs! But here, child, your
eye is keener than mine;take the glass and watch
their movements.'
The girl took the glass, and bringing the boats
within its field of vision, looked long and intently
without speaking.
`They are coming to a halt now, are they not?'
asked the Captain.
`Yes, they have nearly ceased rowing now,'
replied
the maiden. `Why, how plainly I can see even
their features! Now there is one, who has
mounted
a bench, and appears to be giving commands to
the rest. Now he has turned his face this way, as
ifas if'
`Why! how unsteady the girl's hand is!
nonsense
!
child, you need not be frightened,they are
not coming near us,' half pettishly, half
encouragingly
,
exclaimed the Captain, supposing his
daughter's
6*
very visible agitation proceeded from an
apprehension
that the commander was about to order the
boats to cross over the lake towards the house.
`I am not afraid, father, onlybut see! their
boats are turning to the shore. They appear now
to be putting into a small cove.'
`There is where they are cunning,' observed the
other. `They don't think it altogether safe to
approach
much nearer in the range of those
murderous
long guns. If I had been there in command of
the fort, I think they would have seen trouble some
time ago. Thank God, however, the stupid fools
within there have lost their best chance! But what
are they doing now?'
`They have landed, nearly all landed now, and
seem to be forming on the bank.'
Good! now, Alma, you will have a chance to
see a little of your father's old tradethat is, if the
garrison have sense and courage enough to make use
of the advantages they possess for repelling their
assailants
.
Are they moving forward yet for the fort?'
`No, the commander appears to be addressing
two men apart from the rest, one of whom seems to
be unrolling something white. Ah! I see, now; it
is a white flag. The two now advance along the
path leading to the fort, while the rest appear to
stand in a waiting attitude, anxiously watching the
motions of their two companions as they approach
the gate.'
`It is a summons from the commander, girla
summons for the surrender of the fort. Now you
will see whether they will obey it, and yield without
a blow the prize that cost the king so much toil and
blood in the winning, as my sad experience can well
attest. Many a dark and fearful night, Alma, have
I ranged these woods, while the savage foe were
lurking
around us in every direction. Old Major Put,
as we used to call that dare-devil, and myself once'
`There! there! father,' interrupted the other,
`the messengers have now approached near to the
walls. A man appears on the top. They are
conferring
together. The messengers point to their
companions. The man on the walls seems to
hesitate
.
They now seem to direct his attention to
something down the lake. Look, father, and see if
any thing is to be seen coming in that direction.'
`Now the Lord be with the assailants for a
sudden
rush, or their game is up!' exclaimed the
Captain
as, in compliance with his daughter's request,
he turned and threw an enquiring look along the
lake towards the north. `Two boats filled with
armed men are coming up the lake rowing for life
British, no doubt, hastening to succour the garrison.'
`No, father, no!' joyfully exclaimed the girl as
with trembling haste she turned the glass to the
armament
in question. `You are again mistaken.
These, too, are Green Mountain Boys, coming on to
join their companions.'
`Green Mountain Boys! from that quarter? where
should they come from?'
`From the Winooski river, father. Captain Baker
has been on there, and'eagerly replied the other,
but stopping short and blushing, as it occurred to
her that the remark would lead to the discovery
of the source of her information.
`Really, girl! one would suppose you had been
at the council of war, where this campaign was
planned
,'
said the Captain, with an air of surprise; but
being too much occupied with present objects to
trace the association, he, to the great relief of his
confused daughter, reverted to the scene before him,
and said, `You may be right after all,if so,
victory
is certain. But turn now to the fort and see
what is going on there.'
`I willI am, father,' replied the flustered girl.
`Ah! I have a view again: now the conference
between
the commander, or man on the walls and the
two messengers, seems to be broken off. The
latter
are departing. But now the man seems to be
calling them back. They turn to him again and
hold parley. Now the messengers turn quickly
round, and wave their flag to their companions, who
seem suddenly to be put in motion. And, see! see!
their whole body is rushing towards the fort. How
their guns glimmer through the trees as they pour
along the path! How their commander's sword
flashes in the sun, as half turning, he whirls it about
his head to motion them on! There! there!
father
,
they mount the swell!they approach the
wallsthe gate is thrown open; and now they
disappear
within the works, and all is still.'
`And all without a single gun being fired in
defence
of Old Frederick! impossible!' exclaimed the
Captain, with mingled feelings of joy for the
success
of his countrymen, and shame for the garrison,
who would surrender, without resistance, a fortress
which years of his life had been spent in helping to
wrest from the Frenchmen.
`Here! look, look, father!' again exclaimed the
excited girl. `The Lion flag goes down! another of
a lighter colour goes up! Have they not
conquered
,
father?They have! They have! and oh! how
thankful!'
`Yes! 'tis all over!' responded the Captain,
rubbing
his hands in extacy. `Quick work, by
heavens
!
Not a gun fired!not a man killed, and the
old Lion is flat on his back! The command of the
whole of lake Champlain is ours! Huzza for
liberty
!'
he shouted, leaping from the ground, forgetful
of his lameness in the excitement of the moment,
and throwing his hat into the air: `Huzza for the
Green Mountain Boys! They deserve a hecatomb
for their victories!'
At this instant a dozen columns of smoke shot
out fiercely from the walls of the fortress, and the
deafening peal of cannon, which followed,
announced
to the shuddering hills around the surrender of
the last controlling foot-hold of British power on the
waters of Lake Champlain, to the prowess and
patriotism
of the Green Mountain Boys.
Alma now delivering up the spy-glass to her
father
,
hastened into the house, and took a seat in her
window, where, unobserved by any, she could
observe
what further movements might transpire at
the scene of action, and at the same time freely
indulge in her emotions of joy and gratitude for the
preservation of her lover, whom she had distinctly
made out to be the leader of the victorious party.
An hour or two after the surrender, a skiff,
containing
a single individual, put off from the shore
under the fort, and directed its course to the
landing
below the cottage. The individual, on reaching
the shore, came directly towards the house, and was
soon ascertained to be Neshobee by the Captain,
who, still remaining in his garden, had been
watching
the coming boat. The Indian rather sheepishly
approached his master, conscious, perhaps, that as
far as regarded the Captain, he had played the
truant
in joining the expedition.
`Well, Neshobee,' said the Captain, as the other,
with averted face came carelessly along, `where
have you been all this time?'
`Umph! me been go learn fight um.'
`I thought it likely enough they had got you away
for that, as I suspected, from several things I noticed
yesterday, that this business was afoot. But how
did you know I should be willing you should join in
these doings?'
`What you tell big CappenColonel, who make
believe drunk todder night?'
`Well, well, my lad, I don't mean to scold you
much for joining in so good a work, though you
might have talked with me a little before you went.
But have you been with the big Captain, who is no
other than Ethan Allen, Mr. Sherwood informed me?'
`Me have.'
`Well, he was commander of the expedition, I
supposewhat did he and his men do there at
Ticonderoga
?'
`They take um red-coats,pile up their guns for
no let um have um more,fire big guns, more fifty
hoo! bang!' replied the Indian with significant
gestures.
`And was it the big Captain who come on with
the men to take this fort?'
`No, young Cappen, Major, what you call Misser
Howard.'
`Well, you may go, now,' said Hendee,
impatiently
,
motioning the other to go on to the house.
`How proud I should now be of that same
Warrington
,
outlaw though he be, but for this accursed
business!' muttered the Captain to himself, after the
Indian had departed, with a tone and manner in
which admiration and dislike, kindness and
resentment
,
regret and bitterness, were strangely blended.
`Hang me! if I don't almost think the better of the
girl for liking him. Though if Jake's stories are
true!I wonder now if the fellow did not lie to me?
would to God things had been different! But
they are not different, and won't be; and hell town I
what am I talking about? It can't gono, no! and
by the powers of earth! it shan't go, an inch
further
,
or I will make the house too hot for her!'
While the passionate and unhappy father was
thus giving vent to his conflicting feelings, the
Indian
entered the house, and proceeded to the
apartment
of the daughter, who had also noted his
approach
,
and beckoned him from the window to come
to her room.
`Now tell me, in the first place, Neshobee,' said
she eagerly, `whether Mr. Sherwood was over there
to be taken prisoner with the rest?'
`Me no see him.'
`You said yesterday, he was then there.'
`Me see him, as me say, then,no there to day
when we comeguess him run.'
`Very likely, but Darrow was there, of course,
was he not?'
`Him no there, too.'
`How unfortunate!' exclaimed the maiden with
an air of disappointment and regret. `Not even
one of them, then, is secured! Well, well,
Heaven
knows best; and in that I will still put my trust.
But what have you there? she added, as her quick
eye caught the hand of the other fumbling for
something
in his pocket.
`Cappen send um,' quietly answered Neshobee,
pulling out a billet, which was instantly snatched
from his hands by the eager girl.
`O, why not have told me, before! But you may
go now, Neshobee;' and with a quick, impatient
waving of her hand, she motioned him away.
With a beating heart and glowing cheek, the
happy
girl read, and re-read, many times, the precious
note; when, after pondering anxiously and deeply,
awhile, she took her sheet and wrote.
Your few lines, my dear sir, have been
received
,
and read, I know not how many times over, and
with an interest which I dare not acknowledge.
Your propositions, too, have been all candidly, and
even anxiously weighed. And it is with many,
very
many regrets, my more than friend, that I am
forced to the conclusion that, at present, it were
better
,
that they be not complied with. You first
propose
to come here openly, explain to my father the
reasons which compelled you to that course, which
he pretends so much to censure, and claim the
privilege
of addressing me:all the explanations, which
it may be needful to make, would, I am satisfied,
with my father's present feelings and impressions,
be better listened to from me than yourself. And
most assuredly they shall be made to him as soon as
his mood shall be such as shall warrant the belief
that they will be received, without passion or
prejudice
.
And before you take the step you propose, I
could wish also to see to some change in his views
relative to the match he has marked out for me. And
changed, believe me, they sooner or later will be.
Reason will at length resume her sway; and, to say
nothing of your character, the character of one of
whom I would not willingly speak my opinion, must
soon be better known to him. And he will see, and
feel, for himself, that his present requirements are
neither wise nor generous. But do not, for my sake,
for your own sake, beloved friend, attempt to
accomplish
all this now, under circumstances so
inauspicious
:
for I feel it would be useless; and not
only
so, but lead, probably, to the defeat of the objects,
and consequently the happiness of us both. No,
Warrington, be patient, trust in Heaven to expose
guilt, and reward inocence, and rely on the
constancy
of her, who is resolved to bring about a state of
things when her lover can be received in her
father's
house with the kindness and respect to which
he is entitled.
As an alternative, in case I disapprove your first
proposal, you request to be favored with secret, or
stolen interviews,Warrington, Charles
Warrington
!
would you recommend such a course to a
beloved
sister? With your delicacy of sentiment,
with your admiration of exalted virtue, I know you
would not. Why, then, ask it of one whom you
propose to make more than a sister? Again,
dearest
friend, I must say to you, no! I have ever
disapproved
of clandestine meetings:there is an air
of guilt about thema something that seems to
imply
a consciousness of wrong, which innocence and
rectitude of purpose should never stoop thus tacitly
to acknowledge. And the same views, which have
led to the disapprobation of these, have, in most
respects
,
an equal application to the measure that you
hint it may be expedient for us, as a final resort, to
adopt,a private elopement. In some countries,
and in some states of society, such a measure may,
perhaps, be sometimes justifiable; but is it so in a
land like ours, where force is rarely, if ever, used, to
defeat the engagements of lovers? While armed
with the panoply of virtue and reason, and
possessed
of the moral courage which these should ever
7
impart, few females, I apprehend, need here resort
to this questionable practice. And were I to be wed
to you to day, Mr. Warrington, it should be done
openly, and, if permitted, in the presence of my
natural protector. But if the ceremony were
forbidden
,
I would then, after frankly apprising him of
my intentions, as openly depart with you to a place
where it would be allowed. And if force were
employed
to restrain me, I would then throw myself on
the protection of him who would defend, or deserve
to lose me.
You know not how rejoiced is my heart to hear
of your personal safety,how proud to learn your
brilliant successes, and how gratified at the
promotion
you have received. You say you are about to
proceed south, to make enlistments for an
expedition
into Canada. Go!deserve well of your
country
,
be true and constant, and, while you remain
what I now believe you, count me so, and be
assured
,
that all the reward that this poor heart and hand
can confer, shall be eventually yours. My prayers
will attend you amidst the perils of war. Apprise
me oftenas often as possible, of your situation.
And, notwithstanding I have declined your present
proposals, O, do not believe me now, do not
hereafter
think me, less devotedly yours.
Alma
.
When Alma had finished her letter, she sought
her trusty messenger, and confided it to his charge,
with instructions to convey it to Warrington at the fort
that night, or as soon as he could absent himself
without exciting the observation of her father; after
which she again returned to her solitary apartment,
and soon sought her pillow, to escape the
perplexities
of the present in the bright visions of the future.
During the next day, her time and attention were
more than usually occupied by calls at the house,
from those passing to and from the fort. And it
was not till nearly night, that she found an
opportunity
to escape from the company, with which, in
successive parties, the cottage had been thronged
through the day. But being relieved at length from
these hospitable duties, and wearied with bustle, in
which she had been engaged, she threw a light
kerchief
over her head, and wandered into the fields to
indulge in those solitary musings so grateful to
seperated
lovers. The golden sun was just sinking behind
the western hills. The earth was a variegated
carpet
of flowers beneath her feet; and tempted by
the beauty of the evening, she continued her course
almost unconsciously, down the little vale towards
the woods; and before she was aware how far she
had wandered, she had arrived at the border of the
field, and was standing by the tree beneath which
Warrington had first breathed to her the word `love.'
After indulging awhile in the associations which this
sequestered spot awakened in her mind, she turned,
and was retracing her steps homeward, when she
was startled by the sharp rattling voice of some one
a few rods below her, and turning, she beheld Pete
Jones making his way up the slope towards her.
`Hold up a little bit there, lady, that is, if you're
a mind to,' he said, respectfully approaching and
holding up a letter between his thumb and finger.
`There's a little concern of a letter, which Captain
Selden handed me to give you.'
`Indeed! an answer from Skenesboro' so soon?'
said Alma, with a subsiding blush, which was raised
by the thought first occurring to her mind that the
message came from another quarter.
`Answer to the letter the nigger had,d'ye mean?
why, yes, rather spose so. Any how, I believe it
came from that little hum-bird of a girl that we
caught at that small scrape we had with the old
podunk
of a Scotchman and his folks, at the Lower
Falls, a week or two ago.'
`You mean Miss Reed, probablyhave you been
up to Skenesboro', since you were here?'
`O, yes, a lot of us went up there yesterday,
after
things had been pretty well fixed at Old Ti.'
`For what purpose, if I may ask, sir?'
`Why only just to let the Major there know, that
the Continental Congress had kinder taken a fancy
to his stone house. At all events, Captain Selden
told them something of that sort, as we made them
all prisoners there.'
`What! the ladies and all?I trust they will
have no reason to complain'
`Ah, you needn't borry no trouble there, mum, I
guess. The ladies won't be very likely to cry their
eyes out, at falling into the hands of such a chap as
Captain Seldennow you see if they do? For
instance
,
mum, by way of a similar,' continued Pete,
beginning to look mischievous, being no longer able
to keep down his ruling propensitiy for joking, `for
instance, suppose now, that Major Warrington should
come over here with men enoughand twouldn't
take over a thousand neither, mayhap'
`You need not trouble yourself to explain, sir,'
interrupted Miss Hendee, rather flurriedly. `The
letter will inform me of all particulars, doubtless.
You will now excuse me, as I must return. But
perhaps
you will go to the house for some refreshment,
or to remain with us through the night?'
`Why, no,thank'ee mum,' replied the other,' a
little abashed at the dignity which the girl had
assumed
.
`No, I must be off to my traps: I am a
sort of a water-mail to carry orders to day.
Captain
Selden sent me on, this morning, with
dispatches
to old thunder-bolt, Colonel Allen, you know.
Well, the Colonel, he sent me with my little bird of
a canoe agoing again, like a foot ball, down here to
Crown Point, to notify the Major to come up to a
council there, to-night, or in the morning. So you
see I must put on with my errand, as I havn't been
to the fort yet. You may just tell the old Captain
at the house, if you're a mind to, that my ague,
since I was there, hasn't been very desput,
considering
.'
So saying, the jolly borderer turned, and
bounded
down the slope like a young colt, giving vent to
the exuberance of his animal spirits, as soon as he
was fairly out of the restraining presence of the
lady
,
in his favorite old chorus, `Trol, lol, lol de
larly
!'
Hastening to the house, and then to her room,
Miss Hendee eagerly tore open the letter just
received
,
and read as follows:
`Be astonished, O, ye heavens! and Alma
Hendee
,
be you thunder struck! as I know you will be,
when you learn, that we areevery man of us,the
Major and all, prisoners of war! Yes, I am a
second
time a prisoner to Mr. Selden! What means
it, Alma? There is some strange fatality about it,
that passes my poor comprehension. O, for some
one deeply skilled in scanning the futuresome one
gifted with the second sight, which is claimed by our
Highland seers in Scotland, to divine to me the
portent
of this singular happening! How very
surprised
*7
we all were when they landeda body of
armed menand marched up, taking possession of
the yard, and disarming our soldiers.
The Major was in the house, and never
mistrusted
,
I really believe, what could be their object, till
they had seized the sloop and batteaux, and by their
rapid movements in surrounding the men, put it out
of his power to make any resistance. All this was,
seemingly, the work of a moment. And before we
had recovered from the first shock of the surprise,
Mr. Selden, who appeared to be chief in command,
had entered the house, and, with drawn sword, stood
before us. The Major then, indeed, began to show
some symptoms of uneasinessmore, however, even
then, I thought, at the presence of one, whom he
evidently has both feared and hated, since the
former
visit, than because he really supposed he was in
earnest about capturing the establishment. After
Mr. Selden had politely saluted us, ladios, he
bowed
formally to the Major, who returned the
compliment
only by a vain attempt to get his organs of
speech in motion.
`Who?what?Hem!' he stammered, stepping
restlessly about the room, and looking daggers at the
other: `Why, sirI should like to know, siryes,
sirlet me tell you, sir, what I think of you, sir'
`O, never trouble yourself, Major,' replied Mr. S.
with a satirical smile, `it might take you a longer
time than I could possibly spare to devote to so
unimportant
a purpose.'
`Why, sir!' resumed my doughty warrior of a
lady's parlour,`dn you, sir! do you mean to
insult, sir?I'll just let you know, siryou'll just
please to walk out of the house, sir!'
`O, be patient, Major,' rejoined Selden, with the
most provoking coolness. `Let me explain to these
ladies the nature of our call, lest they be
unnecessarily
alarmed.'
He then informed us of the outbreaking of the
war, the capture of Ticonderogaand the
determination
of the Americans to possess themselves of
this post, also; and consequently the necessity of
our removal to some other place, to which he
assured
us of a safe escort.
`Now, Major,' said he, turning to the other, who
had several times broken in on Mr. S., `I have only
to say to you, that both you, and all your men are
prisoners of war.'
Even then the Major could scarcely comprehend
what had befallen him; for he again began to
bluster
and threaten. But Selden, at once cutting him
short, ordered him away; when they both left the
house together. I never saw creatures so puzzled
and confounded as were Marge and Merry Skene.
They neither knew what to say, or how to act. As
for myself, I could hardly hold in till the gentlemen
had left the room, when I fairly shed tears with the
laughter, which I could not repress, at the ludicrous
scene I had witnessed. In regard to the valient
Major, he will not, probably, make much more fuss
about the affair to day. To-morrow he will be
considerably
moved at the disaster; and by the next
day, he will have so collected his ideas and his wrath,
that he will be tremendously mad.
They took the place about noon;since which
we ladies have held our council of war. And it has
been decided that we take our departure to-morrow
morning for Albany, where we shall at present
remain
,
with a connection of the Skenes'. I should
have certainly preferred, for myself, to go and reside
with you. But I dare not name it to them; for the
girls are already as jealous of me as witches; and I
well knew, that should I make such a proposition, it
would be attributed to a secret wish to be where I
could see more of Mr. S. And further, I am not
quite sure, but they might be so kind as to
communicate
their suspicions to father; for I have a father,
who may claim a voice in some matters as well as
you. Now don't draw any inferences from that
observation
,
Alma; because, positively, there are none
to draw.
Mr. Selden handed me your letter, brought by
black Jack, till he fell into the hands of the powers
that be. I read it with much interest,the more
so, perhaps, as I thought of the possibility that we
may yet have cause to mingle our sympathies.
I shall probably remain with the Skenes till
father
returnsif he does return; for now we have
war, I am rather uncertain what course he will
pursue
.
Should he receive a commission that suits him,
he may engage in the war. This, however, is
doubtful
.
And I think it very likely he will remain
neutral
,
as I suspect he thinks the government have not
done him justice. At all events, I don't believe he
feels very bitter towards the Americans; but if he
does, I know of one who don't.
P. S. Mr. Selden is to escort us in person to
Albany
;
and what is better, the Major is compelled to
go with the other prisoners to Ticonderoga. His
face is most unreasonably long at this arrangement
I think he will be crazy by to-morrow. Marge is
secretly rejoiced, and I know of another who is less
sad about it than she might be. I have had a
conversation
with Mr. Selden, alone, which has shown
me that he can be serious when he pleases. But I
have no time left me to state particulars. In my
next I will be more explicit.
Adieu, adieu.
Jessy
.
CHAPTER V.
With pleasures, hopes, affections gone,
The wretch may bear, and yet live on,
Like things within the cold rock found
Alive, when all's congeal'd around.
During
the week succeeding the stirring and
important
events, which we have been endeavoring to
describe, circumstances of both a public and private
nature, conspired to bring Miss Hendee in contact
with her neighbors and acquaintances, much more
than usual. The recent change of masters at the
fort having led to a new and frequent intercourse
with the inhabitants of this section of the country,
many of both sexes had called at the cottage, on
their visits to their friends, who were now members
of the garrison. Business connected with her
father's
household concerns had also caused her to
make several calls, during the period above
mentioned
,
at the houses of the different settlers in the
neighborhood
.
It could not reasonably be supposed, in a
country settlement where people, in the absence of
other employment of their leisure, are usually so
curious
respecting the affairs of their neighbors, and
where every kind of gossipping always finds so ready
a circulation, that the visits of so distinguished a
young gentleman as Warrington, at a house
containing
one so lovely and excellent as Alma Hendee,
had been suffered to transpire without being
generally
known, and commented on, by the inhabitants
of the vicinity. Such, at all events appeared not
to have been the case in the present instance: for
Miss Hendee soon discovered, that her social
intercourse
with her lover, as limited as it had recently
been, was well understood by nearly every one of
her acquaintance with whom she now happened to
fall in company. And many were the jokes and
banterings which she was compelled to meet on the
subject. But there was one circumstance attending
them which soon struck her as peculiar and
uncommon
in such kind of rallyings; and this was, that,
instead of the flattering and grateful approvals, and
happy predictions, usually uttered on such occasions,
they were now, in almost every instance,
accompanied
with some manifestations of regret, or
disapprobation
,
at the conjectured intimacysome
hesitation
of manner, some ominous shaking of the head,
or some mysterious hinting at the dangers that would
attend the connection, which none, at the same time,
seemed to treat as one that would terminate in
marriage
.
At first, Alma paid but little attention to
these intimations; but as they were repeated, they
began to occasion her considerable uneasiness. And
when she found them coming from all quarters,
prudence
would no longer permit her to pass them
unheeded
.
And she began to busy her mind in
trying
to account for impressions, which she supposed
to be much too general to be attributed to chance
opinions, or personal prejudices. She felt satisfied
that this feeling could not proceed from any wish to
favor Sherwood's pretensions to her hand; for she
well knew he was no favorite with the people at
large. Nor could she perceive how it could arise
from any ill opinion entertained against Warrington,
who, as she had been told, was held in the highest
estimation by the settlers generally, both for the
signal
services he had publicly rendered them, and for
the many excellent traits of his private character.
Although delicacy of feeling, as well as prudence,
prevented her making any enquiries of those who
had introduced this subject, yet the amount of what
she had gathered from them seemed to indicate the
existence of some insurmountable barrier to the
union
,
to which she had recently engaged herself. But
what the nature of this obstacle could be, she was
wholly unable to conjecture.
One day, after making one of her excursions
among the settlers, she had returned home under an
unusual depression of spirits, occasioned by some
hints and warnings of a more pointed nature than
she had before received, together with the
mortifying
reflection that her views and feelings, in regard
to her secretly contemplated union, had found no
response in the minds of her acquaintance.
Although
an easy credulity formed no part of the
discriminating
mind of Miss Hendee, yet prudence and
discretion were ever among the leading traits of her
finely balanced character. And these taught her
the necessity of pausing in the path she had begun
to tread, lest it, indeed, should be found to be beset
with dangers, which had been concealed from her
view. She recalled to mind some insinuations
thrown out by Sherwood at his late visit, by which,
she now, on reflection, supposed he intended she
should believe, that Warrington was not only a
libertine
,
but that he had, by a clandestine marriage,
entered into with some of his victims for the
purpose
of accomplishing his designs, put it out of his
own power to contract a legal marriage with
another
.
Considering these insinuations at the time
entirely
false and malicious, she had instantly rejected
them from her mind, withour paying attention enough
to them to examine the import of the words by
which they were conveyed. But now, on recurring
to the subject, and comparing Sherwood's words
with the dark hints she had since received from
others
,
she could not but be startled with the
coincidence
she perceived in all the different intimations
that she had heard. And the more she reflected on
the various remarks of her acquaintance, all seeming
to tend to the same point, and to be strangely
corroborative
of each other, the more apprehensive she
became of the existence of some fact, which would
not only level with the dust the fair fabric of
prospective
happiness she had lately been rearing, but
would place her in no enviable position before the
public, when the step she had taken should become
known.
While Miss Hendee was revolving these
distracting
thoughts in her mind, that had now reached that
state of uncertainty and fluctuation which
peculiarly
fits it for the reception of questionable statements,
her reflections were interrupted by the entrance of
a man, who announced himself as a tinker, wishing
to know whether there were any wares in the house
which required the aid of his profession. Being
answered
in the affirmative, he pulled off his pack,
and, producing his tools, went to work on such
utensils
as were brought him for repairing. He was a
man of a loquacious turn; and he had scarcely
become
seated at his work, before his tongue was
going
as rapidly as his hammer. Being somewhat
amused
at the remarks she heard him make to Ruth, the
domestic of whom we have before spoken, Alma
soon acquitted the adjoining room, where she had
seated herself, and, entering the kitchen, took a seat,
and fell into conversation with the talkative
stranger
,
occasionally asking a question herself, and good
naturedly answering the various questions he put to
her, as he rapidly roved from subject to subject, in so
disconnected a manner, that it would have puzzled
a philosopher to have traced the association of the
man's ideas.
`Your fort over here has lately changed masters,
I learn,' he carelessly observed, after he had started
and dispatched every other topic which he
apparently
could think of as connected with the affairs of the
neighborhood,`I wonder who has the command of
the place under the new order of things?'
`Major Warrington, I believe,' replied Alma, as a
slight tinge overspread her fair cheek.
`Major Warrington, Warrington, did you say?'
said the man, enquiringly repeating the name: `not
Charles Warrington of Bennington way?'
`Yes, the same, sir,' replied the other.
`Now I want to know! Do tell us if he has got
to be Major?' half exclaimed, and half enquired the
seemingly surprised tinker.
`Is he a former acquaintance of yours, sir?'
asked
Alma, turning with a look of interest to the man.
`Lord, yes!' exclaimed he, with great apparent
simplicity. `Why mam, I have known him ever
since he was knee high to a toadused to live in
the same town with him and his father's family, in
old Connecticut, before they moved to the Grants,
8
and have seen Charles there often since, on his
visits
back among his relationsandand old
sweet-hearts
,'
he continued, looking up roguishly to Alma,
as if to see how the last remark took with her, but
perceiving the uneasiness of her looks, he jocosely
added, `Why, I spose the girls know that the young
men will have sweet-hearts, don't they?'
`I pretend not to know young gentlemen's
business
,
sir,' replied Alma, in a voice tremulous with
suppressed emotion.
`Well, well, I meant no offence,' rejoined the
tinker
,
seemingly abashed at the poor reception of his
rally.
`You have given me none, sir,' timidly remarked
the other. `But I think you said you had kept up
your acquaintance with Mr. Warrington, and you
may know whetherthat is you'and she paused,
unable for the fluttering of her heart to proceed with
an enquiry, the answer to which would probably
involve
her every hope of happiness for life: for she
felt that this plain and apparently honest man, with
his intimate knowledge of Warrington's previous
life and character, would be able to furnish her
testimony
,
which would remove her apprehensions, or
confirm them, and seal her doom forever.
`May know what, marm?' asked he, after waiting
patiently awhile for her to proceed.
Alma made an effort to go on; but so great was
her agitation that she could not utter a syllable, and
she remained silent.
`Yes, I know all about Charles Warrington as
well as any other man,' resumed the fellow, after he
saw the other was not likely to go on with her
enquiry
.
`A considerable of a chap he is, too. In fact,
he is a plaguey smart fellow; and a likely one, too,
in the main. I never knew but one mean trick
about him in my life; and that was, shuffling off and
deserting that poor simple wife of his, that he
married
kinder privately there in Connecticut a year or
two ago.'
Had a winged shaft from an Indian's bow, at that
instant been driven through the heart of Alma
Hendee
,
the convulsive start, the sudden contraction of
the muscles of her face, and the fearful death-gasp,
would have been scarcely more visible than was the
effect of the words of the last speaker. She sat a
moment as if suddenly paralyzed in all her senses.
Presently commenced the twitching, nervous motion
of her fingers, as she rapidly handled over the work
in her lap. Then suddenly rising, she went to the
window, and gasping for breath, stood an instant
vacantly
gazing out upon the landscape, with a face as
white as the bloodless marble. She then turned
quickly away, and, with hurried, unsteady steps,
rushed
out of the room. Reaching her own apartment,
she again stopped short, and remained several
moments
mute and motionless as a statue, while the
wo-stricken expression of her countenance, and the
silent workings in the muscles of her blanched and
beautiful features, as she stood, like a tearless Niobe,
with her anguished eye upcast to heaven, and both
hands pressed tightly against her heart, told, more
forcibly than language can express, the mental
agony
with which she was contending.
After Alma left the room, the miserable wretch,
who had so cruelly inflicted this dreadful blow upon
her feelings, hurried through his work, received his
stipulated wages, and departed. No sooner had he
turned his back than the faithful Ruth, who had
noticed
,
and understood all that had passed, hastened,
with looks of visible concern, to the apartment of her
idolized young mistress.
`Alma!' said she, tenderly placing her hand on
the now burning brow of the suffering girl, who had
flung herself upon her bed, where she was lying,
with one hand pressing her closed eyelids and the
other her side: `Alma, your forehead is very hot
shall I bathe it?'
`No, no, Ruth,' faintly murmured the fair
sufferer
,
`it is no attack of disease: my head, I know, is
some fevered, and my eyes are sore, very sore; but
the trouble is here!' she added, indicating the
spot by lifting and replacing her hand upon her
heart.
`I was aware of your feelings in some measure,
Alma,' replied the other soothingly, `and being like
yourself, deceived in the character of the man of
your secret choice, I confess, I did not disapprove
of your partiality. But now, Alma, should you not
be thankful, that you have made this discovery in
season to retrace your steps, and escape the danger?'
`Yes, and I am, I certainly am; but O, Ruth,
Ruth, you little knew how much I loved him! and
oh! how cruellycruelly has he repaid my lavished
affection!'
With this the sealed fountain of her tears
suddenly
opened. And as the pearly drops flowed thick
and fast over her lovely cheeks, she breathed more
freely; and the torture, the scorching, tearless
agony
,
that she had felt withering both heart and brain,
was removed, giving place to the mitigated suffering
of ordinary sorrow, in which she long, long
indulged
,
while her faithful domestic, in character of nurse
and friend, watched over, and comforted her.
The next morning, when Miss Hendee arose, she
was calm and composed, though looking extremely
pale. Her appearance very plainly told, that the
struggle she had passed through had been a fearful
one; but it told, also, that she had not struggled in
vain for the mastery over her feelings. Though her
heart had been pierced and lacerated, she seemed to
have succeeded in silencing its throbbings. There
was a decision in her looks and movements, that
indicated
the stern and unwavering resolves she had
made. And in pursuance of the course she had
marked out for herself, it was her first object to
dispatch
such a notice to Warrington of her
determination
,
as should effectually deter him from
attempting
any renewal of the intercourse. Accordingly,
after she had superintended, as usual, the household
affairs of the family for the morning, she retired, and
penned the brief note:
Major Warrington
,Our intimacy is forever
ended. As no explanations need be given, so none
will be received. I trust, therefore, that no further
communications on your part will be attempted.
Alma Hendee
.
Sealing the note, she summoned Neshobee to her
room, and with the same desperate sort of calmness
which she had exhibited through the morning, though
with a slight tremor in her voice, she said to him,
`Here, Neshobee, take this to Major Warrington
without delay, if you can find him within twenty miles
of this place. But I understand there was a vessel,
with several boats filled with troops, arrived from the
south last night; and he probably came with them,
as he has been absent from the fort, I am told, for
the purpose of enlisting more men. Go, give it
8*
him; and do not stay an instant for an answer, or
to give him a chance to question you.'
The Indian, who perceived both in her words and
manner, that some sudden change had taken place
in the connection, which he was aware existed
between
her and his friend, Warrington, threw a keen
enquiring glance upon the face of his mistress, and
seemed to hesitate and linger, as if for an
explanation
of so unexpected an errand. But receiving
only
an impatient motion of her hand for his
immediate
departure, he turned away, and with an air of
mingled wonder and regret, left the house in silence,
and proceeding to his skiff at the landing, rowed
directly
over to the fort. When he arrived there he
found all in bustle and commotion, preparatory to an
expedition into Canada. Allen, Warrington and
Arnold
had arrived, as before intimated, the evening
previous, with a schooner and a number of batteaux,
filled with a considerable body of troops, collected
for the contemplated expedition, all of whom
were now on the point of embarking,Arnold in
the schooner, with such Massachusetts' troops as had
arrived since the capture of Ticonderoga, and were
now properly under his command, and Allen and
Warrington with the remainder of the forces in the
batteaux. As soon as the Indian reached the shore
he sought out Warrington, and put the note into his
hand. Receiving it as one who might be expecting
a favor of the kind, the latter carefully put the
supposed
prize into his pocket, and informing the
messenger
,
that he had one for him to take back to his
mistress in return, he turned to finish the directions
he was at the moment engaged in imparting to his
men. When he had completed the business
immediately
on hand, he turned to look for Neshobee,
that he might take him into the fort to receive the
letter he intended to send back by him. But, after
searching for him in vain among the men, he cast
his eye on to the lake, and, to his surprise and
vexation
,
he beheld the native rapidly pulling for the
opposite
shore, and already out of hailing distance.
Still supposing, however, that the messenger had
misunderstood his request, the impatient lover
hastened
to a solitary room in the fort for the purpose of
reading the precious paper alone, and adding a
postscript
to the one he had written, that he might
dispatch
it by a special messenger before he embarked.
As soon as he was alone, he eagerly broke the seal
of Alma's brief note, and read, with the most
unmingled
pain and astonishment, its unexpected
contents
.
Hastily rising from the seat he had taken, he,
for many minutes rapidly paced the room in silence,
while the agitation visibly depicted on his manly
countenance plainly bespoke the depth and
bitterness
of his emotions.
`Yes, noble girl,' he at length mournfully said,
`incapable of intrigue and meanness yourself, you
have, in some way, unsuspectingly become a victim
to the snares of a villain! It isit must be so. A
deception has been practiced upon youa gross
deception
could alone have prompted to a measure so
sudden, so cruel, so inconsistent, and so destructive,
as I know it must be, to your own happiness. Well,
well, I have no leisure now, if I would, to enter the
lists with this dispicable plotter of mischief, who has
thus entered our Eden, and turned its happiness to
sorrow, in trying to ferret out his villanies, or
compete
with him in his low game of intrigue and
deception
.
I must leave you, too credulous girl, to
discover for yourself the arts by which you have
been duped, and the injustice you have done me
till then, farewelltill then, be my country my heart's
only mistress.'
Before another hour had elapsed, Warrington
had embarked with his troops, and, with the gallant
and war-like array with which he was borne down
the lake, had passed from the scene of his love and
disappointment on his way to fields of blood and
glory.
It comes not within the scope of our design to
accompany
our Green Mountain Boys through the
eventful campaign that followed their present
embarcation
,
or to attempt to trace the varied fortunes of
their gallant leaders,the daring, talented, and
chivalrous
Allen, who, in his heroic attempt on
Montreal
,
was taken prisoner and carried to England in
irons, and there kept through a long and doleful
captivity
,
which deprived his country of the aid of one
of her most energetic sons during the most trying
period of the war,the skillful, cool and intrepid
Warrington, whose conduct soon won for him the
admiration of his country,the gay and gifted
Selden
,
whose sword and pen were alike successfully
wielded in the cause,and the jolly and fearless
Jones, who became known as the most sagacious and
trusty scout leader in the northern army. These,
and the brave, resolute and patriotic men under
their command, who soon, by their courage and
success
in battle, and their fidelity to the cause of
freedom
,
rendered the name of Green Mountain Boys
a terror to their foes, and an appellation of honor
among their admiring countrymen, we must now
leave to struggle with their enemies abroad, while
we remain on the spot we have chosen as the scene of
our story, there to wait their return to make the
place once more the theatre of glorious conflict.
From this time, for a period of about two years,
there was a pause in the action of our story.
Although
the events which formed its commencement
were intimately connected with those attending its
catastrophe, yet nothing occurred, during that
interval
,
particularly to vary the aspect of the one, or to
hasten the other. And the relative situation of all
the different individuals of our dramatis person,
from this time seperated and scattered in various
directions
,
remained nearly unaltered, till the tide of
war, combined with other circumstances, brought
them again together to figure on the scene of action
where we have thus far described them. We
propose
,
therefore, to pass lightly over this interval, and
with a few observations, by way of noticing the
situation
and progress of affairs in the Hendee family
in the meanwhile, we shall proceed at once to the
closing period of our story.
From the hour of her supposed discovery of the
duplicity and base conduct of Warrington, life was
but a joyless blank to Alma Hendee. Although by
the fortitude and firmness of her character, aided by
female pride, which had been deeply wounded by
the mortifying developement, she had succeeded in
her determined efforts to keep from sinking under
the cruel disappointment, yet she could not but feel,
that the young affections, which she had thus
lucklessly
suffered to entwine round the heart, and root
themselves in its very core, were withered, never to
be revived to their original freshness at the bidding
of another. In the unbounded confidence of her
youthful love, she had squandered her heart's best
treasures on one from whom neither pride nor
principle
would longer suffer her to accept a return. And
she was deeply conscious, that she could never
gather
them again, to bestow them on a more worthy
object
,
or where they would yield her the earthly
happiness
to which she had begun to look so fondly
forward
in her anticipated connection.
It is an interesting and beautiful trait in the
character
of woman's affections, that she never truly
worships but at one altar. If that remains to her,
though no new attraction be added,no new
inducement
offered to ensure the continuance of her
devotion
,she
asks no more, but worships on, and on,
more deeply and fervently, till the heart, that offers
the homage, ceases in death to cling to all
earthly
objects. But if that is destroyed or
removed
,
the incense of her heart passes away with it.
She may, indeed, sometimes be found kneeling at
another shrine, and offering up the forms of
devotion
,
but the life, the spirit of the worship is forever
gone.
After the rupture between Miss Hendee and
Warrington
,
Sherwood became, for a while, unusually
constant in his visits at Captain Hendee's, and quite
assiduous in his attentions to the listless girl, to whom
they were offered. At his first call, after that event,
he soon, and with a malicious satisfaction, discovered
that the arts he had put in practice had been
crowned
with success. This he not only read in her pale
face, in which the settled air of gloom and
disappointment
were visibly depicted, but also in her
altered
,
and more respectful manner towards himself,
which, without any change of opinion respecting his
general character, she very naturally, though
unconsciously
,
perhaps, exhibited towards him, as to one
whom she now exhonerated from the particular
charges
to which she believed him obnoxious. Having
satisfied himself of this state of things, he at first
cunningly forbore to renew his former pretensions to
her hand. In a short time, however, he began again
to make professions of attachment, and, without
asking
of her any other than the tacit acquiesence she
had formerly yielded, talked of their engagement as
of a settled business, and as if nothing had occurred
to alter the relation formerly existing between them.
These addresses Alma rather suffered than
received
;
and the affair between them was, in this
manner
,
allowed by her to fall into much the same train
in which it was moving on Warrington's appearance.
And yet she still had but little thought of uniting
her destinies with those of Sherwood; but
continuing
to hope that something would eventually occur
to save her from the dreaded fate, she permitted the
affair to glide along as she had formerly done, solely
out of regard to the feelings of her father and the
interests of the family. And, indeed, now, more than
ever, did it seem necessary, that the family should
avoid a rupture with Sherwood, as they were
becoming
more and more dependent on his assistance.
With the breaking out of the revolution, the half
pay which Captain Hendee had before regularly
received
,
and which had constituted his main
dependence
,
ceased to be transmitted. And he was
therefore
driven to avail himself, from time to time, of the
offers of Sherwood to loan him money to meet his
exigencies. In this manner Miss Hendee wore away
about two years of her dull and joyless existence,
finding nothing in the present to console or cheer
her desponding mind, and seeing nothing but clouds
and darkness in the future; when an incident
occurred
that threw a new light upon her dark and
cheerless path, and produced a revolution in her
whole views and feelings, as sudden and complete,
as the event which caused it was singular and
unexpected
.
CHAPTER VI.
A sudden joy lights up my loneliness.
It
was a soft and balmy evening, in that loveliest
of all months of the year in our northern clime,
delightful
June, when two ladies were seen issuing
from the Hendee cottage, to wander abroad, to
enjoy
the beauties of the evening, and hold, in the
solitudes
of the fields, that confidential communion on
subjects of mutual concern, which is ever so
interesting
to friends, who have just met after a long
separation
.
One was in height something above the
ordinary standard of women, but with a form as
faultless as the chisselled marble. Her carriage and
general demeanor, though easy and graceful, were
yet not of that light and joyous kind, which
generally
bespeaks corresponding lightness of heart, but
were marked, rather, by that serious, drooping east,
that tells of secret cares and sorrows; while an air
of deep and pensive thoughtfulness rested in her
dark blue eyes, and overspread her somewhat pale,
though exquisitely moulded features. The other
female was a trifle smaller, and as volatile as a child
in her movements. The very reverse of her
companion
,
she seemed to be the creature of joyous
impulses
.
Though both possessed far more than an
ordinary share of personal beauty, yet their beauty
was of an entirely different order: for while the
appearance
of the former was calm, intellectual and
commanding, that of the latter was sprite-like and
playful, partaking largely of that certain prettiness,
that eccentric, will o' wisp sort of witchery, which
men generally pursue eagerly rather than worship
profoundly. They were both old acquaintances of
the reader, and we will, therefore, allow them to
announce
themselves by the conversation that now
ensued
between them.
`Now tell me, Alma,' said the smaller girl, `for,
in spite of all the dogged silence you have shown in
your letters on the subject, I determined I would
know the first time I saw youtell me, I say, what
was the true reason of your dismissing Warrington?'
`There are some things, Jessy,' replied the other,
`which involve such imputations on our own
prudence
and discernment, and are, of themselves, so
humiliating to our feelings, that we can hardly bring
ourselves even in thought to recur to them,much
less to reveal them to others. And this is the main
reason why I have never apprised you of the fact
you seek to know.'
`Yes, but I shall not let you off on such a reason,
you may depend upon it. Come, come, girl, I will
be your confessor, and the more crossing to your
feelings the confession, why the more it will be for
your good, if the Catholic priests are in the right of
it.'
`No, Jessy, let us forget the subject: I would not
again disturb my feelings by recalling to mind the
man who once caused me so much sorrow. It is
9
enough to say that I was grossly deceived in his
character.'
`Deceived! How deceived?now I tell you,
Alma
Hendee, I will know, and, as I am to live with
you till father returns from England, I will thorn you
night and day, till you tell me.'
`Well, then, Jessy, if you must know, the cause
of my discarding him was the best of all causes;
because he could never be lawfully mine: for,
wherever his heart may have been, his hand
belonged
to another. And while he was vowing his heart
to me, he was the husband of a living wife in
Connecticut
.
What say you to a deception like that,
Jessy?'
`Why, monster!if sobut how know you that
fact, Alma?'
`I received intimations of it from various sources,
which I disbelieved, when a man called here who
was well acquainted with Warrington's whole
career
,
and he confirmed all that I had heard.'
`Warringtonthe high-minded, and brave
Colonel
Warrington, guilty of baseness like that?
impossible
!
Are you quite sure that there is not some
mistake, or some intended deception, about this,
Alma
?'
`Yes, yes,think not that, with my unbounded
confidence in the man, I should have been brought
to believe this easily. And Oh! if you knew what
the discovery cost me!'
`But did you apprise him of this discovery?'
`No!'
`Why?'
`Simply, because, as I was fully satisfied of the
fact, all attempted explanations would not only fail
to mend the matter, but make it worse, by
continuing
a correspondence which would be ruinous to me,
and disgraceful to us both.'
`Alma Hendee, I can hardly believe this strange
story. I fear you have been deceived. I wish I
had known it before. Neither Colonel Warrington,
nor Captain Selden, have the least idea that such
were your reasons for the sudden, and, to them,
unaccountable
step you took. I have conversed with
them both on the subject; and they both believe, I
imagine, that you were either coerced by your
father
,
or were laboring under some misapprehension.
Mr. Selden, I know, believes this; and he told me
on our way here, that if you would keep yourself
from becoming entangled with Sherwood, the affair
might yet be reconciled between you and the
Colonel
,
who yet cherishes for you all his former
sentiments
.'
`It never will be reconciled, however, Jessy.'
`Why, you have not seriously determined to
marry
Sherwood, have you?'
`I can hardly bring myself, I own, to think
seriously
of such a sacrifice,' said Alma, mournfully.
`I certainly never should harbor the thought a
moment
,
if I had now any other object to live for, than
to render my infirm and embarrassed father as
happy
as possible. This I see but one way of doing.
And as my own hopes of happiness are gone, should
it not now be my duty to attend to his in the only
way I can accomplish it? At best it is but a dark
and dreary prospect that lies before me, Jessy. And
let us turn from it now to your own, which has at
least hope to brighten it.'
`Yes, hope, faith and resolution, come what will,
except such a damper as you received. By the way,
Alma, did not you think that your father was a good
deal taken with Selden for so brief an acquaintance
as his short stay with us to day afforded?'
`I did, indeed, and with great pleasure, notice it.
And well my father might be pleased with him; for
I now know no gentleman whom I'
`Take care! take care!' briskly interrupted the
vivacious Jessy. `Be cautious how far you proceed
with your praises, Miss!'
`I will be moderate rather than alarm you, then,'
replied Alma, smiling.
`Well, see that you are; or I'll be jealous as sure
as you live. Besides, I don't care a fig about
obtaining
your praises for him. But Captain Hendee's
good opinion of him is a point gained with me; for
my father, you know, has placed me, and my
destinies
,
too, for aught I know, in the Captain's hands
for the present. I wish I could get a peep at that
letter of instructions, as I suppose it was, which I
brought from my father to yours. What cautious
old things these papas are about us girls, are they
not, now?'
`Your father, then, suspects your attachment
does he?'
`Why, that is what I am myself puzzled to decide.
Selden contrived right cunningly to get introduced
to my father, soon after the old gentleman arrived at
Albany, where the Green Mountain troops, with their
officers, have been posted the past season, you know.
They have since met several times, and by the fact
of my being entrusted to Selden's care in coming
on here, I know father considers him a man of
honor
at least. But whether he has ever suspected the
truth about us, I have been wholly unable to
ascertain
.
If he has, and disapproves it, he has studied
out some sly, indirect way of breaking up the
connection
,
without recourse to open opposition, which,
I have often heard him say, made ten matches where
it broke one.'
`But did not Major Skene, after his exchange
and return, or his sisters, inform Colonel Reed of
their suspicion, most probably?'
`They would have done so, perhaps, had they
continued as jealous as at first, but since my
engagement
with Selden we have both acted in concert to
blind them, and I think they are in the dark
themselves
.'
`And how have you disposed of the Major, in the
meanwhile?'
`I laughed him out of countenancejeered and
joked him about his valor at Skenesboro' before the
officers, ridiculed him in every way I could devise,
till at last the fellow became so sore under the
torment
,
that he fairly avoided me, as if I had been a
viper, and that is the way I advise you to take with
your eternal hanger on, who, like the Major, was
never man enough to cease his attentions when he
knew they were not agreeable. But where is
Sherwood
now?'
`We don't know. He has been absent several
weeks. He told us he was going to Albany. You
heard nothing of him there, did you?'
`No! but if he was there, he would hardly show
himself in public, I think. Did you know they
strongly suspected him of being a tory?'
`I knew not that he was suspected by others. But
from his standing aloof from the contest, when our
bleeding country required the aid of every friend,
from the character of his associates, and among the
rest that despicable Darrow, and more especially from
one or two secret journeys, which I feel satisfied he
*9
has lately made into Canada, I have for sometime
known that he was any thing but an American
patriot
.'
By this time our fair friends, having wandered
down the slope towards the lake, had reached the
shore, and seated themselves on a little grassy
elevation
near the landing, where they were about to
resume their conversation, when a skiff, containing
three men, whose approach from the south had been
screened from their sight by intervening bushes,
made its appearance, and put in for the shore. The
girls instantly arose, and were hastily retiring, when
they were hailed by the leader of the party, after he
had risen in his boat, and looked intently a moment
at those on shore. On turning round, Alma at once
recognized him to be the tall woodsman, with whom
she first became acquainted as the messenger of
Warrington.
`If you'll agree not to be scart much at such a
beauty as I be, gals,' said Pete, leaping ashore and
striding up the bank, `I should like well enough to
have one of you stop running away long enough to
have me tell you what one of you wants, that is if I
havn't forgot the face that used to belong to her.'
Jones, now advancing to the spot from which the
girls, with hesitating steps, were slowly retreating,
pulled out a soiled and crumpled letter, and offered
it to Alma. But the latter, supposing it to be from
Warrington, shook her head, and declined receiving
it.
`Well, now!' said the scout, a little
disconcerted
at the unexpected refusal: `by hoky! if this an't
the first time I ever knew a body that wouldn't take
a letter that belonged to 'em! Well, I've done all
that the fellow, who asked me to bring it, could
expect
of me, I consider.'
`From whom did you receive the letter, sir?'
asked
Jessy, who easily apprehended the reasons of her
friend for declining to receive it.
`Well, now, marm,' replied Jones, scratching his
head, `that is asking a notch more than I am very
well able to answer. I partly hinted to the man to
tell me his name, but he kinder screwed round in his
talk so that he kept clear of telling me.
Howsomever
,
it was an honest looking fellow enough, that I
fell in with at Skenesboro,' where we stopped for
breakfast, this morning.'
`O, it is not from any in the army, then,' rejoined
Jessy, throwing a significant look at her companion,
intended to convey a sly joke for her over
cautiousness
.
`Any in the army?' said Jones, repeating the
words of the other, as he began to assume his old
comic twist of features, `no, unless you might call
him a kettle drummer; for now I think on't when
we first came into the house where we found him,
he was at it hammer and tongs upon an old brass
kettle, making clatter enough to crazy a small
nation
.'
`I beg your pardon, Mr. Jones,' said Alma,
courteously
,
`I was under a misapprehension in regard
to the source of this letterI will receive it now;
sir, if you please; and thank you kindly for your
trouble in bringing it,' she added, extending her
hand and taking the proffered paper.
`Are you direct from Albany, sir?' asked Miss
Reed, preparatory to some other question,
apparently
.
`We started from there about twelve last night,
and in a bit of a hurry, too,' replied the scout,
turning
and looking upon the face of his fair
interrogator
,
whom he now for the first time seemed to
recognize
.
`Why, now, if I an't beat, to find that queer
fighting bird againbeg pardon, marmI didn't
mean it for offence; for I don't calculate to be very
sarcy to folks, excepting to the Britishers. And I
kinder guess you an't very stiff for that side after all,
or you wouldn't allow yourself to be caught by the
Green Mountain Boys so easy and often.'
It was Jessy's turn to be disconcerted now, and
blushing to the very temples, she turned confusedly
away, and pretended to be looking for wild
strawberries
in the grass, while Alma, smiling to see the
discomfiture of her friend at the honest but sly hit
involved
in the remark of the woodsman, now
addressing
the latter, asked,
`Has any late intelligence of the enemy's
movements
been received at head quarters, that has
caused
you to be dispatched in this direction so hastily?'
`I rather expect there has, marm.'
`Any threatened invasion? I know there have
been fears of one, from Canada, but hearing nothing
of it lately, we had begun to believe it a false
rumour
.'
After looking Alma earnestly in the face an
instant
,
Jones motioned her to step a little further from
her companion, when in a low tone he observed to
her,
`You used to be true blueI wonder if you are
now?'
`If you mean a friend to your cause, who can be
trusted, you may count me as one.'
`I rather thought sowell, we fear there will be
hot work in this quarter in a very few days from this.
A British deserter, who was taken up over on
Winooski
River, and sent on by Captain Baker, arrived
at head quarters yesterday, and gave us the
information
that General Burgoyne with an army of ten
thousand men has already reached St. Johns on his
way through this settlement to Albany, if he can get
there. Colonel Warrington and his regiment of
Green Mountain Boys were to march this morning
to reinforce St. Clair at Ticonderoga. And
General
Schuyler's whole army, before this, are on the
move for Fort Edward, as the place where the
grand tussle is to be had, if the enemy are not
stopped
before. I, and my scouts in the boat there, are
now on our way to reconnoiter, and watch the
progress
of the Reglars as they come on. Now, this
last part of it you must keep dark about to all where
there is the least chance of its getting into the wind.
If I get along back as far as here, I will try to call,
and let you and the folks in this quarter know when
the enemy may be expected, that you may all be out
of the way before they arrive. But I must be off;
for we must row ten good miles further to-night,
before
we encamp. Good nighty, marm.'
Having given this exciting piece of information,
imparted with more seriousness and directness of
manner, than any thing of equal length he had
uttered
,
perhaps, for years, Jones turned on his heel,
bounded forward to the shore, and leaped into the
boat, which the next instant shot by the landing and
disappeared.
Knowing that the scout's secret would be as safe
with her companion as with herself, Alma
immediately
called her, and repeated the startling news she
had just received. And the solicitude and trembling
apprehensions which filled the bosom of each, as
they thought of their respective friends in connection
with the approaching danger, for awhile swallowed
up every other feeling. Even the letter, the
delivery
of which had occasioned the call of the scouts,
was forgotten, till the girls had retraced their steps
more than half the distance to the house. It being
then recalled, however, Miss Hendee seated herself
on a hillock, opened and began reading it, with an
air of listlesss curiosity, which showed how little
she expected to be interested in its contents, while
Jessy knelt before her on the grass, watching the
varying
expressions, from simple curiosity to eager
interest
,
and from that to deep emotion, which
successively
passed over the countenance of the other
as she proceeded in the perusal. The letter was
without signature, and ran thus:
Miss Hendee, I guess, will remember, how, a
year or two ago, a man came to your house and
mended the things; and how he made some
statements
about Charles Warrington, the Colonel that
now is. Now, what I said at that time has worried
my feelings a great deal most ever since. Though
I then really thought what I said was justifiable, even
if it was not quite true, as I was made to believe it
to be for your good. But I soon after found out
what I told you was not so, for I didn't know
myself
,
and only said what I was asked to say. This
was the story of it. As I was going from house to
house, working at my trade there in your part of the
settlement, I fell in with a plausible sort of a man,
I don't think I had best call him by name,and we
after a while got to talking about Warrington, whom
I had seen often enough, though I knew nothing
about his private affairs. Well, he, in a smooth kind
of way, said there was one thing that hurt his
feelings
;
and that was, that Warrington was doing the
wrong thing by a relative of his, a very likely girl,
that he pretended to be courting for the sake of
getting
her family on his side in the York quarrel, when
to his certain knowledge, he had a young wife that
he had deserted down country. He said it was a
great pity to have the girl so deceived, and he would
give two gold guineas to any one who would break
up the courtship. But he said it would do no kinder
good for her relations to try; and they were very
anxious some one else should undertake to do it.
He then told me his plan was, that he and I, if I
would agree to do it, should first kinder secretly tell
folks this story about the deserted wife, so that it
should get to her, and make her begin to believe it;
and then I should go there and pretend to come
from where Warrington used to live, and let drop
some how, before the girl, that I was knowing
myself
to that business about his being married. Well,
he kinder drew me into this plan, and I being poor,
consented for the money to do as I did. But I soon
mistrusted that this man had some wrong design,
which I found out to be the case, and I feel very
sorry, and ask pardon for what happened; and shall
feel very bad if I done any mischief by it, as I think
Colonel Warrington a very likely man. I think I
shall feel easier now in my mind, but I guess,
considering
,
I shant sign my name, though I am not
ashamed of it, or at least I never was in any other
affair since I was born.
Your well wisher to serve.
The first feeling that pervaded the bosom of Miss
Hendee, on reading this humble epistle, the truth
and genuineness of which she found it impossible
to doubt, was that of unmingled indignation at the
base and detestable conduct of the man who had
instigated the deception that had been practiced
upon
her with such complete success. The whole of
that transaction, together with all the dark hints and
warnings she had previously received from her
acquaintance
,
now stood explained before her. She
found no difficulty in tracing all to the same source,
and she saw at once the motives which had
actuated
the subtle author of this piece of refined
villany
in the course he had pursued. Her next feeling
was that of deep and unfeigned regret, for the
injustice
she had unintentionally done one, whom, but
for this erroneous belief, she would have held, of all
on earth, the most dear and honored. At last came
the heart's rich gushings of returning love. And
from the overpowering force of these mingled
emotions
,
she sat down and wept like a child.
CHAPTER VII.
And how felt he, the wretched man
Reclining therewhile memory ran
O'er many a year of guilt and strife,
Flew o'er the dark flood of his life,
Nor found one sunny resting place,
Nor brought him back one branch of grace!
In
the environs of Albany, at the period of which we
are writing, stood an ancient looking tenement,
originally
designed, as its general appearance indicated,
for a common farm house; though the grounds
around it seemed lately to have been left almost
wholly
uncultivated; while dilapidated fences, and an
unchecked
growth of rank weeds, springing up every
where about the premises, told any thing but of good
husbandry in the occupant. Indeed, there was an
air of solitude and decay about the place, which
might reasonably have been taken by all as an
evidence
of a corresponding decay in the
circumstances
of the owner, but for the fact known to many,
that he had brought large sums of money, which he
must have increased, as he had ever lived on an
economical
scale, and husbanded his treasures with the
most miserly care,ever speculating upon the
necessities
of others, and loaning his money at
exhorbitant
usury. Since the commencement of the
unsettled
times of the revolution, however, he had been
busily engaged in drawing in his funds, while he
began
to talk of pretended losses, and to feign the
appearance
of approaching poverty, by suffering his
farm to run to waste, as if through inability to
bestow
upon it a proper cultivation. This was
attributed
by many to actual impoverishment; but those
who knew more of his affairs, set it down at once to
his unwillingness to trust out his property in such
fluctuating times, and his fears of being compelled
to loan, or otherwise part with it, for maintaining the
American cause, to which, it was suspected, he was
not over friendly. He had ever been a man of few
friends, and still fewer confidants. And for the last
year or two, he had almost wholly withdrawn
himself
from society; while, as was noticed by those
who occasionally saw him, his health appeared to
be gradually undermining, and his countenance wore
an air of deep dejection, arising, it was surmised, as
10
he had no visible grounds of sorrow, from remorse
of conscience, or other mental inquietudes, the
causes
of which he had never divulged.
To this cheerless spot we would now invite the
reader for the purpose of introducing one to whom
allusion has been several times made, the father of
Jacob Sherwood. The unhappy old man had been
for several weeks rapidly failing, and he now lay
stretched on the bed of sickness, with the full
consciousness
,
that the end of his earthly career was
fast approaching; while a retrospect of his life
began
to fill his mind with terror and alarm, in view of
the retribution which his guilt-stricken conscience
told him was at hand. Although, by the constant
exercise of that peculiar cunning and cautiousness,
which were leading traits in his character, he had
always contrived to stear clear of the penalties of the
law, yet there had been certain secret passages in
his life, the memory of which now turned his dying
bed into a couch of thorns, and drove him to think
of making some atonement for the injuries he had
inflicted
before he dare go to his final account.
With this, among other views, he had, the week
previous, sent a special messenger for his son, and
he was now anxiously looking for his arrival. But
the lingering days passed on, and he came not, till
the wretched invalid, warned by his failing strength,
that he could hold out but a few days longer, dared
no more delay the act of justice, which his guilty
fears had urged him to perform, to those who had
been the victims of secret villanies. But let us
now enter his gloomy abode, and proceed to his
bed-side
.
He had been lying about an hour in a
troubled
sleep, from which he had several times suddenly
started up, with a wild, apprehensive glare, and a
few incoherent mutterings, that gradually died away
on his working lips, as he relapsed into his uneasy
slumbers. He now, however, became thoroughly
awakened, and, turning his face to the nurse in
attendance
,
a wrinkled old crone, who, with an
ignorant
,
clownish looking boy, made up the rest of the
family at the present time, he eagerly enquired if his
son had arrived. And being answered in the
negative
,
he sunk back on his pillow with a look of
blended
wo and disappointment, which told the utter
wretchedness of his feelings.
`O, when will he come! when will he come!' at
length muttered to himself the hapless old man. `I
shall die before he arrives! no, no, I must not die, I
cannot die, till I see himtill he promises. But if
he should not come! Or if he come and would
not promise, or promising, would not perform, where
would be the reparation? I fearI fear him, with
so much interest at stake! Oh! why have I
delayed
this so long! Why have I carried this dreadful
weight till now! If I had but strength to write it!
perhaps I haveI will tryI will! Nabby?' he
continued, calling to the deaf old woman, `I say,
Nabby! bring me here pen and paper.'
`Eh? O, ay!' replied the crone, bringing the
required
implements.
`Now bolster me up on the bed, and lay that old
ledger open on the bed-clothes before me. There!
that will do.'
Having been a ready penman, and deriving a
temporary
strength from the excitement of his sudden
resolution, the invalid succeeded in writing out a
brief statement, or confession, of the misdeeds which
laid heaviest on his troubled conscience.
`There! there!' he exclaimed in a sort of
unnatural
glee, `it is on paper! it is downthank God
it is down! I feel easier nowrelievedsome of
the poison has passed from my heart to the paper;'
and he read over, and continued looking some time
upon the lines, with a wild, exulting satisfaction,
muttering at intervals, `yes, thank God, it is down!'
He then, having again called the nurse, and
directed
her to seal the paper securely, superscribed it to
Captain James Hendee, giving the woman strict
orders
to give it to his son when he arrived, or to some
other person, who would promise to deliver it to the
person to whom it was addressed. After this, he
fell back exhausted, and lay some time in silent
meditation
.
`Yes, that is something,' he said, at length,
resuming
his soliloquy; `but will it bring back the lost,
or dead? No! Will it restore the property I took
from them? No, not a shilling without a suit, and
then Jake will find some way to defeat itand then
the letter may be losthe may mistrust what I have
written and destroy it. It won't doI must make
a will and place it out of his handsI must, O, I
mustand I will do itI will do it, now. Ezra!
Ezra!' he continued, speaking with nervous
rapidity
.
`Nabby! tell Ezra to come here in a minute!'
The ill-clothed, and more ill-favored, boy soon
made his appearance.
`Ezra, you go over to Esquire Vanderpools, and
tell him I want he should come here as quick as
possible
run!
run!'
The man, who was thus summoned, and who was
an attorney, whom the old gentleman had
sometimes
employed, and consulted, on account of the
prudence and secrecy with which he conducted all
matters submitted to his charge, in a short time
entered
the apartment, and quietly seated himself by
the bed-side of the sick man. The old nurse was
then ordered to leave the room.
`I am going to die, Squire,' said the old man
feebly
.
`I hope not,' replied the attorney, casting a
scrutinizing
glance at the pallid face of the other, but
without betraying the least emotion.
`I know best, and I have thoughts of making a
willcan you draw one that will hold?'
`None of my making have ever yet failed.'
`So I suppose, and I believe you honest, and to
have a mind of your own, or I should not have sent
for you. But can it all be kept secret till the will is
proved in court?'
`Who is to be executor?'
`I have been thinking of that. So much money
is a great trust, but if you are not honest, who is? I
must have you.'
`All can be managed, then.'
`Yes, but will it be done? will you promise? I
have reasonsyou know Jacobwill you not let
him buy you up?'
`Never!'
`Write me a will then; and be quick,quick
bequeathing a thousand pounds to Captain James
Hendee of the New Hampshire Grants, and all he
now owes meanother thousand to his daughter.
That will make them good for what I'
`That is right! make a clean breast of it, Mr.
Sherwood,' observed the attorney, encouragingly.
`I willGod forgive me for taking that amount
from the property left with me to manage. Put it
down in the will reparation.
`I will. But the rest of the property?'
10*
`All to my sonwrite onbe quick.'
`The attorney, with an acquiescing nod,
proceeded
diligently with his task, while the restless
invalid
again muttered to himself,
`It will be an inducement for Jake to marry the
girl, which I fear he means to avoid. But he
probably
will do it now, and then nothing will be lost by
this; and if he don't, why, he has enough without
it. Yes, this will do. I shall feel betterbetter.'
The will was very soon completed, witnesses were
called, all the requisite formalities passed through;
when, after receiving from the testator many
additional
injunctions, the attorney departed with the
important instrument in his pocket.
As soon as this business, for which the sick man
had summoned all his failing energies, was
accomplished
,
he again became as helpless as an infant,
and lay several hours in a state of exhaustion and
stupor. At length his malady began to assume a
different and more threatening aspect. The pains
of approaching dissolution set in, attended with
mental
anguish, even more fearful in appearance than
his bodily agony; and to the wretched old man a
night of horrors succeeded. While his limbs were
writhing with pain, and he seemed to be grappling
in bodily effort with the king of terrors, the most
fearful images appeared to rise continually before
his distracted mind, to complete the horrors of his
situation. At one time he seemed to be contending
with desperate fierceness against troops of fiends,
that stood palpably before him, reaching out their
long, skinless claws to drag him from his bed, while,
keep them off! Oh, keep them off, would burst
in the accents of despair from his lips. At another
time, the images of those he had injured appeared
to rise upon his troubled fancy, and stand before
him, giving, even by their quiet presence,
unspeakable
tortures to his feelings.
`Leave me, Brother Hendee, O, leave me!' he
would piteously exclaim, waving his hand for the
other, whom he fancied to be standing by his bed-side,
to depart. `Away! away! I cannot look on you.
You forgive me? what is that to me, so long as that
great burning eye is looking down so fiercely upon
me? Oh! don't smile upon me! don't, Brother
Hendee! It stingsit kills me! There! that is
rightkind. He is gone now. But what is that
coming? Oh! what is that?' he continued, starting
up with a look replete with horror and distress:
`see, how he reaches out his little hands as they
carry
him off into the woods, crying uncle, save me,
uncle, from the Indians! It is a lie! I say I am
not your uncle! You are an imp!a fiend, come to
torment
me! There! I told you soI knew itsee!
see, there! he is sending that troop of devils to drag
me down into that dreadful black gulph! Oh! God!
they have seized me! I won't! I won't go! help!
murder! Oh! help! help!' and with the expiring
efforts of his delirious energies, he rose up in his
bed, and throwing his arms wildly above him, and
uttering a fearful screech, he fell down on his face,
and the next moment was a livid corpse!
Such was the fearful end of John Sherwood, who,
with no penitence that could be acceptable in the
sight of Heaven, thus thought to conpound with his
conscience, and atone for his misdeeds by offering
up a portion of that wealth which he had made the
only idol of his worship through lifea life marked,
indeed, with many acts of specious kindness,
performed
towards those he had wronged, but always
performed on the principle we have mentioned, or
to veil the secret injuries he had inflicted, from the
eyes of his victims, and blind the public to his true
character.
On the second day after the event just dercribed,
and but a few hours before the time appointed for
the funeral ceremonies, Jacob Sherwood rode into
the yard, and without any previous intimation of his
father's death, entered the house.
`How is the old gentleman, Nabby?' he asked,
approaching and putting his mouth close to the ear
of the deaf old domestic.
`Eh? O,why, don't ye know? Han't they told
you how he is dead?'
`No! shocking!Why, when did he die?'
`Yester nightjest fore day. Desput sick, the old
gentleman was that night. And he was in a
terrible
taking to see you, Mister Jacob, fore he died.'
`What did he wish to see me for in particular, do
you know?'
`Nonot sartainly. But he was under some
consarn
of mind, I reckon. It was malagantly to hear
him take on, and see him act. O, 'twas dreadful
times with us that night: I, and Ezra sot up. I hope
the old gentleman never done any thing that was
wrong.'
`Ezra, what did he say?' asked Sherwood,
eagerly
turning to the boy, who was present.
`O, he talked drefful bad and scary bout somfing
carrying him off. I'se mortal feared, and went
behind
the door.'
`Nabbysay Nabby!' said the former, again
addressing
the old woman, `who has been here since
father was taken sick, besides the doctor?'
`Doctor! he wouldn't have no doctorhe took
his own physics.'
`Who, then, has been here?'
`Why, none but old Mrs. Chandler, to tell me
about fixing his gruel and things, except the folks
that come to lay him out, and Squire Vanderpool,
the day fore he died, and then the next morning, to
carry off the papers and chests.'
`Vanderpool! papers and chests! what can all
that mean?' said Sherwood, in an undertone, and
with an air of concern. `But, say, old woman,
what did Squire Vanderpool and father do, when
they were together?'
`Don't know nothing no way about it; cause
they sent me outmay be about some writings. La!
now, I forgot the letter,' added the woman, jumping
up and bringing the letter the deceased had
entrusted
to her charge: `there, he told me to make you
promise to give this to Captain Hendee.'
`CertainlyI promise,' said Sherwood, seizing
the letter and putting it in his pocket.
After a few more enquiries, Sherwood retired to
another room, when, taking out the letter and
carefully
breaking it open, so that it might be re-sealed,
if he saw fit to suffer it to go to its destination, he
proceeded
to read it; after which he rose, took out a
pocket pistol, drew the charge, went to the fire place,
and flashed the priming against the letter, which
he held between his thumb and finger till it was
entirely
consumed.
`Well,' said he to himself, as he replaced his
pistol
,
that piece of evidence is at rest, I think, and if
all other matters can be managed as easily, all will
be well. But it is very evident that the old man has
been making a will; and Vanderpool, who must be
executor, I imagine, by his presuming to carry off
the papers and money, is a hard customer to manage,
I confess; though it must be done by some means
or other,that is, if the old man's weakness and
silly
fears have led him to make any serious inroad on
my prospects. And who knows how far he may
have gonedevil! if he has been willing away my
property! But that he could not do. He could
only
dispose of his own, the lesser half I think it must
be. Well, that is mine, too; and I won't go
it. So, if he has been willing it away, curse me,
if I don't find a way to suppress or break the
will. Let's see,Vanderpool is rather poor. That
is lucky; for a cool hundred is something of a
tempter
.
But if that fails, then here are the deaf old
haddock of a woman and the doltish boy, ready
with their humbug stories to swear the old man
insane
at the time. Good! I'll make it traverse some
how. But the first thing is to see Vanderpool; and
I may as well do it now. No, I forgot,the time
of the funeral is at hand, and I must be rigging up,
and putting on a sorrowful facesorrowful! as if it
was a matter of special grief to come into
possession
of a clear ten thousand!'
Thus soliloquizing, and settling his plans for
repairing
the rent which he feared his father had made
in his fortunes, the heartless heir dressed himself,
and joined the domestics and others, who had now
come in to assist in making arrangements for the
approaching
obliquies. These being made, and the
hour appointed for the funeral, now arriving, the
ceremonies
were performed by a small train of the
nearest neighbors, including his executor, and one
or two other individuals from the city, who had
sustained
some connection with the deceased in
business
transactions. Though the demeanour of all
present was marked with the decency and sobriety
natural on the occasion, yet none of that emotion,
which the ties of heartfelt friendship, severed by
death, usually produces at such times, was visible
among the company. Not a sigh was heard, not a
tear was seen to bedew a single cheek, as they
followed
the old man, who had never exhibited any
feelings in common with them, unwept and
unhonored
,
to his long home.
That evening, and as early as he thought decency
would permit, after his father's remains were
consigned
to the earth, Sherwood repaired to
Vanderpool's
office. And, after what he deemed would be
considered some suitable observations upon his
recent
bereavement, he carelessly remarked,
`My father made a will in his last sickness, I
understand
.'
`Well, the old gentleman undoubtedly had
property
to dispose of, I think,' replied the attorney,
evasively
.
`You drew it, I am told,' observed the other,
cautiously
approaching the point at which he was
aiming
.
`Drafting instruments of that kind is part of my
trade, you are aware,' remarked Vanderpool, still
evading any direct answer to the question implied by
the other's observation.
`You will not deem it improper, I presume,' said
Sherwood, `for me to enquire what are the
provisions
of the instrument, since I am the person most
interested?'
`Why, sir,' coolly remarked Vanderpool, `whether
you are the
most
interested, I should think must
depend
entirely upon the will, whose provisions you
seek to know. And as regards the propriety of your
making enquiries respecting those provisions, I am
not aware of any impropriety in your asking, but
whether, in the case you assume, it would be proper
for me to answer, for the present, would depend
solely on the conditions imposed on me, and the
instructions
I have received.'
`O, certainly, certainly, Mr. Vanderpool,'
rejoined
the other obsequiously, though he was evidently
not a little startled at the ominous import of some of
the attorney's remarks; `but what possible motive
could my father have for enjoining secrecy in such a
case?'
`Why, that, Mr. Sherwood, is undoubtedly a
question that the interrogator is no less competent of
answering than the interrogatee,' replied the
impurturbable
attorney.
`Why, surely, Mr. Vanderpool,' said the baffled
heir in a tone of expostulation. `You do not think
I wish you to do any thing wrong, I trust. But if
the will be a just one, there can be no good reason
for keeping its provisions a secret the short time
that intervenes before it must be openly proved; and
on the other hand if it be an unjust one, a delay can
be of no benefit to the legatees of a will which can
be so easily broken.'
`Broken! how?'
`Why, I suppose you must be aware, sir, that my
father was not in his right mind when he executed
this pretended will, as can be proved by the family.'
Being a little nettled at the imputation involved
in the last remark, that he had assisted in the
making
of a will when he knew the testator to be
incompetent
,
the conscientious attorney with
considerable
spirit replied,
`Whose testimony, think you, sir, would weigh
the most in such case, two good, honest, intelligent
witnesses, (to say nothing of myself,) who were
present
and heard the testator converse, or a stupid old
woman, so deaf as not to hear one word in ten of an
ordinary conversation, and a more stupid boy, who
was rarely in his presence?'
`O, I am no lawyer, sir,' rejoined Sherwood, with
affected complaisance: `that must be left to
gentlemen
of your profession to decide. I merely
repeated
what was told me. And the only motive I have
in making these enquiries is, to obtain such
knowledge
of the will as shall enable me to make my
arrangements
for the future; since I am compelled to
return immediately to my post in the Grants. And
now,' he continued, cautiously veering round on
another track, `I really don't see how I can go
without
knowing something about the disposition of this
property. It is a going to be such a disadvantage
to me! Why, I would not begrudge a hundred
pounds. Indeed, in my peculiar situation at this
time, it might make more than that difference in my
circumstances'
`Ah! indeed?' observed Vanderpool, beginning
to suspect the drift of the other, but wishing to see
how far he would venture to go, if encouraged a
little
.
`Yes, that is really the case, Squire,' said
Sherwood
,
thinking he had now hit upon a right course;
`and if there are some nice rules among your
profession
to prevent your showing this will yourself in
obedience to such very singular instructions, why,
that can easily be got along with. The will can be
left, for instance, on yonder shelf, or somewhere, so
that should I come in to-morrow to write a letter, or
11
the like, it might be glanced at, and still no blame
could fall on youeven if the instrument should be
afterwards missing. All would come right between
you and I, Squire, depend upon it. Now, I should
suppose, that one live client, with my means, and
with my friendship, would be worth a dozen dead
ones, shouldn't you, Squire?'
`Why, that might depend,' gravely replied the
attorney
,
willing to alarm the other by way of
punishing
him for his insulting proposals, `that would
depend
,
I should think, somewhat on the question
whether the live client had means enough left him
by the dead one to make good his promises.'
`What mean you, sir?' hastily asked Sherwood,
turning pale at the intimation.
`O, I am merely making suppositions by way of
answering your enquiriesyou must put your own
constructions upon them,' replied Vanderpool, with
a look so equivocal as still to leave the would be
tempter in doubt how to proceed.
`Well, sir,' said Sherwood, after a hesitating
pause, `what am I to understand you are willing to
do in this business? Really a hard case for me,
Squirewhat do you say upon the whole?'
`Upon the whole, then,' replied the indignant
attorney
,
looking the other sternly in the face, `I say,
sir, that it does not follow, that I am a villain and
unworthy the trust reposed on me, because others
may think they can make me so. I am sole
executor
on your father's estate, the real estate;which is
but a small portion of the property, you can take
possession of as soon as you please, as to the rest, I
shall take, and keep charge of it for the present. I
know my duty, both towards you, and others
concerned
,
and you may depend I shall do it. My
supper
waits. Good evening, sir.'
So saying, and taking his hat, the independent and
incorruptible attorney turned his back on the other,
and immediately left the office.
Vexed and discomfited at the failure of his
attempt
,
and alarmed at the startling intimations which
had fallen from Vanderpool, Sherwood turned his
steps homeward. Reasoning from his own
principles
and feelings, he supposed that the attorney would
never have withstood the different temptations which
had thus been placed before him, unless he knew
that the property was about to pass into the hands
of others, whom it was now more his interest to
serve. And joining this argument, unanswerable to
one who could scarcely conceive of actions not
prompted by interested and selfish motives, with the
contemptuous bearing of the attorney, and the
intimations
he had dropped, the partially deceived,
though justly punished heir arrived at the
maddening
conclusion, that his father must have
bequeathed
the greatest portion of his property to others;
and in all probability to the Hendee family, to whom,
besides being his only near relatives now left, his
penitent and remorseful feelings would naturally
direct
his mind. And in addition to this, he was not
without strong apprehensions, that his father had
imparted to Vanderpool the secret which was
contained
in the letter directed to Captain Hendee, and
which, in case the son of the latter was alive, would
greatly multiply the chances of losing the other part
of the property, also. And no sooner had he
become
confirmed in these conclusions, than he made
up his mind in regard to the only alternative which
he believed was now left him for securing the
property
.
Accordingly, after making a few brief
arrangements
with a neighbor for managing the farm,
he started that very night, and proceeded with all
possible expedition to the New Hampshire Grants,
where we will endeavor to meet him in another
chapter
.
CHAPTER VIII.
Oh! what a tangled web we weave,
When first we practice to deceeive.
After
a rapid journey by land, Sherwood arrived
at his house in the Grants, inauspiciously for his
present object, on the very evening on which his
base and execrable manuvres to cause the
dismissal
of Warrington had been discovered by Miss
Hendee
,
in the manner we have described. And
deeply
intent on carrying into execution his project of a
union with her, whom he supposed to be still the
dupe of his machinations, believing this now to be
his only resource for securing the property, and
being
determined to accomplish it, if possible, before
the provisions of his father's will should be made
known, to lessen his chances of success, he, early
the next morning, repaired to her residence, for the
purpose of urging an immediate fulfilment of the
engagement, which he now chose to claim as having
for several years existed between them. And from
the well known wishes of the father, on whom he
counted for a strong ally, and the late acquiescent
manner of the daughter, he had the fuilest
confidence
that he should be able to bring about his
object
with very little difficulty or delay. When he
arrived, however, he soon saw indications which
considerably
lowered the tone of his assurance. In the
first place, he was not at all pleased to find, as he
unexpectedly did, that Miss Reed had taken up her
residence in the family, believing that she, from the
connection which he suspected she sustained with
Selden, the friend of Warrington, would naturally
exercise her influence against one of whom she had
doubtless received unfavorable impressions. And
in addition to this, his quick eye detected a change
in the manner of Alma herself towards him, which
he fancied had reference to the subject of his
present
anxiety. And even in the demeanor of the
father
,
he thought he perceived a want of cordiality,
which never before marked his receptions. But
notwithstanding
all these discouraging appearances, he
determined on persevering in his original purpose.
And, carefully abstaining from all mention of his
father's
death, he early sought a private interview with
Miss Hendee, who, with a sort of business-like
promptitude, and with the air of one who is fully
prepared for an eclaircissement, immediately
assented
to his propasal.
`Mr. Sherwood has something particular to offer,
I conclude?' enquiringly said Alma, with a most
freezing dignity of manner, as soon as they were
seated in a room by themselves.
`Why, you know, Alma, my attentions to you
have ever been particular,' replied Sherwood, with
what he intended for an endearing smile.
`Enough so, certainly,' was the equivocal response.
`Well, I am happy,' rejoined the other, purposely
11*
construing the remark in his own favor, `that you
acquit me of any neglect in my attentions to one
who is so worthy of them, and one in whom I have
ever felt so deep an interest.'
`You have manifested but little lack of interest in
me, or my concerns, I am free to acknowledge, sir,'
remarked Alma, in the same equivocal manner.
`I hope I am not doubted in this respect,' said
Sherwood, with the air of an arraigned school boy,
attempting to put an immaterial issue, in order to
escape, or delay, a blow, which he sees the disposer
of his fate is preparing to give him.
`O, not in the least, sir,' replied Alma, in a tone
and manner still more ironical and significant than
before; `for I have lately received a sufficient proof
of the interest you have taken in my affairs, in the
confessions of a certain tinker, whom you may
recollect
having consulted on the subject, on a former
occasion
?'
`Whynowreally!' stammered Sherwood,
utterly
disconcerted at this cutting allusion to a
transaction
which he supposed was known only to
himself
and the immediate actor in the affair: `really,
Miss Hendee, I have not the happiness of
understanding
your meaning.'
`Would further disclosures be likely to increase
your happiness in that respect, sir asked Alma,
coolly.
`I did not seek this interview. Miss Hendee,'
rejoined
the other, now recovering his assurance, `to
listen to a recital of all the slanders that may have
happened to reach your ears; but I sought it on
more important business.'
`I will hear your propositions, sir,' said she,
without
deigning any further reply.
`Why, surely, Alma,' observed Sherwood, in an
expostulating tone, `I know not how I have had the
misfortune to offend you, as from your manner, I fear
I have. I had fondly anticipated a different
reception
.
I had at last arranged my business, so that I
felt myself, for the first time since our intimacy, at
liberty ro settle down in life; and, accordingly, I
came to propose a consummation of the engagement,
which has been so long settled between us.'
`I wonder, sir,' said Alma, `you had not first
made known your intentions to my father, with whom
the engagement you claim to exist, was made, I
believe
.
Perhaps you might meet with better success
in that quarter.'
`You seem disposed to trifle with my feelings,
Miss Hendee,' rejoined Sherwood, growing restless.
`I wish for a direct answer, whether you will, or will
not, fulfil your engagement with me.'
`A direct answer, Sir, then you shall have; and
I will add, I feel not a little grateful for being, for
the first time since my acquaintance with you,
allowed
the opportunity of giving one. Mr.
Sherwood
,
I shall never voluntarily unite my destinies
with yours.'
`Surely, you would not break a solemn
engagement
?'
`A passive acquiescencea tacit consent, wrung
from me by the force of circumstances, is, as you
well know, sir, all the engagement that you can
claim of me. And even that, your conscience must
tell you, you have long since forfeited by your own
conduct.'
`Are you prepared, Miss, for the consequences
which may follow the step you seem determined on
taking?'
`You do well, sir, I acknowledge, to remind me
of that consideration,' bitterly retorted the indignant
maiden; `for I am aware that it is no light matter
to brave the revenge of one who could instigate the
assassination of a supposed rival.'
Sherwood started as if stung by an adder, at the
damning truth of the allusion. His face became
fairly livid with suppressed rage and chagrin, and
biting his bloodless lips, he rose and slunk out of the
apartment, as would a demon from the presence of
some pure being from the skies, without uttering one
word in his own defence, or even lifting his eyes to
the withering countenance, which was bent upon
him, with a look of mingled pity, abhorrence and
contempt. Leaving the house, the discomfited
villain
immediately sought Captain Hendee in an
adjoining
field, for the purpose of instigating the old
gentleman to measures of compulsion, upon the
refractory
daughter, in furtherance of his designs. But
here, also, he was unexpectedly doomed to
disappointment
and defeat. Upon Alma's return to the
house, after the receipt of the communication
exposing
the baseness of Sherwood, she had sought an
interview
with her father, read him the letter, frankly
confessed her own feelings, and disclosed all she
knew, not only of the course and conduct of
Sherwood
,
but that also of Warrington, for a part of
which she was indebted to her fair companion, who
in turn received it from her lover, Selden, the
intimate
of Warrington. And among the rest, she had
made known to the astonished father the
magnanimous
conduct of the latter in regard to his
ownership
of the land on which they resided, the
circumstances
of which she herself had never been
apprised
of till that very evening. And although the old
gentleman had listened to her disclosures without
uttering
a single word in reply, from which she could
learn his opinions on the subject, her
communications
,
nevertheless, had produced a deep impression
on his mind and feelings, that were now fluctuating
back and forth, like contending currents of wind,
when but a slight impulse is required to turn them
back in fury in a direction exactly the reverse from
that in which they commenced blowing.
`I little expected, Captain Hendee,' said
Sherwood
,
with the air of an injured man, as he
approached
the other, `I little expected, sir, when, I
arrived here, to have met with the reception which
I have just received from your daughter.'
`Why, what's the matter, sir,what's the
matter
?'
replied the Captain, with an air of
indifference
.
`The matter, sir? why, your daughter refuses to
fulfil her engagement to me, sir.'
`Ah! what reasons did she give for that, sir?'
`No good reasons, sir. She has been listening to
the tales of slandererssome enemy has been
prejudicing
her mind against me, by falsehoodsutter
falsehoods, sir!'
`Or has she not heard, rather, more truth about
your manuvres than you intended should have
reached
her ears? Come, now, be honest, Jake, and tell
me.'
`Are you, too, in the league against me?am I
to understand that you, too, justify her in this course,
sir?' hastily demanded Sherwood, nettled at the cool,
indifferent manner of the other, as much as at the
blunt severity involved in his question. `I had
little
expected this from you, sir! I should have
supposed
the interest of your family would prompt you
to a different course.'
`Hinging on my obligations, are you, sir?' said
the Captain, turning fiercely on the other, with eyes
flashing indignation. `Look ye, Jake Sherwood, I
have, from the very first, used all reasonable
exertions
with my daughter, to reconcile her to this
match. And even more, I have done that, which,
when I have looked upon her fading face, and knew
that she was martyring her own heart to please me,
has smitten my conscience for years. And now I
am resolved to leave her to make her decisions,
unbiased
by word of mine. And as to your threats,
sir, all I have to say is, go, and do your worst! Take
all there is here to yourself, if that will satisfy you;
or go join the enemies of your country, as I have
long suspected you intended,and bring them down
upon
us to murder and destroy, if you choose. But don't
think to buy and bribe me to sell my own flesh and
blood! And don't come here again, sir, with
accusations
against us, till you can come with cleaner
hands. Good morning, sir!'
So saying, the indignant old man
unceremoniously
turned his back on his abashed and astonished guest,
and hastily hobbled off to his work; while the
latter
,
after standing mute and motionless on the spot
several minutes, and leering on the receding form
of the other, with the concentrated malice of a fiend
in his looks, slowly turned away, muttering between
his clenched teeth, `Revenge! revenge! I wonder
if they will cheat me out of that too?'
Feeling no desire of returning to the house, or
again encountering any of its inmates, Sherwood
now struck across the fields, and directed his course
towards Snake Mountain, at the particular spot
which we have before described as the encampment
of the Green Mountain Boys; but which was now
occupied by another, and a far different company.
To this place we will now take the reader,
preceding
the baffled intriguer a short time, to take a glance
at the party there assembled.
Sherwood had secretly been in the interests of the
Royalists for nearly two years previous to this period
of our story; and more than a year before he had
received a captain's commission, with directions to
raise a company in the New Hampshire Grants, in
which, he had represented to the British officers,
with whom he privately kept up a communication,
were to be found many faithful adherents of the
Crown. And Darrow, through Sherwood's influence,
had also been commissioned as Lieutenant of the
contemplated company. But with all that this pair
of military worthies were able to effect, they never
had found more than about a half dozen men in this
settlement, to whom they dared to propose an
enlistment
into the king's sorvice. These, with about an
equal number picked up within the borders of New
York, they had at length enrolled, and organized
into
a fragment of a company, which, for the first
time, had been called out a few days previous to this
time, with the view of cooperating with the invading
army of Burgoyne. About a dozen in all, they were
now encamped, on the ground, formerly taken, as
before mentioned, by Warrington and his
companions
,
and were waiting in concealment, the approach
of the British hordes, that were now pouring down
upon the devoted settlement from the north.
At the time we would introduce this group to the
reader, Darrow had just arrived from the British
camp, whither he had been dispatched by Sherwood,
when the latter was on the point of setting out on
his recent visit to Albany. And having taken some
refreshment, the lieutenant was now sitting on a
rough bench, near the entrance of their shantee,
enjoying
a little repose after the fatigues of his morning's
march. He had fallen into a doze, and appeared to
be lost to all external objects; while the men
within
,
mostly morose, sullen looking fellows, were some
of them playing cards, some telling stories, and
others
talking over the plans they had formed to
revenge
themselves upon certain families in the
settlement
,
against whom they entertained private
grudges
,
as soon as they should be let loose upon the
inhabitants
,
at present wholly unprotected by any
military
force within their borders, and but little aware
of the dangers that awaited them.
At this moment, Sherwood, having passed the
line of sentries, posted at intervals round the
encampment
,
more to guard against being seen and
reported by the inhabitants, than any expected
attack
,
approached his sleeping subaltern, and tapped
him lightly on the shoulder. But the latter not
awaking, the other grasped his coat collar, and gave
him a rough, impatient shake, at which the sleeper,
suddenly starting, leaped on his feet, and dashing
away the grasping hand of his superior, fiercely
exclaimed
,
`I'll be dned, if you shall! You have come
before your time, be off! be off, I say! Oh! Ah!'
he continued, rubbing his eyes, and beginning to
distinguish between the reality, and the image that
appeared to have been haunting his dreaming fancy:
`Why, Captain, it is only you after all, is it? Well,
well, now!'
`Why, who did you suppose it was, Darrow, I
should like to know?'
`O, no matter, now,I was in the middle of a
cursed dream, and thought a different character had
waited on me to do a little business in his line
though not so very different, perhaps. But let the
humbug gowhat is the news?'
`Every thing that is bad,' replied Sherwood,
morosely
.
`The very devil himself, I would not have
believed, could baffle me so much in my plans, as I
have been, since I saw you.'
`Why, what now, Captain? you seem rather out
of humorwhat has happened?'
`In the first place the old man is dead. He died
the day before I arrived.'
`Well, what of that? He did not carry off his
money with him, did he?'
`No, but he got penitent before he went off, and
wrote out a confession of that old affair, in a letter
to Hendee.'
`And you let it reach him, hey?'
`Not so big a fool as you think. I gave it to the
flames, before it was read by any one but myself, I
think.'
`Very well, where are your great troubles, then?'
`Whywhy'replied Sherwood, hesitating to
inform the other, as he was about to do, the
particulars
about the will, and the extent of his fears
respecting
the disposition of the property, lest the
minion might consider it for his interest to betray
him to the Hendees: `why, I did not think to name
it,' continued the artful dissembler, deciding the
question he had been debating in his mind in the
negative, `but, upon the whole, as you already know
so much about the affair, I think I will:well,
getting
12
home last night, I thought I would go down to
Hendee's this morning; so I went, and soon found
the devil to pay. That sneaking tinker had been there,
and confessed all, and the girl fairly spurned me
from her presence; while her fathercurse the old
dotard! he, though owing me for half his living for
years, had the audacity to insult meyes, insult me,
Bill. But'and he nodded significantly.
`But what?'
`I can help myself, Darrow.'
`Well, I would do it, Jake, without any more
puttering
with the proud minx.'
`I will. My plans are fixed. When did you
return
from head quarters?'
`Not two hours agoI left them early this
morning
.'
`What is the news?'
`The whole army have moved on to the mouth of
the Bouquet, where they are now encamped. A
large body of Indians joined them yesterday, and
General Burgoyne distributed presents among them,
made a speech to fix them for fight, and wound off
by giving them a grand war-feast. Hell and
thunder
!
what whooping and yelling there was there
last night! one would have thought that all Tophet
had been emptied upon the earth, and that the world
was alive with devils!'
`Good! just the instruments for our purpose in
punishing the doubly damned rebels of this
settlement
.
But did not the General send me any
directions
?'
`Yes,' replied Darrow, taking a letter from his
pocket, `he sent you this, and also,' he continued,
stepping within the shantee and bringing out a thick
package of papers, `and also this bundle of
proclamations
,
to be immediately distributed over the
settlement
.'
`Well, let us first see what the General has
written
me,' said Sherwood breaking the superb seal,
and reading the contents of the letter, a very fair
specimen of the official fustian of its doughty author,
who, it may be recollected, was a fop in literature as
well as a braggart in arms. The communication ran
thus:
J.
Sherwood, Esq.
, Captain of His Majesty's
Loyal
Americans in the New Hampshire Grants,
It is one of the felicities of soldiership, and of the
gratifications of a commander, to award the meed of
approbation to fidelity in a common cause, and
fealty
to a common sovereign. This meed, Sir, I deem
it no flattery to say is yours, speaking, as I do,
from personal acquaintance, and on the voucher of
Colonel Beverly Robinson, a Loyal American officer,
of worth, and zeal, and activity.
The army under my command will now in a day
or two move southwardly, mainly by water, but
partly
by land on either side of the lake. To you, Sir,
and the brave and loyal men whom you have, and
may yet further induce to act with you, we look for
a hearty co-operation in all that can be effected on
the eastern shore, and, by the blessing of God, I will
effect much, while we proceed to the investiture, and
consequent capture of Crown Point, Ticonderoga,
and all other opposing obstacles, on our victorious
march to Albany. I send you by the bearer,
Lieutenant
William Darrow, a package of proclamations,
issued by me, and signed by the same, and
countersigned
by Robert Kingston, Esquire, Secretary.
They are addresses to the deluded and suffering
people
of your settlement. I anticipate great and
universal
effect from this appeal, made irresistable, as
it is, by offers of Royal mercy to the penitent,
arguments
of ineffable potency to the deceived by rebel
sophistry and falsehood, and by the palpable
shadowing
forth of the sword of justice, in the contingent
action of our red allies, to the perverse and stubborn.
You will cause one of these, my proclamations, to be
immediately left at every cottage and hamlet, if
possible
,
in the settlementto the protestations of which
proclamation, together with such pecuniary
inducements
as you may deem it expedient to offer towards
redeeming the land from the disgrace and ruinous
anarchy of an unnatural rebellion, and restoring a
government of laws, of honor, of legitimate and
happy sovereignty, you will add your own
attestations
.
With sentiments, believe me,
my very dear sir, of esteem,
J.
Burgoyne
.
`There! what think you of that, Bill?'
exultingly
exclaimed Sherwood, as he concluded the
perusal
of the precious document. `Is not that a
handsome
thing for a man, who stands so high at the
British court, to say to, and of us?'
`Why, yes, Captain, what he means is well
enough, I spose; but if a British General had not
writ it, I should have called some of it nothing but
damn flumididdle.'
`O, it is a feather in our caps, Darrow, depend
on't. Burgoyne is hand and glove with the king
and ministers, besides being a noted warrior. He
will conquer all the northern colonies. The
rebellion
,
indeed, is as good as crushed already. And
then the country will be divided off into lordships,
and those, who have been most active in subduing
the rebels, will all receive rich rewards out of their
confiscated estates. Bright days are before us, Bill.
And while we are thus making our fortunes, what a
glorious chance to pay off old scores upon these
rascally
settlers? You can safely act out nature now,
Bill, with a vengeance. We will now have our
revenge
,
and the beauty of it is, that others must
father
our deeds and pay us well into the bargain for
what it is only a happiness to perform.'
`What are your plans, Captain?'
`You, or I, must go, this very night, over to the
British camp, and get Burgoyne to let us have fifty
red skins to make up our company. We shall want
them soon, and perhaps I may for the first purpose.'
`Damn it, Jake, you are
too
thirsty,' said the
minion
,
looking keenly at the other, and comprehending
the purpose of which he spoke: `they are your own
flesh and blood. You don't mean to let those red
devils loose upon them, do you?'
`No, but leave me to take care of them. They
need not be harmed, but prisoners they shall be, till
that haughty jade's pride is brought to begging terms.
And this is the first case, Darrow, to be attended to.'
`I am not quite sure but there is another case for
you to attend to, also, Jake.'
`What is that?' asked Sherwood, turning to the
other with a look of blended curiosity and
apprehension
.
`Why, perhaps it is all nothing but a notion,
after
all. But I will tell you the wrinkle that's got
into my head, and how it got there: In coming from
head quarters to day, I ran my canoe generally close
in to the shore of the other side of the lake, and, on
12*
arriving within about a mile of Crown Point, and
about as far as I intended, before crossing over to
this side, I took it into my head I would go up into
the woods, climb a tree, and try to get a peep into
the fort, as the General asked me very particularly
about the number of the garrison there. Well, I
went on a piece into the woods, when I heard the
steps of some one crossing my course ahead, and
taking his way to the fort; so I squatted down in an
old tree top, where I could remain unseen till he
passed by. His course brought him within a few
rods of the spot where I lay; and when nearly
abreast of me, he mounted an old log, and, without
discovering me, took a sort of leisurly survey of the
woods around him, turning his face so as to give me
a fair view of his countenanceand'
`Well, what more about itwho, and what was
he?'
`Why, though not in full uniform, I think he must
be a young rebel officer, who had been out with his
gun for game. Though he must have arrived at the
fort quite lately.'
`But who do you mistrust him to be?' asked
Sherwood
,
with evident uneasiness.
`That is the question that has been bothering my
brains ever since. Jake, don't you think it possible
for a man to wear about the same face and look that
he did when a boy, so that one, who had never seen
him from four or five years old, would know him
again when grown up?'
`Yes, barely possible, but what the devil are you
coming to, Bill? What has that to do with this case?'
demanded Sherwood, with an agitation which he
was unable to conceal.
`May be a good deal. There was something in
this fellow's looks that struck me,that made me
ready to swear I had seen the same countenance
before, though some how, not just the same
neither
.
Well, he finally went on, and I forgetting all
about spying into the fort, went back, and struck off
for this side, this fellow's countenance all the while
haunting me, and working up a devilish strange,
streaked, kind of feeling, that I can't very well
describe
.
Well, as I was crossing over, still bothering
on the subject, I happened to cast my eyes up the
lake, when I caught a glimpse of old Hendee's
house through the trees; and by heavens! it came
across my mind, like a flash of lightning, who the
fellow must be.'
`What mean you, Darrow?' exclaimed
Sherwood
,
seizing the arm of the other with a
convulsive
grasp, while his face became as pale as ashes.
`I mean,' replied Darrow, looking his agitated
companion full in the face, and speaking in a low,
measured, and decisive tone, `I mean, Jake
Sherwood
,
that if Captain Hendee's boy lived, he is now
among us!'
Long and earnestly communed these worthies in
conjectures, about the person concerning whom
Darrow
had made, as he felt confident he had, so
startling
a discovery. Who could he be? By what
name now known? Could he be aware of his own
family history? Had he discovered his relations?
were questions which were raised by them, but
without
finding any satisfactory answers. The two last
questions, however, were at length settled in the
negative. And after some further discussion, in
regard
to the best means of ascertaining more about
the private history of the unconscious object of their
deliberations, and the most feasible way of
disposing
of him, if the information gained rendered it
probable he was the person they feared him to be,
they broke up their conference, Darrow retiring to
rest, and Sherwood, with two of his men, as
attendants
and oarsmen, setting off for head quarters,
fifteen
or twenty miles distant from the tory
encampment
.
CHAPTER IX.
Sounds from the waters, sounds upon the earth,
Sounds in the air, of battle! Yet with these
A voice is mingling, whose deep tones give birth
To faith and courage!
The
storm of war which had been gathering for
some weeks in the north almost unnoticed by the
Americans, now began to roll down upon their
frontier
settlements with a rapidity as alarming as it was
unexpected. Although the leaders of the
continental
army were aware of the landing of a large
British
force at Quebec, in the month of May, from
which an invasion was expected, either by way of
Oswego, as had previously been given out, or through
the valley of lake Champlain; yet, counting on the
same dilatory action, by which all the movements of
the enemy had been characterized ever since the
battle of Bunker Hill, they supposed it might be late
in the summer before the hostile army, should they
take the eastern route, would reach the military posts
on Champlain. But whatever might have been the
errors of other British commanders in the respect
just named, none of that kind certainly could be
chargeable on General Burgoyne. The navigable
waters of the north had scarcely burst their wintery
fetters before he landed at Montreal. And in
another
week he was pouring the disciplined bands of his
proud and numersous army along the western shores
of lake Champlain. The American Generals were,
in a great measure, taken by surprise by this rapid
advance of the enemy, and having delayed to
strengthen their defences, they were but illy
prepared
to meet the first shock of so powerful a force.
And if those, whose duty it was to make themselves
early acquainted with the enemy's movements had
thus been kept in the dark respecting the important
one in question, still less, as may well be supposed,
were the inhabitants of the country apprised of the
time and extent of the coming invasion. The
settlers
of the New Hampshire Grants, who were
directly
in the route of the enemy, were consequently
almost wholly ignorant of the dangers that awaited
them, till the storm was nearly ready to burst on
their defenceless heads. And their surprise,
therefore
,
was only equalled by their dismay, when the
American scouts, who had been dispatched to gain
intelligence of the reported invasion, returned and
spread the startling news, that a British army of ten
thousand regulars, with several thousand savage foes,
was within a few miles of their borders, ready to
spread death and devastation over their whole
settlement
.
This information, which many still hoped
might be false, or greatly exaggerated, was fully
confirmed
the next morning after it was received by the
scouts, by Burgoyne's proclamations, which, through
the activity of Sherwood's band of tories, had been
left during the night at the door of every house thro'
all the northern section of the country. This
pompous
and gasconading document, however, with all
its promises and threats, had, notwithstanding its
author's
anticipations, no other effect on the
inhabitants
than to bring them to the determination of
driving off their stock so far into the interior as to
be out of the reach of the enemy, and of
commencing
active preparations for fleeing themselves
befor
the invading army.
With these general observations on the situation
of affairs at this particular junction, we will now
return
to the Hendee family, to follow their fortunes
through the fearful trials which were now shortly
to await them.
It was not till night, after the signal failure of
Sherwood at the cottage, that Miss Hendee had an
opportunity of ascertaining what had passed between
that personage and her father in their recent
interview
.
That evening Captain Hendee, on his return
from the labors of the day, entered the room where
Alma happened at the moment to be sitting alone,
and silently took a seat at the open window. A
frown was upon his brow. The uneasiness, which
a man of high spirit might be expected to feel from
a sense of obligations to one he secretly despises,
combined, in the present instance, with the mean
advantage taken of such obligations by Sherwood,
had, all the afternoon, been operating upon the old
gentleman's irritable temperament; and he was now
evidently in no very pleasant frame of mind. At
the first glance his daughter detected in his
countenance
the unfailing indications of a storm: but
on whom it was to burst, she was unable to
determine
.
From the circumstances attending the
interview
between Sherwood and her father, she felt
satisfied
,
that she, herself, had been the subject of their
discourse; and although extremely anxious to know
the result of that conference, yet she almost feared
the knowledge she wished to obtain. And with
trembling solicitude, therefore, she awaited in silence
the announcement, which she saw from her father's
mood, would not long be withheld. After sitting
some minutes puffing away rapidly at his pipe, and
knitting his brows, with an angry flashing expression
of countenance, he suddenly drew the implement
from his mouth, and, by way of knocking out the
ashes, gave it so spiteful a rap on the window sill as
to shiver it to pieces in his hand. Hastily dashing
the broken fragments out of the window, he turned
abruptly to his daughter, and said,
`Alma, what did Jake Sherwood say to you
today
?'
`Why, many things, father,would you wish me
to repeat all he said?'
`Yes. I don't hold to prying into such matters,
for a general rule, but I have particular reasons for
wishing to know now.'
Still feeling uncertain on whom the resentment of
her father was about to fall, Alma, with some
agitation
,
proceeded to detail the conversation in
question
,
giving the words used by Sherwood, and the
substance of her own replies.
Threats to you, too, hey?' said the Captain,
after listening attentively to his daughter's relation
of the affair. `Why did'nt you drive the pitiful
puppy from the house with your broomstick?'
`You astonish me, father!' replied Alma, looking
up into the face of the other with an expression of
joyful surprise.
The old gentleman made no reply, but again
relapsing
into moody silence, sat some time without
uttering a word. At length he brought his foot to
the floor with an angry, decisive stampand while
the tears, which were brought to his eyes by his
keenly conflicting emotions, were glimmering on the
quickly moving lashes, he again turned suddenly to
his expecting daughter and asked,
`Alma, are you willing to become a slave?'
`For my own, and your support, I could
cheerfully
become one, dear father. But a slave to a
villain I can never be.'
`Nobly said! spoken with the spirit of a Hendee!
would to God I was more worthy of such a
daughter
!'
exclaimed the passionate old man, choking with
emotion `come here, Alma, I have been wrong,
and you have been right,come, come to me, my
child, forgive, and kiss me.'
In another instant the father and daughter were
locked in each other's arms, intermingling their tears,
and giving themselves up to the gush of feelings
which was overflowing their hearts at this return of
mutual love and confidence to their long estranged
and distrusting bosoms.
`I did not make any reply to you, Alma, when
you laid open to me the conduct of that base and
intriguing villain,' at length, observed the Captain,
releasing his daughter from his embrace, and
regaining
his composure, though the other continued
weeping. `But it was not because I doubted the
truth of what you told me, or because I had it in my
heart to try to restrain you any further. It was
because
I felt self-condemned, guiltyguilty for what
I had already done in making war upon the
happiness
,
and I know not but upon the health, of my
own, and only child. O, don't weep sodon't, my
dear daughter! Thank God, we have both now cut
the ties by which we were held in bondage, and are
free. The Sherwood's may have all; and we won't
trouble them neither to drive us off: we will leave
this place, Alma, for the southern part of the
settlement
.
As old and infirm as I am, I can still work.
Our faithful Neshobee will also stick by us, and
work as much as an Indian will ever work, for you
know the Indians are a lazy race, and we must make
allowance for him. But at all events, as poorly
as we may fare, our poverty will be happiness
compared
to the slavery that Jake Sherwood would
now impose on us if we remained. Yes, Alma, we
will gothat is if you are willing. What say you,
my daughter, are you ready to relinquish this
pleasant
home, and go with me, penniless, indeed, but
with the proud and happy consciousness that we are
free.'
`O, yes, yes, indeed, my dear father,' eagerly
replied
the other, with a look of joy and gratitude,
that beamed brightly through her still fast falling
tears; `and never could an eastern slave leave his
gilded fetters behind him with more pleasure than I
shall quit this place. Yes yes; and, believe me,
my father, however hard my lothowever menial I
had known would be my employment for support,
I have not seen an hour for the last two long and
joyless years, but my heart would have leaped to
hear you make such a proposal. And if such then
were my feelings, judge what must now be my
pleasure
to hear your announcement.'
The conversation was here interrupted by a light
rap on the door, and while the Captain and his
daughter were pausing for a repetition of the sound,
uncertain whether it proceeded from some one
wishing
13
for admittance, the door was partly opened by a
man without, and the queer visage of our old friend,
Pete Jones, was protruded with a comical, enquiring
look, into the room.
`How are ye?' he said, after glancing from father
to daughter a moment, with a half sheepish, half
roguish
expression, indicating his consciousness of
having
,
on a former occasion, played a little upon the
credulity of the old gentleman, of which he felt
slightly ashamed, though still inwardly tickled at the
recollection of the trick: `how are ye, Captain?
Sarvant, marm!'
`It is Mr. Jones of the army, father, the person
who gave me the news I imparted to you respecting
the expected invasion,' observed Miss Hendee,
noticing
that her father did not recognise the scout.
`Ah! the tall gentleman that called here once
I recollectdid you try my remedybut no matter,
nowwalk in, walk in, sir,' said the Captain.
`Why, no, thankee,' replied Jones, leaning his
long body on his arm, and swaying it to and fro, by
the play of the door on it its hinges, as he grasped
the handle, `I guess I'm rather too much in a
hurry
about these times.'
`You called on some errand, then?to give us
some news, perhaps?' rejoined the Captain,
expectingly
.
`Why, yesthat is, if you would like to hear it
that is, if you han't heard it already.'
`Speak on, sir.'
`Well, I thought I'd just pop in my countenance,
as I came along back, to see, that in case the devil
was at your heels, whether you would like to know
it?'
`You speak in riddleshow shall I understand
you, sir?'
`Well, I an't particular, how.'
`You said the devil?'
`Yes, and his name is Legion. Why, to be plain
about it, Captain, a British army of ten thousand,
with as many red skins as one would wish to see,
will most likely be here before to-morrow night.'
`You astonish me, sir! Has any news of this
reached the other settlers in this quarter?'
`I have just sent a brother scout up the road here,
to tell them they may as well be driving off their
cattle, and jogging along south themselves in course
of to-morrow. I just come from the fort over here,
and they've pretty much concluded to pack up there,
and be off for Old Ti to night; so the red coats and
Indians will have full play along the shores till they
get to Ti, where there will be something of a brush,
likely.'
`You would advise us women and cripples, then,
to beat a retreat, would you?'
`Why, yes, that's rather my notion, considering.
Though Burgoyne sayshaven't you seen his
proclamation
?'
`No.'
`Well, you will soon, I guess. The tories have
scattered 'em as thick as bumblebees along north of
here. Burgoyne says, as nigh as I can English the
high flown concern, stay at home, sell him your
cattle, and he will protect you. But if you budge
an inch, he will let loose the red skins to act at their
pleasure upon you. And what that will be, you
know as well as any man, they say, Captain.'
`Yes, I know enough of their tender mercies.
And I know also that Burgoyne, whatever he may
promise, can no more restrain the hell-hounds, after
he has once let them from their slips, than he can
crupper the whirlwinds. Montcalm tried that
experiment
,
on that dreadful day of blood and horror, at
Fort William Henryat least, I think he tried to
avert the catastrophe: for Montcalm, though an
enemy
that troubled us much, was yet a brave man;
and as a general rule, my friend, you will never find
a truly brave man either cruel or treacherous. The
great sin is in employing the Indians. And this
circumstance
will do much, in the present case, to
hasten
the destruction of Burgoyne. Even the dead,
almost, will rise up to bear arms against him. All
New England in a week, will be in motion. In
another week, as he passes along up the lake, they
will be hanging like an angry thunder cloud on his
flank. And, mark my word, sir, this general will
find, before he reaches Albany, that neither his
numbers
nor his proclamations will save him.'
`The Lord grant you may prove a true prophet;
and I think, upon the whole, you will.
Howsomever
,
Captain, it will be considerable of a chore to
bring it all to pass. And while we are fixing for it,
I rather guess you, along the northern parts here,
may as well make yourselves scarce a little.'
`We intend it, sir. Indeed, as regards my
family
,
we had already determined on a removal soon.
And now we shall follow your advice immediately,
with many thanks to you for calling. Let me see
our first move shall be for Rutland, where we can
probably safely remain a few days, to conclude on a
place for a more permanent residence.'
`Will you, sir,' said Miss Hendee, with a slight
blush, as she perceived the scout was about to
depart
,
`will you apprise our friends in the army of
the destination we think of taking?'
`Will you take this, sir, to the person to whom it
is addressed?' said Miss Reed, who, during the
latter
part of the conversation, had been nimbly
plying
her fingers over the blank leaf of a little volume
which she had been reading in an adjoining
apartment
,
when the scout's voice and anticipated errand
brought her into the room. `You see, Alma, I am
not afraid to write to my beau; now I will leave it
to the Captain to say, who is the bravest?' she
added
,
turning to the latter with an expression in
which roguish defiance, and fear of disapprobation,
were queerly blended.
`Ah, girls,' said the Captain in reply, after a
moment's
hesitation, which seemed to end in a
conclusion
to treat the matter good naturedly, `you may
be setting your caps for men that will be swinging
on the gallows in three months: for you know, in
attempted revolutions, men are only patriots and
heroes
when they succeed, and are but rebels and
traitors
when they don't.'
`We prefer, however,' replied Alma, with spirit,
`to set our caps for men who
may
be hung on
that principle, rather than for those who
should
be
hung on every other.'
`Is not there a law, Captain Hendee,' asked
Jessy
,
archly, `that a man may be pardoned on the
gallows, if a lady can be found who will step up and
marry him on the spot?'
`Why, I have heard such stories,' replied the
Captain
,
laughing, `but supposing there was such a
provision
,
in this country, you little quiz?'
`Why, in that case,' replied Jessy, casting a
roguish
look at Alma, `I think there are certain
officers
13*
in our army who need not be under any great
apprehensions of being hung at present.'
`Now, that is what I call grit,' observed Jones,
who had been looking on the two beautiful and
spirited
creatures before him, with an admiration
equalled
only by his surprise. `The Colonel and
Captain
know considerable well what they have been
about, after all, I see. Well, I must be jogging, I
guess, Captain, so good nighty. And you, galls, may
the Lord bless ye, and keep you steadfast in your
resolution! If I had a hogshead of blood, it should
all be shed for ye, and the like of ye. Trol, lol,
lol, lol de larly!'
During that night and the following day, all was
bustle and commotion throughout the northern part
of the settlement. To arms! to arms!
resounded
in every direction. And nearly all the able
bodied
men, promptly responding to the call of
General
Schuyler, whose expresses were seen furiously
dashing along the roads to rally the hitherto
slumbering
settlement, seized their rifles or muskets and
hastened off to join their countrymen in arms,
leaving
the old men, invalids and boys, to take charge
of their families, in removing from the scene of
danger
.
The stock was collected in droves, marked
with the initials of the owner's name and started off
for the south; while the inhabitants, taking with
them all the articles of value, which their
respective
modes of travelling would permit, collected in
small companies, and soon followed. The party
whose destinies more immediately concern our
story
,
consisting of Captain Hendee, Neshobee, the
two young ladies, and their respective female
domestics
,
in the course of the day, bade adieu to
their pleasant cottage, and mingled in the general
flight, which, by night fall, brought them in safety
to the house of a hospitable friend, nearly twenty
miles distant from the home, to which, as they
supposed
,
they were never more to return.
CHAPTER X.
Not all so much for love,
As for another secret close intent,
By marrying her, which I must reach unto,
But yet I run before my horse to market;
Clarence still breathes: Edward still lives, and,
When these are gone, then must I count my gains.
Several
unforseen circumstances connected with
the removal of their effects, together with the
impression
that they were now so far south as to be in
no very immediate danger from any incursions of
the enemy, having induced our party to accept the
invitation of their kind entertainer to remain a few
days at his abode, nearly a week had unfortunately
been suffered to elapse without resuming their
journey
.
Aroused, however, at length, by the news
that Burgoyne had reached Ticonderoga, and
closely
invested the fortress, while a party of tories and
Indians were ravaging the country to the north of
them, both the families of Captain Hendee and his
host, determined on an instant departure for a place
of more safety. Accordingly, with a few hasty
preparations, they started in their respective
carriages
about the middle of the afternoon for Castleton,
which they were under the expectation of being
enabled
to reach by day-light. The day being
excessively
sultry, Captain Hendee, after travelling awhile
at rather a brisk pace, checked his horses, and
suffered
them to fall into a moderate walk, during
which the other party, who were in advance, and
who seemed less disposed to slacken their speed,
passed entirely out of sight, and soon became
widely
separated from their more tardy fellow travellers.
When our party had proceeded several miles in this
leisurely manner, and while the Captain, to use a
quaint and somewhat curious expression of the
poet
Parnell, was deceiving the road, by the
relation
of one of his old war stories, they were met
by a stout built, though an ordinary looking, and
slovenly dressed man on horseback, who, after
closely
scrutinizing the company a moment, stopped his
horse, indicating, at the same time by his looks and
gestures, a wish that the others should stop also.
Supposing the stranger was desirous of making some
enquiries, Captain Hendee instantly pulled up his
horses, and sat waiting, with an air of expectation,
for the man to proceed with what he might have to
propose.
`I was thinking what your name mought be,
mister
,'
at length began the horseman, with a bold,
saucy
air. `It kinder seems to me I have seen you
somewhere or other.'
`Very possible, sir,' replied the Captain, in a
manner sufficiently cool and repulsive, as he thought,
to check the intrusive familiarity of the other.
`Well, I knowed I had,' rejoined the stranger, not
at all abashed by the coolness with which his
advances
had been met, `and yet I don't know as I can
quite call you by name.'
`My name is Hendee, sir.'
`Ah! O, yes;you live down there against
Crown Point?'
`Yes; or at least we did till within a few days.
But how happens it, that you are going to a part, which,
at this time, the settlers are so generally deserting?'
`Why an't it safe travelling that way?'
`It would be for some, doubtless,' replied the
Captain
significantly.
`Well, I spose you've hearn of me,' observed the
stranger, evidently disconcerted at the suspicions
which he perceived were beginning to be
entertained
of him, `my name is David Remington. You
are acquainted in Castleton, an't you?'
`Yes, with several individuals in that town.'
`Well, that's where I live, when I'm to home.
Do you know Mr. Woodward there?'
`I do, sir.'
`I want to know? Well, now, he is one of my
near neighbors. Here's a paper he gin me 'tother
day. Jest read it, will ye?'
Captain Hendee, with an air of curiosity, not
unmingled
,
however, with surprise, at an offer so
gratuitously
made to an entire stranger, took the paper,
which the other now extended to him, and read as
follows:
This may certify that David Remington, the
bearer hereof, is thought to be a true friend to the
States of America.
JOSEPH WOODWARD, Com. of Safety.
[1]
[1]
A literal copy of the original certificate, lodged in the public archives
of Vermont, and accompanied by another from the noted tory, Colonel
Philip Skene, certifying that Remington had taken the oath of allegiance,
and was a true Royalist. These papers, together with a receipt signed
by J. Sherwood, Captain, for two heifers procured for the British, by
Remington, all dated about the same time, are supposed to have been
found on the person of this or other tories, when subsequently slain or
taken prisoners.
Castleton,
June 2d, 1777.
`This appears to be genuine, and should be
sufficient
,'
remarked the Captain musingly, as he
handed
back the paper. `Have they received any news
at Castleton within a day or too, sir?' he added,
with more freedom of manner than he had before
exhibited towards the other.
`News?from where?'
`From our forces at Ticonderoga, I mean, of
course.'
`O, yes, I spose sowhy, I came from there,
myself, last night.'
`Indeed, sir? Well, what is the prospect of St.
Clair's being able to cope with the enemy, so as to
put a stop to their progress at that place?'
`Cope! hum! He will be lucky if he don't get
coped himself, I guess.'
`What, sir! The garrison are in no danger of
being taken themselves, surely?'
`Well, sir, I don't pretend to know nothing about
it; but I shouldn't be surprised if the folks about
here heard news, within twenty-four hours, that
made 'em stare.'
`Impossible! But what is the situation of affairs
there, that leads you to this conclusion?'
`Why, sir, the situation is, that General Red
Hazle
,
[2]
[2]
From original papers, still preserved, written by those, whose
spelling was evidently guided solely by the common pronunciation of
words, it appears that Gen. Reidesel went, to a considerable extent, at
least, by the name of
Red Hazle
.
with his Jarman brigade, has got possession on
this side of the lake, up as far as East Creek, where
he is now posted; while General Burgoyne has
entirely
enclosed the fort on 'tother side. And what
is still more, he has cut out a road, and drawn up a
whole slew of cannon clean to the top of Mount
Defiance, which he will have all mounted, and ready
to pour hell and thunder down on 'em in the fort
before they dream of it.'
`Is it possible that St. Clair can have suffered
Burgoyne to get possession of that commanding
spot for such a purpose!' exclaimed the Captain.
`I knew,' he continued, `that most of our officers
in the old war used to consider that mountain
inaccessible
with artillery. I, however, always thought
differently, and agreed, in this respect, with Major
Putnam, who, I well remember, suggested the
project
of getting cannon up this eminence to General
Howe, as our army was approaching the fort the
day previous to the battle, which cost poor Howe
his life. And had that gallant young nobleman,
who was the only lord of common sense whom the
British ever sent to America, been spared, the thing
would have been done, and we should have taken
the fortress, instead of drawing off our army
without
effecting any thing. But as I said, is it
possible
that St. Clair can have permitted this in an
army
approaching from the north, and wholly
unacquainted
with the surrounding localities?'
`It is true, any how; and if they don't find
themselves
in a pickle, there in the fort, by to-morrow
morning, I lose my guess,' replied the other, with a
satisfaction which he was unable wholly to conceal.
After a few apparently careless enquiries
respectin
the destination of our travellers, and their
expectations
of reaching it, Remington seemed suddenly
to become convinced that it would not be prudent
to proceed any farther in the land-looking excursion,
which he stated was his business to the north, and
announced his intention of immediately returning.
Accordingly wheeling round his horse, and bidding
the company good day, with the remark, that he
should probably ride rather faster than their team
would travel, he rode off at a moderate trot, till the
intervening bushes at the first turn of the road
screened him, as he supposed, from the sight of
those he had just left, when he applied his whip,
and dashed forward at full speed.
`What opinion did you form of that man,
father
?'
asked Miss Hendee, after they had ridden
some distance in silence.
`Why, but for the certificate of so true and
vigilant
a friend to the cause as Woodward, who
undoubtedly
signed it, I should certainly have had
strong suspicions that the fellow was some
designing
tory,' answered the Captain, indirectly, and with
the tone of one still doubting over evidence which
he could not reject, nor yet receive as wholly
conclusive
.
`I know not,' rejoined the other, `that I can give
any good reasons for my impressions; but there was
a certain something about the man, which, from the
first, struck me unfavorably. And is it not possible,
that he may be secretly in the interest of the
enemy
,
notwithstanding his certificate, which, without
being asked, he was so ready to show?'
`I noticed his readiness to show the paper,' again
replied the Captain, without any direct answer to his
daughter's question. `And it also occurred to me,
that he appeared to be far better acquainted with
the movements of the British, than with those of
our own army.'
`And did not you think, Captain Hendee,'
observed
Miss Reed, `that he betrayed a secret
pleasure
,
when relating the perilous situation in which he
stated the American forces to be placed?'
`I don't know that I noticed that in particular,'
said the Captain; `but if he be a tory, and has told
us the truth, I fear he has too much reason to
rerejoice
.
I cannot think, however, that St. Clair will
fail to keep open a way for retreat, so that the
garrison
shall not be taken in any event.'
`Here, Neshobee,' said Alma, as the Indian, who
had travelled mostly on foot, keeping generally a
few rods in advance of the horses, now fell back to
the side of the carriage, `you have sometimes shown
yourself a shrewd guesser; and we will have your
opinion in this case. What did you think of the
man father was talking with just now?'
`Me guess him have two tonguemean
something
no good,' replied the native, in his usual
quiet
manner. `Him no think me see him through the
bush, when him ride away slowthen look back for
find out we see him, then whipoff a gallop!'
`So much the better,' remarked Jessy, `for the
faster he goes the further he will get from us.'
`Neshobee, perhaps, would draw a different
inference
,'
said the Captain.
`Why should he, father?' asked Alma.
But the other, not willing to alarm the ladies by
naming his secret apprehensions, which, after all,
might prove groundless, made only some evasive, or
indifferent reply, and became silent.
`He can have no immediate communication with
the tories and Indians, by going in that direction,'
resumed Alma. `They, if we were rightly
informed
,
are still far behind us.'
`They
were
behind us,' observed Captain Hendee,
relapsing into silence, in which his example was
soon imitated by the rest of the company, all of
whom seemed oppressed by that undefined sense of
impending danger, which is sometimes felt without
14
the inclination,on account of conscious inability,
perhaps,of communicating it to others.
It was now drawing towards sunset; and our
party
had yet nearly ten miles to travel before reaching
their proposed destination for the night. They had
been, for some miles, passing through a dark,
continuous
forest, whose unvaried gloom soon began to
be increased by the shades, which, before the usual
hour, were slowly stealing over the wilderness, in
consequence of the broad and depening masses of
vapor now gathering along the western horizon.
And presently the low, deep rumbling of distant
thunder, heralding an approaching shower, reached
the ears of the company, and increased their
anxiety
to gain some opening, at least, before storm and
darkness, to say nothing of their secret
apprehensions
of more terrible foes, should overtake them.
Casting an uneasy glance at the lurid and
threatening
aspect of the heavens, Captain Hendee applied
the whip, and was urging on his horses to renewed
efforts of speed, when his arm was suddenly seized
by the convulsive grasp of his daughter.
`Stop! stop! father,' she exclaimed, in a low,
hurried tone, `look at Neshobee! There is
danger
near us.'
All eyes were at once directed towards the Indian,
who was now about a dozen rods in front of the
carriage. He had turned round, and, with quick
and eager gestures, was motioning them to halt.
Instantly
reigning up the horses, and bringing them to
a stand, the Captain, with the rest of the company,
continued, with intense interest and alarm, silently
to watch the motions of the native, who seemed to
be still in considerable doubt, either of the nature
of the apprehended danger, or of the exact point
from which it was to proceed. After standing a
short time, however, in the attitude of listening,
slowly turning his head, as his eyes were keenly
searching the woods around him, he hastily started
back, and, pointing to a dark thicket nearly abreast
of the carriage, leaped nimbly behind a tree, and
seemed awaiting some expected result. The next
moment, the shrill, quavering sounds of the terrific
war-whoop, issuing from the coverts in every
direction
,
announced to the appalled travellers the fearful
character of the foe by which they were
surrounded
.
And in another instant, a score of painted
savages
leaped from the bushes, and, menacingly
brandishing
their tomahawks aloft, closely invested the
carriage. Knowing it would be utterly useless to
attempt any resistance, the old veteran put up the
pistols, which he had drawn out on the first alarm,
and, while the shuddering females, with a terrified
glance at the frightful group around them, were
burying
their faces in their hands, very coolly
proceeded
,
by signs, and such phrases as he supposed
might be understood, to signify to his assailants that
he yielded himself and family as prisoners. The
captors, having ordered out their prisoners into the
road, immediately fell to work with their knives, in
cutting the harness from the horses, each of which,
when released, was mounted by one of the enemy
and ridden off into the woods; while the carriage
was run into the nearest thicket and concealed. The
prisoners, including Neshobee, who, in attempting to
escape, had been seized and brought in, were then
placed in Indian file, alternately with a sufficient
number of their captors to guard the whole, and
marched out the road the same way in which their
horses
had been previously taken, and which soon brought
the company into an old, overgrown path, leading
through the forest in a westerly direction. In this
manner our party were urged forward at a rapid
pace for nearly an hour, during which, not a word
was uttered by either captors or captured, with the
exception of Captain Hendee, whose irritable
temper
occasionally broke out in a half suppressed
anathema
as he jarred a rheumatic limb, while
hobbling
along the rough and frequently obstructed
path. At length, to the great and unexpected joy
of the wearied captives, the cheering light of an
opening broke upon their view, affording hope that
the fatigues, under which they were nearly ready to
sink, were now to be terminated for the night; and
that they were to be favored with quarters in some
kind of a house, instead of an unsheltered bed of
earth in the wilderness, as they had anticipated
The opening, consisting of thirty or forty acres of
land, and containing two small log tenements, with
a barn of similar construction attached to one of
them, was situated along the margin of a
pictureesque
pond, embedded in a forest of majestic pines
On entering the clearing, Captain Hendee instantly
perceived from appearances about the cabins, that
they had reached the head quarters of the gang
who, as he rightly concluded, had taken possession
of the place since its desertion by the inhabitants.
His horses, that had arrived before him, had beer
turned out, and were now quietly grazing in the
field; while a large number of the enemy, nearly
equalling that of the party who had been engaged
in the capture, were scattered about the place, some
bathing in the pond, some fishing, some pitching
quoits, and others lounging about the buildings. As
he approached this portion of the enemy, the
Captain
soon noticed a difference in the appearance of
many of them, as contrasted with that of such of
his captors as had come under his inspection, which,
with his acquaintance with the peculiar motions and
demeanor of the natives, immediately led him to
suspect that a considerable part of the band, though
painted and habited like Indians, were white men
in disguise. And he now readily understood that
he was indebted for his present misfortune to the
traitor, Remington, who, being secretly connected
with this band of Indians and tories, had doubtless
been employed by them to bring intelligence of the
approach of such families as should be passing along
the road; though why his own family should have
been thus particularly marked for capture, while
others
were suffered to escape, it did not at that time
occur to him.
When our party, with their captors, arrived at the
first cabin, which they reached about dark, they
were halted at the door, while a consultation was
held at some distance aloof between two or three,
who appeared to have the control of the band;
after
which, one of them came forward, and, having
first caused Neshobee to be taken to the barn,
motioned
to the rest of the prisoners, except Miss
Hendee
,
who stood in the rear, to enter the house.
Perceiving
it was intended to seperate her from her
friends, the alarmed maiden suddenly darted by her
immediate keepers, and attempted to reach the door
at which her father at that moment was entering.
A rough hand, however, was instantly extended,
and, grasping her arm, rudely pulled her back.
`Kill me, if you will,' she exclaimed, `kill me,
but let me die with my friends.'
14*
`Prisoners can't always be choosers, my proud
one,' said the apparent savage in good English.
`It is Darrow!' said Alma, with blanching
features
,
and with a look of alarm, which the
brandished
tomahawk of the Indian had failed to call forth.
`I see it all, and know the design. Death I fear
not; but such a fate!Oh! as you value the
innocence
and eternal peace of you daughter, protect
me, my father!'
Comprehending the meaning of his daughter, and
appreciating all her apprehensions, even before she
had done speaking, the maddened father hastily
drew a pistol from his pocket, and discharged it full
at the head of Darrow. The bullet grazed the
temple
of the astounded ruffian, and his locks were
slightly singed by the burning powder; but he
escaped
with no other injury. Recovering from the
shock of the explosion, he hurriedly pulled out one
of the heavy pistols which hung in his belt, raised
it to the breast of his unflinching opponent, and,
with the look of a fiend, was in the act of taking
deliberate aim, when the heroic girl, who was the
innocent cause of the strife, suddenly threw herself
between her father and the weapon levelled for his
destruction. After holding the deadly implement
in the same threatening position nearly a minute, as
if deliberating whether he would send the bullet
through both father and daughter, for the sake of
wreaking his vengeance on the former, the balked
villain with an angry movement thrust the pistol
into
its place, and turning to his men, fiercely
exclaimed
,
`Seize the damned old dotard! Secure him, and
let him wait for my revenge till I have disposed of
this silly jade. She will soon find out, I guess,
what she has gained by the rumpus,' he added, again
grasping the arm of his recoiling victim, and,
regardless
of her shrieks, roughly dragging her off to
the other cabin; while, in obedience to his orders,
his painted minions proceeded, with demoniac glee,
to bind the old gentleman, and thrust him with the
rest of the prisoners into the house. With the
assistance
of his men, several of whom he ordered to
attend him, Darrow soon succeeded in forcing his
half senseless victim to the other cabin, situated on
the shore of the pond, near the western extremity
of the clearing; when, opening the door, he gave
her a spiteful push, which sent her reeling through
the entrance, at the same time gruffly exclaiming,
`There, madam! there are your quarters for the
present. And let me just inform your ladyship, that
the less fuss you make about the matter the better
it will be for you.'
With this he drew the door to, and, after posting
a guard round the house, returned to the main body
of his band, who were now assembled round the
first mentioned house, busily engaged in cooking
their suppers in the open air, or patching up the
leaky roof of the log barn, to protect those from the
threatened storm, who should be compelled to take
quarters in it in consequence of the arrangement,
which the leaders had seen fit to make, of placing
the prisoners in separate houses.
After being left alone, Miss Hendee made an
effort
to regain her composure. And having
succeeded
in a good degree, she proceeded, by the dim
twilight
yet remaining, to examine the interior of the
house, containing but a single room on the ground
floor. Three or four old chairs, a rough pine table,
and a straw bed laid upon a rudely constructed
bedstead
,
with a couple of coarse blankets for covering,
constituted all the visible furniture of the cabin.
With these observations, she seated herself in a
chair, and endeavored to think coolly on the novel
and alarming situation in which she now found
herself
placed. From Sherwood's known connection
with Darrow, the apparent leader of the present
band, she had but little doubt that the former was
in fact the commander of these marauders, or at
least the instigator of the seizure of herself and
family. And in either case, she was at no loss to
understand that the possession of her person was
the main, if not the only object, of the present
capture
.
Nor did she doubt, for similar reasons, that
Sherwood must be near,probably already on the
ground. And from the circumstance of her being
seperated from her friends; and confined alone, she
felt but too fearfully certain that a fate was in
reserve
for her, on which, at the best she could
hope for, she shuddered to think. After she had
remained in this situation awhile, listening to every
movement from without, and starting at the sound
of every footstep, lest it prove the herald of a visit
from Sherwood, which she now every moment
expected
would be paid her, and to which she
looked
forward with a dread, that the anticipated
presence
of no other foe could impart, the door was
thrown open, and a man unceremoniously entered.
She hastily rose from her seat and threw a look of
alarm towards the intruder. A second glance,
however, told her that he was not the dreaded
visitor
,
but only one of the disguised tories come to
bring her lights and refreshment. Placing the torch
which he bore in the chimney, the man silently
advanced
,
and set a trencher of coarse food on the table; after
which he turned, and departed, neither questioning
nor questioned. Feeling no inclination to taste the
food, the hapless girl resumed her seat, and again
gave herself up to the distressing thoughts, which
her situation was so well calculated to inspire. The
last gleams of twilight had now faded away, and
night had fallen upon the earth with almost
Egyptian
darkness. There was a low, rushing sound
abroad, betokening an approaching conflict of the
elements. The attention of Alma being arrested
by these renewed indications of the storm, which,
for several hours, appeared to have been slowly
concentrating its forces in the distance, she arose
and went to a narrow window, that opened upon
the dark waters of the forest-girt pond. The
omenous
sounds before heard had given place to the
more audible murmers of the troubled air, which in
fitful and variant undulations, now moaned
dismally
along the ground, and now piped, in brief and
broken strains of melancholy music, among the
tops of the neighboring pines. Large, black
masses
of jagged clouds were hurrying through the
heavens, which were occasionally made visible by
slight, quivering flashes of the electric fires, partially
disclosing the broad outlines of the convolving
vapor
above, and dimly lighting up the dark landscape
of wilds and waters beneath. While the maiden
was looking abroad upon this scene of gloomy
magnificence, which seemed strangely to harmonize
with the kindred gloom of her own sad and
desolate
bosom, a bright, but far off flash gleamed
fiercely
athwart her vision. Turning her eyes to the
quarter whence it proceeded, she beheld a distinct,
attenuated, and ribbon-like flame approaching
from a distant part of the horizon, and describing
in its apparently slow, and crinkling movement, as
it came, an arch of fearful splendor across the
illuminated
heavens. The next instant it fell upon the
top of a towering dry pine, standing on the
opposite
shore of the pond, and hurled the blazing
fragments
of its giant trunk in every direction over the
woods, and far into the hissing and bubbling waters
around. A single stunning report followed, and all
without was again dark and silent. Recoiling at
the shock of the deafening concussion, and
almost
blinded by the intensity of the flash, the
astounded
girl turned suddenly from the window,
and attempted to grope her way back to her seat.
Before reaching it, however, a slight noise within
the room arrested her steps. Pressing her hand
upon her eyes an instant to enable her to discern
the objects in the dimly lighted apartment, she sent
an apprehensive glance towards the door, when, to
her unspeakable dismay, she encountered the
basilisk
eyes of Sherwood, who was quietly standing,
within the entrance, and looking upon her with an
expression, in which guilt, effrontery and triumph,
were singularly blended.
`Leave me!' she exclaimed, as the other now
began
to advance towards her; `leave me, sir!' she
repeated
with all the firmness and decision of manner
she could command, while she gradually retreated
to the opposite side of the room.
`Why should I leave you, captious girl,' he
responded
in his usual affectedly meek and plausible
manner, `why should I leave you, or you desire it,
when I am the only friend to whom you, or your
family, can look for intercession with those into
whose power you have fallen? Having heard of
your misfortune, I hastened immediately to the spot,
and have but this moment arrived.'
`Base dissembler!' said Alma, with an
indignation
which, for the instant, seemed to overpower
every other feeling, `will you pretend, sir, that these
are not all your doings?'
`Whywhy, I admit,' he replied, considerably
disconcerted at the question and pointed manner of
the other, which led him to suppose that she had
by some means received a much more certain
knowledge
of his connection with the band than she really
had; `I admit that these men belong to a company
which I have a commission to command. But I
protest I have had nothing to do with your capture.
And why should you always be imputing to me the
worst motives for every action I may perform?
Here, now, I come to befriend and save you; and
you receive me only with insults!'
`I will put the sincerity of your professions to the
test, sir,' promptly rejoined the other. `If you really
came to befriend me, and have the power, as you
admit, let me go instantly to my father and friends.'
`Why the time has arrived, it strikes me, when I
am under no very particular necessity of being
further
dictated,' sneeringly replied the villian, now
throwing off the mask, which he perceived was
serving him but little purpose. `I have a certain
condition to propose, and when you comply with
that, neither you nor your family are longer
prisoners
.'
The heart of the wretched girl sunk within her,
but she made no reply.
`You have not forgotten, probably.' resumed the
the other, `our late interview, when I proposed the
fulfilment of a long settled engagement?Well, if
you have, I have not, not the manner in which my
overtures were then treated. But notwithstanding
all the scorn and abuse I have received both from you
and your father, I still feel disposed to allow you a
chance to fulfil that engagement, which, as a
prisoner
,
and in my power, is more than you could
reasonably
expect. I am still willing to make you my
legal wife; but it must be done on the spot. I
have a clergyman within call to perform the
ceremony
.
Will you consent?'
`Never!' replied the indignant and yet
unconquered
girl. `What! consent under such
circumstances
under
the menaces here held forth,
and the feelings here exhibited?I would as soon
unite myself to a fiend! consent to such a
mockery
,
intended only to disguise violence and
outrage
,
under the sacred rite of marriage? Never!
While death can be my alternative, O, never!'
`But supposing death cannot be your alternative,
you foolish girl?' said the miscreant suitor in a
taunting
tone: `You will do well, perhaps, to bear in
mind that your person is already in my power; and
that I am the one to name your alternative. And
I shall name one too, in which I shall be likely to
dispense with the services of the parson.'
Monster!' exclaimed the aroused maiden, with
an energy which insulted virtue alone could have
excited
,
`begone with your polluting presence, lest the
thunders of Heaven, which are now angrily rolling
over our heads, strike you to the earth in vengeance
for your meditated villanies!'
With all the innate baseness and disguised
effrontery
of his nature, Sherwood could not help
quailing
under the withering scorn and almost
unearthly
majesty which accompanied this bold rebuke;
and unable to summon the hardihood to proceed
any further at present, he turned towards the door,
muttering as he went,
`Well, we will soon see who is to be balked this
time! Two hours,' he added, pausing at the
thresh-hold
and looking back, without, however, venturing
to raise his eyes to the face of the other, who still
stood fearlessly confronting him,`just two hours
shall be allowed you to conclude which of the two
alternatives you will embrace, and in making up
your mind, you may as well take into consideration,
that your father attempted the life of my lieutenant,
who will require such an inducement as I alone can
offer him, to make him relinquish his purpose of
revenge.'
After the fisrt glad and grateful sensations of
relief
,
which came over the feelings of our heroine
on being freed from the dreaded presence of her
relentless persecutor, had passed away, all the
moral
energy, that had sustained her through her fearful
trial, forsook her, while, with it, her overstrained
nerves, which so powerful an excitement had braced
for the exigency, gave way; and weak, exhausted
and despairing, she tottored across the room and
throwing herself upon the miserable pallet, yielded
herself up, for a while, to the dread certainties of a
fate, which now even ever-flattering hope could
suggest
no way of escaping. For her family she felt no
great apprehonsions of any fate much more severe
then that which usually falls to the lot of ordinary
prisoners
;
since the present contest, as she was aware,
had so far been conducted, wherever the Indians had
been employed, on altogether different principles
from the preceding wars in this country. And
contenting themselves with plunder, the savages had
15
generally, on making prisoners, delivered them over
unharmed to their white allies, when such only as
had been found in arms were retained, while the
rest, especially females and the young and aged,
were soon dismissed for their homes. Nor could
she believe that either Darrow or Sherwood really
intended, as they had threatened, to make her father
an exception for an act, which, however hasty it
might have been, had resulted in no injury. But
all these considerations could, in her present peculiar
situation, be of no avail to herself. An immediate
escape, or some sudden rescue, were apparently the
only means of snatching her from the impending
doom. And yet how were either of these to be
effected
?
Any attempt to get from the house,
guarded
as it was by pested sentries, the sound of whose
footsteps frequently reached her ear, she knew would
be utterly useless. Equally futile also must be the
hope of any rescue till long after her fate would be
decided. No other resource, therefore, remained
to her but to face the danger, as terrible as it was
to her, even in the least abhorrent of the
alternatives
which had been set before her, and persevere
in the determination she had already announced of
resistance unto death. And she earnestly besought
the great protector of the innocent and injured, to
arm her with strength and fortitude to meet the
coming trial, or interfere, in his mercy, to save her
from its terrors and perils.
While the mind of the almost frantic girl was
thus painfully engrossed, as she was reclining on
the bed with her face buried in the clothes, a noise,
differing from any thing she had before heard, and
proceeding from some point above, but seemingly
neither exactly within nor without the building, had
several times reached her ear. And now it became
too distinct not to attract her particular notice.
Startled, though as yet not seriously alarmed, she
hastily rose, and endeavored to ascertain the nature
of the sounds that had disturbed her. The rain,
which had now for some time been heavily pouring
to the earth,
had extinguished the fire, and, while
utter darkness pervaded the room, nothing was to
be heard but the ceaseless roar of the descending
torrents. At length, however, the noise was
repeated
.
It appeared to proceed from the flue of the
chimney, down which, it soon became evident, that
something, possessing life and motion, was slowly
and cautiously descending into the room; but
whether it was a man, or wild beast, she was
unable
to determine. Presently the mysterious object
seemed to reach the hearth. And, in a short time,
the dark outlines of a seemingly shapeless figure
became discernable to the perplexed, and now
thoroughly
frightened maiden. Her excited
imagination
instantly took wing, and in the bewilderment of
the moment, the motionless object swelled into a
ferocious
monster, preparing to clutch her in his
horrid
embrace. A strange feeling of undefined fear
and dread took possession of her bosom, and
seemed
to paralyze all her faculties. She tried to speak,
but could utter no soundto move, but her limbs
refused to do their office; while a peculiar, cold,
curdling sensation, commencing with the crown of
her head, settled over her, converting her whole
system into a helpless, inanimate and frozen mass,
alike incapable of thought and action. At that
instant
a vivid flash of lightning lit up the room with
the brightness of the noon-day's sun, and broke the
spell that had so strangely enthralled her senses:
for, equally to her joy and surprise, she beheld, in
the object of her alarm, no other than her faithful
friend Neshobee, who, uncertain whether the room
might not contain some of the enemy as well as his
mistress, whom he knew to be confined here, had
squatted in the fire place, after his descent, with the
view of ascertaining the fact before he should speak
or advance.
`Umph!' uttered the Indian, apparently nearly
as much relieved as his mistress, at the mutual
disclosure
.
`Missus Alma speak very no loud,' he
continued, in a half whisper, as he glided
noiselessly
forward to her side, and laid his hand on her arm
in token of caution. `Them three tory, what stand
for watch, all gone fore side for get out of the rain,
and so no see Neshobee climb up back side and
come down chimney. But Missus talk soft, them
stand close up side, hark um, hear um, catch um
Neshobee.'
`How fares it with my father and the girlsare
they still in the other house, and yet unharmed?'
eagerly whispered Alma.
`All um there. Them tory and Indian all in the
barn when the rain come. Leak down, make um
jump, crowd thick, so no see Neshobee creep away.
Me go back side tother house, peep through crack,
see um there when flash come bright. Cappen
hands all tie tight. Him look sorry. Three tother
girls lay on straw in cornercry muchall look
very
scare.'
`And what is to become of us, Neshobee,' asked
Alma, mournfully, as she brushed away a tear,
elicited
by the Indian's brief, but graphic and touching
description of the situation of her friends.
`Neshobee no get in there for help Cappen and
them. But me help Missus Alma up chimney, get
out, and they no hear so long the rain pour hard.'
`No, no, Neshobee, it is impossible,' replied
Alma
,
after reflecting a moment on the proposal of her
friend, who had run such risks to rescue her. Could
I succeed in getting out upon the house, my light
dress, if nothing else, would betray us to the guards,
and we should both be taken. And even could I
escape, how could I withstand an exposure all night
in the woods to this dreadful storm? No,
Neshobee
,
leave me to my fate, which will probably be
decided
long before you can be the means of our
rescue
.
But my poor father and the girls you may
perhaps be instrumental in saving. Then go,
Neshobee
.If
you succeed in escaping from this place,
proceed directly to our army at Ticonderoga, and
tell them that we are prisoners to Sherwood and
Darrow, with a band of tories and Indians. Tell
Colonel Warrington, or Captain Selden, that
father's
life is threatenedthat IO, heavens! but
let my situation be passed over. And should they
send a force to deliver us, as I know they will, you
can guide it to the spot. Now don't hesitate to
leave me, my faithful friend,to leave me to the care
of Heaven,' she added, laying her hand on the
other's
shoulder and gently pushing him towards the
avenue by which he descended into the room. `Don't
delay an instant. Go, and I will ask the blessing
of a good Providence to speed you on your way.'
`Me go,' laconically responded the native,
vanishing
from the sight of his mistress in the darkness.
and silently ascending the chimney.
After anxiously listening a few moments to the
cautious egress of her messenger, and satisfying herself
that he had reached the ground, and escaped
undiscovered
,
*15
the unhappy girl once more returned to her
homely couch,not there, however, to find repose, or
any alleviation of the woes that so deeply
oppressed
her feelings. The distracting apprehensions,
from which her mind had been in some measure
diverted
by the presence of her humble friend, now,
on his departure, returned with ten-fold force to her
mind. And a feeling of utter loneliness and
desolation
took possession of her desponding bosom.
Conscious that the time set by Sherwood for his
return
,
to execute one of the dreadful alternatives
with which he had brutally menaced her, was now
nearly at hand, and her feelings becoming, at the
maddening thought, too intense to permit her to
remain
longer quiet, she arose, and again took her
station at the little window. The storm cloud still
girt darkly and heavily the whole visible horizon;
and the elements were in fearful commotion. The
howling of the blast, as it swept over the vexed
wilderness
,
attended by the crash of falling trees, the
deep, but varying roar of the deluging torrents of
wind-driven rain, and loud over all, the terrific peals
of bursting thunder, preceded by flashes of
lightning
that seemed to envelope earth and heaven
in a blaze, came mingling on the senses in
awful tumult. And yet the scene, as awful as it
was, and would have been to her under ordinary
circumstances, had no terrors for the wretched
captive
now;nay, as the forked lightnings were
leaping
from cloud to cloud, and darting to the earth in
terrific gambols around her, she felt a strange
pleasure
in their fearful proximity. And regarding them
as the instruments of Heaven, which might, perhaps,
be commissioned for her deliverance, she often,
during
that dreadful hour, under the wild impulses of
maidenly terror and despair, with which the
recurring
thoughts of her situation filled her,
involuntarily
stretched forth her hand towards the deeply
charged
clouds, as if to invoke the fatal shaft to descend,
and snatch her from a doom to which death were a
boon of mercy. But that Heaven to which she was
looking to relieve her thus, had reserved her for
another fate: the storm rolled heavily away, and left
her beauteous form unscathed. The rain at length
ceased; and the lightnings, as they played along the
black parapet of clouds, that lay piled in the east,
shone with less dazzling fierceness, and only to show
the ravages which the tempest had left behind. As
mute and desponding, the lovely captive stood with
her eyes still vacantly riveted on the receding storm,
she, during the continuance of a bright and
lingering
flash of lightning, cast her eye obliquely towards
the quarters of her enemies, when she caught a
glimpse of a man picking his way along the half
flooded path leading to her cabin, whom she
instantly
recognized to be the dreaded Sherwood. A
deadly
sickness came over her, her brain begun to whirl,
and she sunk senseless on the floor.
CHAPTER XI.
For freedom's battle once begun.
Bequeathed from bleeding sire to son
Tho' baffled of is ever won.
While
the incidents last described were
transpiring
,
an event occurred, which spread
consternation
and alarm over all the neighboring country.
This was, the unexpected evacuation of the
important
fortress of Ticonderoga, to which the
Americans
seemed to have confidently looked as a barrier
which was to interpose an effectual check to the
further progress of Burgoyne in that quarter. But
whatever may have been said of the remissness of
General St. Clair, in suffering the enemy, to gain
these advantages which compelled him, for the
salvation
of his army, to evacuate that post, and
whatever
disasters were immediately occasioned by the
movement, the final consequences which resulted
from the event proved highly auspicious to the
American
arms: For while it inspired the British
General
with an undue confidence of success, and
caused
him to push rashly into the heart of the country,
it at once aroused the Americans from the apathy,
with which they seemed to have viewed the approach
of the invading army, and kindled up the flagging
spirit of patriotism to a pitch of enthusiasm that
soon brought the rallying bands of the hardy
yeomen
of the north to the post of danger, and led to
that series of brilliant achievements which
terminated
in the entire overthrow of this formidable array
of British power.
Scarcely had St. Clair succeeded, under cover of
darkness, in reaching the eastern shore of the lake,
and getting his army in motion for the interior,
before
an active pursuit was commenced by General
Frazier with a large detachment of British regulars,
followed by General Reidesel with most of the
Brunswick
forces. The Americans, however, kept some
miles in advance of the enemy through the day;
and St. Clair, with the main body of his troops,
pushed forward that night as far as Castleton,
leaving
the rear guard of the army, consisting of about
a thousand men, under the command of Colonel
Warrington, on the road some distance behind,
where he encamped at a farm-house within three
miles of the place which was the same night
occupied
by the lawless gang of Sherwood and their
unfortunate
captives, all parties being equally ignorant
of their vicinity to each other.
With this glance at the situation of our army,
with whose movements were more or less closely
linked the destines of all those whose individual
fortunes we have undertaken to follow, we will now
go on with our tale, which the crowding events of
the next twenty-four hours were destined to bring
to its catastrophe. And leaving our fair and
persecuted
captive in the happy state of insensibility, in
which we last described her, we will now follow her
trusty messenger on his adventurous way to the
American army, which both he and his mistress
supposed
was still posted at Ticonderoga, some twenty
miles distant.
Happily succeeding in leaving the cabin and
gaining
an adjoining field undiscovered by the guards,
Neshobee, after stopping a moment to pitch his
course, plunged directly into the tangled and
dripping
wilderness lying along the northern borders of
the pond. Pausing at every considerable interval
of darkness, that still almost impenetrably shrouded
the earth, and darting forward by the views which
the fast flashing lightning afforded, he treaded the
difficult mazes of the forest with a rapidity rarely
attainable by any but natives of the wilds. Passing
round the western extremity of the pond, and
bending
his course in a more southerly direction, an
hour's travelling brought him to the great military
road leading directly to the lake. The storm
having
now ceased, he hastily stripped off his drenched
garments, wrung out the water to enable him to run
with more expedition, reinvested himself, and again
set off at a long trot down the road towards his
supposed
destination. It was to be his fortune,
however, to travel but a short part of the distance
for which he had prepared himself: For after
proceeding
about a mile along the now unobstructed
way with a speed to which his foverish anxiety lent
wings, he came to a large opening, which presented
the unexpected appearance of numerous dimly
burning
fires scattered through an extensive field.
Stopping
short at a spectacle so unusual under the
present
circumstances, the cautious native immediately
put his ear to the earth, and listened long and
intently
.
A low, mingled hum, as of a hushed and
reposing multitude, rose in a searce perceptible
murmer
on the air; and soon the slight jar of
measured
footsteps, resembling the distant tread of
slowly
pacing sentinels, became distinguishable to his
acute senses. No longer doubting the presence of
an encamped army in the opening, but wholly
ignorant
of its character, he cautiously crept forward,
rising, from time to time, to discover if possible,
without exposing himself, whether it was a friendly
or hostile force, which he had thus unexpectedly
encountered
.
Keeping within the range of a stump,
or some object by the road-side, to screen his
approach
,
he crawled along about a dozen rods, and
again paused for a more careful observation. The
clouds were now rapidly breaking away, and, in the
increasing light, he was soon enabled to trace the
outlines of a sentry, standing motionless as a post in
the middle of the road, but a few rods ahead.
While he thus lay tasking his vision to discover
something in the dress, arms, or appearance of the
man, from which the fact he sought to know might
be inferred, the waning moon shone out through the
parting clouds, and disclosed to the startled Indian
the British uniform of the sentry, and at the same
time the numerous tents of the enemy dotting the
fields in the distance beyond. The first thought of
Nehobee, on making this alarming discovery, was to
secure a retreat from this dangerous vicinity to the
sentinel, though he was wholly at a loss what course
he should now take to find those to whom he had
been dispatched for succour. But his doubts in this
respect were set at rest by information he the next
moment obtained from an unexpected quarter: For
while he lay anxiously watching a cloud that was
nearing the moon, and promised in a few moments
again to obscure her light, which now made it
hazzardous
for him to move from his position, a soldier
approached to relieve the one on guard.
`Well, Tom,' said the soldier just arrived, `you
have had a devil of a drenching this bout, hav'nt
you?Why! what! has the man turned to stone?
Say, Tom, why dont you answer me?'
`O, yes, yes,' replied the other arousing himself
from his stupor`yes, wet enougha ghastly time
I've had of it, Jerry, since I've been out here.
Hang me, if I hav'nt got quite enough of this
chasing
the Yankees into the bush. I wish 'twas over.
But do you know the orders for to-morrow?'
`Why, to chase the dn'd rebels till we take
them, besure. Our Captain has just returned from
General Frazier's quarters; and he says they have
had a sort of go between, by the name of
Remington
,
who came directly from the Yankee camp, and
brought word, that the main body of the rebels have
got about ten miles ahead, while a regiment or two,
under a Colonel Warrington, are encamped within
a league of us on the road. And the plan is, I
believe
,
to move on, at daylight, to the attack of the
nearest force. And if the main body return to the
rescue, why, we have General Reidesel, with a
plenty
of Hessians, a few miles behind, to back us: so
very likely we may get a tolerable bush fight out of
it, before it is over, particularly as this Warrington,
they say, is a fellow of grit; and his men are
mostly
Green Mountain Boys, who have more of the
regular
built bull dog about 'em than any thing the
Yankees have got in their ragamuffin army.'
`Well, Jerry,' replied the other, in accents
partaking
somewhat of the doleful. `I cant exactly tell
how tis, but if we do have a battle, I have a notion I
shan't live through it.'
`Why what makes you think so, Tom?'
`O, I don't knowI feel it creeping over me;
and that ain't all, I am very sartaindeed, I could
swear to itthat I saw a shape out there in the
road yonder, a little while ago, that rose up right
out of the ground, and then kinder stood quivering
a minute, and vanished. I expect it was my spirit,
Jerry,'
`Pooh! man, your liver must have got water
soaked here in the rain, to make you down in the
mouth about such whimsies. Here, take a suck at
my canteen.There! now back to your tent, your
pluck will be up by morning.'
Animated by the cheering intelligence he had
gathered from the conversation above detailed, every
word of which had reached his attentive ears, the
native slowly and noiselessly withdrew from the spot
in the now favoring darkness, till fairly beyond the
sight and hearing of the guard; when he began
rapidly
to retrace his way along the road towards the
American encampment, to which we will now repair
in anticipation of his arrival.
It was a calm and cloudless morning that ushered
in the day so long remembered in Vermont for the
sanguinary conflict of Hubbardton, which proved so
destructive to the boastful and haughty foe, while it
widely scattered the weeds of wo throughout her infant
settlement.
[3]
[3]
There was no engagement in our revolution, perhaps, which
exhibited
such determined energy and resolution on the part of the Americans
as the battle of Hubbardton; and yet there was no one, of which the results
are more obscurely or incorrectly stated by our leading historians,most
of them making our loss from 200 to 300 and that of the British from 100
to 200. But if they had reversed the statement, they would not even then
have done justice to our gallant troops. Ethan Allen, in his narative
says: Our loss was about 30 killed, and that of the enemy amounted to
300 killed including a Major
Grant
. The enemy's loss I learnt from the
corfession of their own officers, when a prisoner among them. I heard,
them likewise complain that the Green Mountain Boys took sight. After a
diligent enquiry I am satisfied that Colonel Allen's statement is
substantially
a correct one.
The sun had just burst over the long
range of eastern mountains, whose broad empurpled
sides lay looming in the distance, and a thousand
sparkling exhalations were rising from the storm
beaten encampment of the Green Mountain Boys.
16
Though deeply worn and fatigued by the forced
march of the previous day, and drenched to the
skin through the night, yet the troops were already
in motion, eagerly engaged in preparing themselves
for whatever emergency might follow, and while
hastily snatching their morning's repast, many an
eye was turned anxiously towards the quarters of
their gallant commander, where it was understood a
council of war was being held to determine whether to
continue their flight after the main army, or remain
to give battle to the pursuing enemy. At length
the officers were seen emerging from the quarters
in question, and with quickened steps returning to
their respective corps, while the increased activity
which succeeded throughout the camp indicated the
importance of the result now communicated.
`Well, Captain Selden,' said Warrington, as
rousing
himself from the reverie into which he had fallen
after the council had broken up, he looked around
and observed that his confidential friend now
remained
with him in the apartment, `what do you
think of the argument of Hale, and those who so
strenuously opposed our proposition of making a
stand against the enemy?'
`Quite as well of their arguments as their
patriotism
,
Colonel,' promptly answered the person
addressed
.
`Shakespeare never better evinced his
knowledge of the human heart than when he put
into the mouth of one of his secretly craven
boasters
the salvo argument that discretion is the better
part of valour.'
`The inference is a sharp one, Captain, but I fear
me, too well deserved. There was one thing,
however
,
which gratified me:not a single officer from
the Green Mountains opposed the proposition. And
it is so with the troops of my regiment: I was out
among them this morning, by daylight, to gather
their feelings on this subject; and though the poor
fellows were wet, weary and war-worn, I found our
Green Mountain Boys universally burning for the
encounter.'
`There is no doubt of it. But after all, Colonel,
I fear these preachers of prudence were prophesying
by instinct, when they told us we had a bloody day's
work before us. The force we are sure to
encounter
is perhaps, more than double our own; and we
know not how many more are on their way to
reinforce
them.'
`I am aware of all this. But as soldiers can we
longer endure the thought of being driven before the
foe?as citizens and settlers of these our mountain
homes, can we see the enemy marching into the heart
of our country, and strike no blow for its protection?
As little as the people expected our evacuation of
Ticonderoga, much less will they expect us to
continue
a flight, which will soon leave the whole
settlement
exposed to the ravages of the merciless
minions
of Burgoyne. With my own regiment alone,
I can make a successful stand against the force
which immediately menaces us with an attack; and
if more arrive, the reinforcements which St. Clair
will surely send us, when our express shall reach
him, will be in season for the rescue.'
`Gen. St. Clair
may
send us a reinforcement,
but'
`May? he must! And if he does, and will send
another force round into the rear to cut off the
enemy's retreat, they are all ours before sunset.
Think you Ethan Allen would be found longer
skulking
before the foe, or, if in St. Clair's command,
would suffer a man of them to return to the lake
alive, or uncaptured?'
`Never! but Ethan Allen is not our general.
And the man who suffered the enemy to get
possession
of every commanding post round Ticonderoga
till we had good reason to evacuate, may still, like
some of his humble imitators in our council just
now, think it prudent to take care of himself, and
leave us to do the same.'
At this moment the sergeant of the guard entered
the door.
`Colonel,' said he, `we have taken a prisoner this
morning, who came from the direction of the
enemy
;
and though he professes fair, and pretends
business
with you, yet having no pass, or papers of any
kind, and refusing to give any further account of
himself, we have kept him under guard, till we
thought you might have leisure to examine him.'
`What is he,a British soldier?'
`Noan Indian, or part Indian, I should think.'
`Bring him here, instantly,' said Warrington, with
an expression of interest.
The sergeant accordingly left the apartment, and
in a few moments returned with Neshobee by his
side, when, upon an intimation from his superior,
he withdrew, leaving his prisoner and the two
officers
by themselves.
`Neshobee, my good fellow,' exclaimed
Warrington
,
advancing to the native, and shaking him
cordially
by the hand, `I hope they have not misused
you; but how came you here?'
`Me come for purpose find you. Misses Alma'
`Alma Hendee! where is she?' eagerly
interrupted
the Colonel.
The Indian then related to his astonished
auditors
,
in his peculiar manner, the particulars of the
capture of the Hendee family, and all of the
subsequent
occurrences which had come to his knowledge
till he reached the American encampment.
`Execrable villain!' exclaimed Warrington with
unusual bitterness, after a few questions and answers
respecting the number and equipment of Sherwood's
gang had been rapidly exchanged between the
excited
officers and the native, `execrable villain! but
his triumph shall be a short one!'
`God grant it!' responded Selden with the same
spirit, `but what do you propose, Colonel?'
`To proceed instantly to their camp, storm it,
and rescue the captives within this hourif possible,
within this very hour!'
`And you are willing to risk, even at this
emergency
,
the absence of men enough to accomplish
it?'
`I must,as much as we may need them, I must
risk it. And would to God, that my duties would
permit me to head them, against this farrago of
fiends incarnate.Will you perform the service,
Captain
Selden?'
`Most joyfully.'
`Go, then. Take your company, including Jones
and as many of his scouts as you think best. If
you succeed, furnish the family with an escort to a
place of safety, or bring them to the rear of the
army
,
as circumstances shall dictate.Stay, Selden,
a moment,' he continued approaching the side of the
spirited and impatient young officer, and speaking
in a low confidential tone, `I am well aware that this
may be a day of dangerof death, to many of us
Tell that lovely girl her frank and noble explanation
has been received and appreciatedthat my heart
16*
has ever been, and is now doubly hersthat if I
survive, I will soon be by her side, and if I fall, my
last thoughts will be upon her.'
At that instant the quickly successive reports of
a dozen muskets in the direction of the expected
enemy broke the stillness of the morning,
announcing
a collision between the opposing outposts, and
the battle at hand.
`To arms!' exclaimed the commander, rushing
out into the open air, and leaping upon his charger,
that caparisoned and ready for his gallant rider
stood impatiently pawing the ground at the door, `to
arms, instantly to arms!'
As the loud, and thrilling tones of the well known
voice of their idolized leader rung through the camp,
falling upon the ears of the aroused and excited
troops, every man sprang for his musket, and the
busy quiet, that one moment before had reigned
through the tented lines, was at once changed into
the noisy din of preparation. Captain Selden, in
accordance with the arrangement just settled between
him and his superior, hastily formed his company,
briefly informed his men of the object of their
proposed
expedition, and, amidst the clangor of rattling
steel and rolling drums, mingled with the stern,
brief words of command, filed off rapidly across the
field towards the northern forest, and, with
Neshobee
as guide, soon disappeared within its borders.
Let us now return to the captured. The first
object
that saluted the eyes of our hapless heroine, on
recovering her consciousness, was the dimly seen
figure of Sherwood standing in the door-way,
in the attitude of one whose attention on entering
had been suddenly arrested by some unexpected
sight or sound behind him. The next instant a man
on horseback came dashing up furiously to the spot.
Hastily closing the door behind him, Sherwood
immediately
advanced to the side of the halted
horseman
;
when the following dialogue distinctly reached
the ears of the eager listener within.
`Captain Sherwoodain't it?'
`YesRemington, I believe, from the voice?
Well, what news?'
`Importantgreatglorious!'
`Aha, what is it?'
`The Rebels have evacuated Ti.'
`The devil! and all escaped?'
`Every scoundrel of them, but their race is nearly
up.'
`Why? How? Where are they?'
`St. Clair, with the bulk of them made shift to
push on to Castleton by dark,Warrington with a
regiment or two, now lies encamped at Seleck's
farm, right against us over on the military road.
Gen. Frazier, who followed hard on their tracks
through the day, lies at Lacy's Camp, with his
brigade
;
and Red Hazle and his Jarmans are but a
few miles behind.'
`And what is Frazier's plan?'
`To move upon Warrington at daylight; and he
told me to tell you to be on hand when the attack is
made,flank the rebels in the woods, and keep on
ahead of them to cut off their retreat. But the
order
need'nt interfere with your business here,' added
the traitor, with a knowing chuckle, pointing
towards
the house with one hand, and giving his master
a significant nudge with the other:There's no
need of your marching before break of day; so you
see you'll have time to'
`Hush! speak lower, you prying devil,she'll
hear you.'
`Well, well; but what is to be my share for this
night's job?'
`British gold,Burgoyne will see to that.'
`Yes, I know that; but I mean what share of the
same kind of coin that you are about to make free
with?You understand me, hey?'
`That's asking more than you have any right to
expect, Remington.'
`The hell it is! I know there is game to be
had, and if I can't have my share, when my betters
are helping themselves, I'll know the reason why,
by'
`Yes, but don't get in a passion about it: Something
of the kind may be effected for you, perhaps. The
Scotch girl is promised to Darrow; but there are
two maids. It can be managed, possibly'
`To night?'
`Whywhy, not very convenientlyif you will
delay it till to morrow nightbut hush! hush!
who is that?who is that coming in such haste?'
hurriedly exclaimed Sherwood, as startled by the
sound of rapidly approaching footsteps, he looked
round and distinguished the figure of some one
hastily
making his way towards them.
`It is the lieutenant's gait,' observed Remington,
whose situation on his horse enabled him best to
determine
the point in question. `And it is Darrow,
too, ain't it?'
`Yes, I am the chap,' responded the ruffian
striding
up to the spot. `Where is the Captain?O
here! Jake, the devil is to pay?'
`What is the matter?' eagerly asked Sherwood.
`Why, it may be matter enough for us soon, if
what Remington here says about the rebels being
so near us, is trueHendee's cursed Indian has
escaped
!'
`Hell and furies! Bill, who suffered that?'
`The lubberly curse that you set to guard the red
scamp in the corner of the barn got asleep, I spose;
and the confusion and crowding caused by the
storm prevented any one else from seeing to it.'
`How long has he been gone?'
`These two hours, for aught I can ascertain.'
`Did you see any thing that could be taken for
the imp, on your route, Remington?'
`No Captain. As soon as I found the rebels
were on the road, I rode several miles round, in
by-roads
,
to reach the British camp.'
`Well, Darrow, we must move,' said Sherwood
after musing a moment: `I know that fellow well.
He will know what to do without being told, and
will be as cunning as Satan in bringing it about. In
beating about for help to rescue the family, he will
learn Warrington's position, which ten to one he
has reached before this. You, as well as I, can
guess what will come next. Within an hour, a
hundred
of Warrington's bull dogs may be upon us,
with ambuscades in every direction around us. We
must march, and that instantly. Our private plans,
Bill, must be deferred till another night. And, by
that time, I am thinking, there wont be enough left
of the damned scoundrel, or his men, to trouble us.
We will take to the hill on the south end of the
pond yonder. The moon is coming out; and this
breeze will shake the water from the trees, so that
we can make our way comfortably. Go forward,
Darrow, and be mustering the men. Remington,
let me mount that horse, till we enter the woods.
Guards! ho! you may close up round the house
now, and in a few moments we will relieve you of
your charge.'
If ever an offering of unfeigned, unmingled
gratitude
ascended to Heaven from the lips of mortals
for boon bestowed, it was that of Alma Hendee, as
on bended knees she poured out the incense of her
gushing and grateful heart to her divine Preserver
for this temporary deliverance from the perils that so
nearly threatened her. She had scarcely risen from
her devotions, when a messenger from Sherwood's
quarters entered, and summoned her to attend him
to the other cabin. She obeyed with cheerful
alacrity
,
and, in a few moments more, was in the silent
embrace of her friends, receiving the low
murmurred
caresses and blessings of her overjoyed father,
on whose bosom she lay sobbing till interrupted by
the stern, harsh voice of Darrow at the door,
commanding
them all to come forth, to be taken along
with the band in the movement which had been so
hastily concerted by the alarmed leaders!
On emerging from the house the prisoners found
the entire band of their captors drawn up in the
yard, waiting only to receive them before
commencing
the contemplated march. And, after the
former
had been ordered to take their places near the
centre of the line, separated from each other by the
alternate intermingling of guards as on the
afternoon's
march, the whole moved silently forward
across the pasture in the direction previously
mentioned
by their leader. When they arrived at the
outskirts of the clearing, Sherwood relinquished the
horse, upon which he had thus far superintended the
march, to Remington, and, after sending off the
latter on some secret destination, took his station at
the head of his forces, and plunged directly into the
forest. After many windings through the pathless
and still dripping woods, for the purpose of
confusing
or misleading their enemies, in any attempts
which might be made to follow the trail, they bore
down towards the pond, and soon struck into an old
Indian path running along the margin of the water
towards the south. In this they slowly pursued their
dark, and often difficult way, till day-light; when
arriving at the southern extremity of the pond, and
being here, as they believed, out of the reach of any
immediate danger from pursuit, they withdrew a
short distance from the vicinity of the water, and
halted to wait the operations of the hostile armies,
being now within a short distance of the clearing in
which the action was expected to take place.
After scouts had been despatched to watch the
movements of Warrington's forces, and some time
spent in inspecting their arms, and preparing them
for instant service, the band, at the intimation of
their leaders, proceeded to partake of a hasty
repast
,
consisting mostly of bread and dried meats,
which each produced from his own knapsack, with
the exception of the officers and captives, for the
supplying of whom one of Captain Hendee's horses,
loaded with provisions and tent-cloths, had followed
in the rear. A scanty portion of this kind of food,
with a gourd-shell of water, was, after a while, sent
to the faint and wearied prisoners by Sherwood, who
seemed studiously to avoid coming himself into their
immediate presence. The meal was partaken by
the captives in gloomy silence, which, except here
and there in the ribald jest of a tory, or the low
guttural grunt of a savage, was imitated by the
mongrel
gang of ferocious and brutal looking fellows
around them.
Scarcely had they finished their homely repast,
when a rattling peal of distant musketry, followed
by the sound of rolling drums furiously beating to
arms, came booming through the forest, awakening
the echoes of hill and dell for miles around, and
startling both captives and captors by the sound,
now well understood by all as the herald of the
approaching
conflict.
`To the hills! forward to a station on the hills!'
loudly shouted Sherwood, now for the first time
openly exercising the command in the presence of
the prisoners.
Hastily forming a line of march, Sherwood, with
quick and eager steps led his men up the ragged
steeps towards his proposed station, leaving the
brutal
Darrow, who had charge of the rear, in which
the captives were now placed, to goad on the infirm
old captain, and the tender, and already exhausted
females, to keep pace with the rest. After a rapid
and fatiguing march of half an hour, at almost every
step of which the forest around them was
resounding
to the roar of the thickening conflict on the
plains to the right, they reached the summit of a
wood covered hill, which overlooked the extensive
opening to the west, now occupied as the scene of
action by the contending armies. Immediately
detaching
about a dozen of his most trusty tories with
Darrow at their head to guard the prisoners,
Sherwood
,
with the remainder of his force, proceeded
some forty or fifty rods down the hill, and took his
station in the bushes bordering the opening, to wait
a favorable opportunity to co-operate with his British
friends. The guard, on the departure of Sherwood,
wishing to take a stand themselves where they could
witness the battle, ordered the captives forward to
the brow of the hill, and permitted them to take
seats upon the edge of a cliff which afforded them,
through the openings of the overhanging foliage, a
distinct view of the field of conflict. A grand and
thrilling spectacle now burst upon their view. At
the distance of less than a mile, in the broad field
beneath them, stood the plain and hardy sons of
liberty, unflinchingly engaged face to face, and
often
arm to arm, in deadly strife with the gorgeous
and disciplined bands of their outnumbering foes,
the fluttering standards and glittering arms of
wheeling
squadrons now flashing in the morning sun, and
now enveloped in clouds of eddying smoke, as the
fires of a thousand death-tubes blazed fiercely along
the opposing lines; while hill and forest around
seemed rocking responsive to the deafening
thunders
of the embattled plain. With an interest equally
intense, but with emotions widely different, was the
scene witnessed by the little group of captives: for
while Alma and Jessy gazed in silent awe upon the
fearful spectacle, trembling and amazed at the
tremendous
din that rose from the spot, and with
bosoms
painfully beating with secret anxiety for the
fate of their betrothed lovers, engaged, as they
believed
,
in the hottest of the strife, and exposed
every
instant to the missiles of death, or already
weltering
in their gore among the dying and dead,
while, with such agitating emotions gazed they upon
the scene, Captain Hendee watched the progress of
the contest with the experienced eye of a soldier,
and with a view to its general results. For nearly
an hour the battle raged with unmitigated fury.
Alternately
driving and driven, the contending foes,
17
without any permanent advantage to either, fiercely
disputed for the mastery of the field; while volley
after volley, bursting in rapid succession along the
serried lines of the opposing fronts, continued to
sweep the plain with the leaden tempest, covering it
with heaps of the dying and the dead. At length
there was a momentary lull in the din of battle.
Even the `stormy music' of the shriek-drowning
drum for an instant ceased to send up its
monotonous
roar from the field of conflict. And all beneath
the broad and veiling cloud of smoke, that hung
over the spot, at first seemed as silent as if that cloud
had been a pall for an army of the dead. The next
moment, however, a sound reached the quick ears of
the female captives more fearful than the thunders
of battle.
`List! what is that?' asked the girls, with a
simultaneous
exclamation, and looks of horror, as the
piercing and mingled wail of many voices came
wafting on the breeze with awful distinctness to the
ear. `Oh, father, what dreadful sound is that?'
repeated
Alma, with a shudder.
The old gentleman, whose less acute organs had
not been affected by the sound, without replying,
turned an ear towards the fatal field. The same
hideous, though low and distance-mellowed screech,
came up again from the spot with the succeeding
undulation of the fitful breeze, but was the next
instant
lost in a fresh burst of martial music, which
once more sent its swelling roar over the
surrounding
hills.
`It is the cries of the wounded!' said the
Captain
,
turning to his unheeding auditors, for they sat
with their hands tightly pressed upon their ears to
exclude the abhorrent sound. `But it is overit is
over now,' he continued, motioning them to
withdraw
their hands.
Understanding the gesture rather than the words,
the girls hesitatingly unstopped their ears, and
turned
a mute and startled look of enquiry upon the
Captain.
`It was the groans of the wounded,' resumed the
Captain. `It is, indeed, a dreadful sound to one
not inured to the horrors of war. The first time I
ever heard it, I well remember, it made my hair rise
upright on my head, and filled me with more terror
and dread than the bullets of the enemy. But it
does not often occur, and should never, as it
disheartens
the men; yet it will sometimes happen
when some sudden change in the order of battle is
taking place on both sides at the same moment.'
`And do you suspect any important change is
about to take place in the present battle, father?'
anxiously enquired Alma.
`I do, child. I can perceive there is a movement
going on among our troops. There! do you see
that officer dashing at full speed along the lines, as
he occasionally appears in the openings of the
lifting
smoke? He is is rallying and forming for a
fresh onset, and is probably the chief in command,
who you understood was to be'
`It is! is he!' exclaimed Alma, with trembling
eagerness. `Yes, it is he, and yet spared, thank
Heaven!' she added, checking herself, and sinking
her voice into an almost inaudible whisper, `but
Oh! the perils which the next moment may
surround
him!' and she buried her face in her hands
to conceal her emotion.
`Well, whether Warrington or another,' observed
the Captain, `the officer in command there is
winning
glory for himself and his country. I have
never
seen a defence against a superior force conducted
with more ability than he has displayed, nor a field
disputed with more determined intrepidity than this
by the men under him; at least by all those who
have yet engaged. But there is one battalion
standing
aloof by the copse, yonder, whose movements I
neither understand nor like. I wonder who they
are?'
`That is Colonel Hale's regiment,' said a voice
from the rear, `we have no great fears of him, or
his men; but them dare-devils in the thickest of it,
there, are Green Mountain Boys, and I'll ownbut
they've got to knuckle soon, for Red Hazle can't
now be more than a mile, or so, off, and then'
The Captain turned his head, and beheld in the
speaker the traitor Remington, who had arrived
unperceived
,
and now stood unblushingly, and with a
malicious and exulting lear, looking him in the face.
The double-faced villain, however, was met by the
old veteran with such a withering look of scorn and
contempt, as caused him to pause in his remarks,
and soon to slink away behind the guards.
Muttering a few deep and bitter curses upon the
object of his aversion, on whom he looked as the
despicable instrument of his present misfortunes,
Captain Hendee again turned to watch the progress
of the battle.
`Keep your eyes on the field, girls,' said the old
gentleman, after closely scanning the appearance of
the belligerent forces a moment. `They are
evidently
on the eve of some important evolution. There!
see there! there goes the fire of our whole line
upon
them in a single blaze! Ah! that fire must have
told dreadfully on the enemy!' he continued, with
an exulting air, while waiting for the dispersion of
the smoke that, curling its wavy folds over the
American lines, at this terrible volly, concealed for
an instant both them and their foes completely from
view. `Yes, dreadfully, as they acknowledge, by
not returning the fire. There, you can just see their
scarlet lines now,and in confusion! staggering and
recoiling in confusion, as I live! And by Jupiter!
see! how like lightning the black masses of the
continentals
are throwing themselves into columns!
They charge! they charge! Heavens! what a clash
of encountering steel!but no wavering in the
charging columns yet. On they move! And by
the Lord of Heavens! the Red-coats give way
before
them! They reel,break, and runyes, see!
see! the poor beaten devils are fairly taking to their
heels! ha! ha! Hurra for the Green Mountain
Boys! ha! ha! ha! ha!' And the excited old
veteran
,
breaking the restraint which his situation, as a
closely guarded prisoner, had imposed, leaped up,
and clapped his hands in gleeful exhultation.
`Stop that dn'd old fool's gab!' shouted the
nettled and chafing Darrow, who, having taken a
separate station in the bushes, some rods distant,
stood deeply absorbed in the movements of the field,
when the old gentleman's exclamations reached his
ears: `stop his gab, I say! or spit him on your
bayonet
,
and hurl him over the cliff. Hell! Here, let
me comeI may as well have my revenge now as
ever.'
As with angry growls Darrow was hastening
through the bushes to the spot, the nearest guard
brought down his piece, and drew back for a thrust
at the Captain with his bayonet; but in the act, he
suddenly started, dropped his musket, gave a
convulsive
17*
screech, sallied back, and was on his way to
the earth, when the sharp and stunning report of a
dozen rifles, from the back of the hill, burst upon the
ears of the startled captives, and their no less
astonished
captors, who, in their eagerness to see the
action
had neglected to keep watch against a surprise
from pursuing enemies from the woods.
`There! take that, damn you!' exclaimed
Darrow
,
as more intent on accomplishing his meditated
revenge than attempting a defence, he sprang
forward
,
the instant he perceived himself attacked,
within
a rod of the captives, discharged his pistol at
Captain Hendee, and, without waiting to see the
effect
of his shot, which his eager haste had luckily
rendered a vain one, jumped off the cliff, and,
venturously
leaping from shelf to shelf down the
precipice
,
disappeared in the direction of Sherwood's
station at the foot of the hill.
The surviving tories, for four of them had been
stretched lifeless upon the earth by the shot of their
assailants, discharged their guns at random towards
the covert of their yet unseen foes, and fled along
the cliff to the south, to gain the gorge where
Sherwood
and his party had descended. But they were
a moment too late to effect their object. The
movement
having been perceived by Selden's party, for,
as the reader has doubtless already anticipated, the
assailants were no other, they suddenly closed up
that end of their line, and cut off the retreat of the
fugitives, who, quickly tacking about, commenced
their flight back towards the captives, with the view
of escaping along the ledge to the north of them.
`Aha! ye scampering satans, you can't go that
this time!' exclaimed the sharp and rattling voice
of Pete Jones, who with a dozen sturdy fellows at
his heels, at that instant burst through the bushes,
and came down like a whirlwind, upon the baffled
tories in time to prevent them from gaining the
thicket in the rear of the captives,`spread out
there, boys, and be ready to give 'em the lead at the
word,' continued the scout, motioning to his men,
who promptly complying, cocked their rifles, and
throwing themselves into a half circle, continued
with hasty steps to advance upon the affrighted
wretches, now standing huddled together on the
brink of the precipice, and looking wildly around
them for some chance to escape.
`Now, ye painted divils,' resumed Jones, still
drawing up with leveled rifle, `now you have got to
jump, or take it.'
`Misunderstanding the real intentions of the scout,
which were to frighten, and then give quarters, and
expecting to be shot down the next instant, the
tories
threw down their guns, and with one consent,
plunged madly from the cliff!
`Blood and Bayonets! who would have thought
that?'exclaimed the woodsman, in tones of
mingled
horror and surprise, as he stepped up and peered
over the brink, from which, down a broken, but
nearly perpendicular descent of over an hundred
feet, this desperate leap had been taken. `Now I'll
be blamed, if it don't make me feel uglyonly see
'em there!' he continued, gazing down upon the
mangled wretches at the foot of the precipice, with
an expression of the deepest commiseration, `only
see! three or four lay there in a heap, panting and
quivering at the last gasp! And there's the rest,
just crawling off into the bushes like snakes with
their backs broke! Howsomever,' he added,
turning
away with an effort to shake off the feeling, `we
can't very well afford the poor devils a great deal of
lament, for the same sarce would have been ours,
if we'd fell into the hands of their sort of cattle, jest
as sure as Tory is their name, and infarnal their nater.'
In the meanwhile Selden, followed by the rest of
his company, had reached the spot; and the former
having flown to the side of his overjoyed Jessy and
her friends, the now liberated captives, was
exchanging
those hasty and heartfelt greetings, which the
circumstances were so well calculated to call forth,
when a new and startling war-cry rose from the
thicket below, where he had just learned from his
rescued friends that Sherwood with the main part
of his band was posted.
`Do you hear that, my brave fellows?' exclaimed
the young officer in a tone that rung through the
forest, as he burst from the group of his embracing
friends, and, with a look of kindling enthusiasm,
leaped forward towards his men, `do you hear that
rallying shout below? But let them come! The
red-coats are flying in confusion before our friends
in yonder field. Let their scurvy minions here in the
bush be taught the same lesson. Every man to his post!'
Responding with hearty and reiterated cheers to
the words of their gallant leader, the men flew to
their stations along the ridge to await the approach
of their foes, who were now evidently rallying for a
rescue.
At this instant a shower of bullets struck the
crags at the very feet of the captives.
`Jones, your assistance!' shouted Selden, rushing
back to the group who had thus narrowly escaped
death, and pointing him to Alma, as he himself
grasped his own affianced girl in his arms, and with
rapid steps bore her back nestling and trembling on
his bosom to a place of temporary safety over the
screening ridge in the rear.
Comprehending the other at a glance, the scout
bounded forward to the side of Miss Hendee, at that
instant engaged in trying to quiet the alarms of her
less self-possessed domestic, when concluding to give
the order of his superior its most liberal construction,
he gave a swoop with his long arms, and gathering
both mistress and maid in his grasp, and lifting them
high from the ground, bore them, blushing through
their alarms, at their novel situation aloft, over the
hill, occasionally pausing in his monstrous strides
over rock and log, to give a wink to Neshobee to
follow his example with Zilpah, the only female now
left on the spot of danger.
`Guess you catch um first,' tartly observed the
yellow maiden, eluding the hesitating grasp of her
bashful gallant, and darting forward like an arrow
towards her friends.
`Where is my father?' enquired Alma with a look
of concern, the instant she was released from the
arms of the scout.
`Your father, mum?' replied Jones, `O, didn't
yer see him?Why, that careless shot of the enemy
there among you jest now seemed to raise the old
Captain's dander right up, and seizing the gun of
that dead tory, that my old Trusty here brought
down in such good time for the old gentleman, I'll
be blest if he didn't hobble off like the very
mischief
to help the boys man the cliff. And your tame
red skin has concluded to do the same thing, I
reckon
,
seeing as how he got the mitten,' added the
scout, tipping a knowing and saucy wink to Zilpah.
A general discharge of rifles and musketry by
Selden's party along the top of the ridge to the
south, here interrupted the conversation, announcing
that the enemy had made their appearance on their
way up the hill towards the accessible points in the
ledge.
`That must be a feint,' observed Captain Selden;
`they cannot be serious in any attempt to mount
the ridge in the very teeth of our death-dealing
rifles
,
can they, Jones?'
`No, Captain, that an't no part of their
calkerlation
,
I'll swear to it. Neither need we have any fears
of their flanking round the ledge to the north of us,
as that might bring 'em between two fires, one from
us, and another from the field. So, while a few of
'em are showing themselves, and firing jest enough
to keep up the sham, the main part will push round
at the other end of the ridge, about a half mile or
so, to the south of us. And I should'nt be
surprised
if the lead was flying considerable thick along
here in the matter of twenty minutes from now
what suppose you put the women a jogging,
Captain
;
and let me be looking to the sarpents a little,'
added the scout, glancing uneasily around him, and
showing signs of impatience to be gone.
`You are right, Jones,' promptly replied Selden,
`and there is now but one course to be pursued.
The ladies must pass down the hill, and, striking for
the open field, endeavor to gain the rear of our
army
.
I must attend them, leaving the command of
the men with you to cover our retreatcan you do
it?'
`Why, I rather guess I mought; that is, if you
will clear with the womenthe sight of them kinder
clogs a fellow, you know.'
`Call in Captain Hendee, then. He is not nimble
enough for a bush fight. Send us also Neshobee,
and two of my men as an escort.'
`Ay, ay, Captain,' cheerfully responded the scout,
loping off at a rapid pace to his charge`Ay, ay,
we'll fix it about right, won't we, old Trusty? Trol,
lol, lol, de larly.'
Within five minutes from the disappearance of
Jones, the family party were all collected, and in
rapid motion down the hill. Nor was the
expedition
with which the movement was accomplished
uncalled for by the event: For scarcely had they
proceeded a furlong on their rout, before the
cracking
and irregular reports of rifles behind them
announced
an attack by the foe in a manner just
predicted
by the sagacious scout. Passing onward
with all the speed they were capable of making,
they paused not in their course till they reached the
spot where they and their captors had halted in the
morning. There, after taking charge of Captain
Hendee's horse, which had been left tied to a tree,
and ascertaining from the direction and distance of
the firing at the scene they had just left, that Jones
was at least maintaining his position on the hill, they
turned short to the west, and made their way
immediately
to the opening, where the main action, as
was evident from the heavy discharge of artillery
that occasionally came pealing through the forest,
was still kept up by the slowly retreating enemy.
On arriving at the borders of the woods, our party
entered the mouth of a ravine, which, while it
protected
them, by its screening banks, from the view of
any spies whom Sherwood might have posted on
the hill, luckily led up, and opened upon the plain,
directly abreast of the position now occupied by
Warrington's regiment of Green Mountain Boys.
Passing hastily along, in Indian file, up this ravine
till fairly beyond rifle-shot distance from the woods,
and arriving by this time at an elevation, where, still
unseen, they could easily obtain a glance over the
scene of action, the company halted for the purpose
of ascertaining, before proceeding any further, the
exact position of the American forces, and the
prospect
of maintaining the temporary advantages which
they had evidently already obtained over the
boasted
brigade of the gallant, but now mortified
General
Frazier.
A misty veil of undissipated smoke still hung over
the field of battle, and prevented Selden and
Captain
Hendee, who mounted the bank for the
purpose
,
from ascertaining any thing more than the
general position of the hostile armies. The
Americans
having pursued their routed enemies a short
distance, had fallen back upon the ground occupied
by them at the onset; while the British, having
collected
and rallied their broken and disordered forces,
had made a sullen stand about half a mile distant.
`Our troops have beaten the red-coats and driven
them from the field of attack, it is evident;'
observed
Selden musingly, as he ran his eye anxiously
over the field, `and yet, I fear, their temporary
victory
has been bought too dearly to permit them to
avail themselves of the advantages they have
obtained
.'
`I fear so too,' replied Captain Hendee, `nor do
I exactly like the aspect and motions of the enemy
yonder.See! they are now deploying off towards
the woods against our left wing. They are either
preparing for a fresh onset in a new form, or
opening
for a reinforcement large enough to form a
center
;
and I am apprehensive the latter, as, now I
bethink
me, I heard a treacherous scoundrel, who
came near us a few moments before you arrived for
our rescue, making the boast that a fresh body of
Burgoyne's German hirelings were but a mile or
two distant, and in full march for the field.'
`God forbid!' exclaimed Selden, with a look of
anxiety and alarm. `But this must instantly be
seen to. Perhaps our officers are not aware of it.
I must immediately forward to Warrington. Keep
your position here, my friends, till I return, which
shall be soon, better informed how to act, and with
some plan for your disposal, or escape,' added the
young officer, as leaping down into the valley, he seized
the horse from the hands of Neshobee, mounted, and,
waving a hasty adieu to the ladies, dashed forward
at full speed over the plain to the American lines.
Captain Hendee, still retaining his post of
elevation
,
continued anxiously to watch those movements
of the enemy which had raised his suspicions of an
approaching reinforcement. Nor had many minutes
elapsed before his worst apprehensions were
confirmed
by the appearance of Reidesel, who with
flying
colours and rattling drums, and all the pomp
and pride of military array, came pouring the numerous
troops of his well trained brigade across the field,
and bearing down in solid columns directly upon
the American centre, which stood calmly awaiting
their approach; while at the same time, Frazier,
with his whole force, a little in advance of the
Germans
,
moved rapidly along under the woods to the
South against the extreme left of the Americans,
mostly composed of the doubtful regiment of Hale.
A few moments of awful suspense followed; and
again the flash of a thousand exploding muskets
enveloped
the encountering hosts in clouds of rolling
18
smoke, and shook the earth and heavens with the
fearful concussion that followed.
At that instant Selden, accompanied by a soldier
with two horses, emerged from the smoke and came
galloping to the spot.
`Prepare for instant flight!' he exclaimed,
hastily
dismounting, and urging his horse down the bank
towards the little grassy nook on which the females
stood instinctively crowding together in mute
consternation
at the fearful noise and commotion of the
plain above. `Ten minutes delay on this spot may
again make you prisoners, and in the hands of a
brutal and exasperated soldiery.'
`There is no hope, then, that our troops can long
withstand this fresh and formidable onset?' said
Captain Hendee, coolly preparing to mount the horse
allotted to carry him and his daughter, in the manner
in vogue among the settlers of carrying their females
behind them on horseback.
`Scarcely longer perhaps than to allow us time
to gain the forest,' replied Selden, placing Jessy on
the crupper of his own horse, and springing himself
into the saddle before her, while the little cavalcade,
the two maids having been placed on the back of
the third horse, began to move slowly down the
rocky and frequently obstructed ravine.
`I feared so,' said the former; `but where in the
name of Heaven is St. Clair all this time, that he
sends no reinforcement?'
`Well may you ask that, Captain Hendee,' said
Selden bitterly`within hearing of our gunswith
a full knowledge of our attack by a superior force,
and with more than two thousand troops at disposal,
all impatient to be with us, he allows not a man to
come to our assistance. God forgive him! I can't.'
`Nor I; but what of that dainty-fingered colonel,
whom I noticed from the hill standing aloof and idle
with his regiment at a distance on the left?'
`Hale? Eternal infamy on his name! Having
looked coldly on, and without lifting a finger in
assistance
through the whole of the first assault, he,
on the approach of Frazier in this last onset, hoisted
a white flageven before it could be seen by the
enemy, and disgracefully surrendered his regiment,
with all the chance in the world to save it by retreat.
And by this craven act he has thrown all that
important
part of the field into the possession of the
British, who are already sweeping past us, and
securing
the roads to the south, leaving our brave
friend Warrington with his regiment of heroes,
(scores of whom are stretched bleeding, or lifeless
on the field,) and the gallant Colonel Francis with
his battalion of Massachusetts troops, to contend
with a fresh force of more than double their
numbers
.
But they must soon give waynot to retreat
in a body, for every pass by which that could be
effected
is now closed against them,much less to
surrender themselves as prisoners, but to break,
scatter
and save themselves as they best can, to rally
again in some appointed place round the standard
of their lion-hearted leader.'
`And which way do you and Warrington propose
for our flight, after reaching the forest?'
`An old by-road leading from the head of yonder
pond directly across the country to Otter Creek, and
there intersecting the Creek road to Pittsford and
the older settlements. One of our guards, here
must be despatched to call in Jones with a dozen
trusty men to guard us on our way, while the rest
of my company shall keep the accursed Sherwood
and his gang, if possible, engaged, that he may
have no way to discover the route we have taken till
we are beyond the reach of his malice. But hark!
'tis a shout of triumph from, the British lines!
Forward with all possible speedfor God's sake,
forward to the woods!'
Dashing onward at the word, the whole party in
a moment more gained the confines of the forest,
and quickly disappeared within its recesses, thus
escaping
the dangers of the field, where they had been
nearly involved in the general
melee
of dispersing,
pursued and pursuing combatants, that ensued at
the close of that fierce and bloody conflict, but
escaping
only to encounter other perils, in their flight
through the woods, of a still more fearful and
dreaded
character.
CHAPTER XII.
The hour of fate draws on.
The
setting sun was throwing his parting beams
of rich and mellow light, in a thousand variegated
hues, over the intermingling foliage of the deciduous
and perennial forest, that deeply clothed the
mountain
slopes to the eastward of the sluggish Otter.
The hardy and heroic woman, whose lot had been
cast in the wilderness on the banks of that stream,
and whose curious abode we have described in a
former chapter, still fearlessly retained her post, in
spite of all the terrors and dangers of an invasion
which had driven every settler, to the north and west
of her, from his home, and laid open all that section
of the Grants, to her very doors, to the unopposed
ravages of British and savage foes.
Her toils for the day being over, she was now
sitting at the door of her rude cabin, enjoying, with
an anxious and thoughtful brow, the grateful
coolness
of the evening air, while her hopeful brood of
embryo foresters were lolling upon the grass, or
gamboling in childish freaks around her.
`O, mother! what was it that I seed over yonder,
that twinkled kinder white in the bushes, just now?'
exclaimed one of the younger boys, starting up with
excited looks, and pointing to the opposite side of
the creek at a spot some distance up the stream,
where the clearing, extending to the water, afforded
a fair view of the forestlined banks of the western
side of the river.
The mother started, and threw a quick glance in
the direction thus indicated, but perceiving nothing,
she sank back into her seat, and observed, `I doubt
whether you saw any thing, my son; but if you did,
it was probably a flock of pigeons, or some other
birds rising from the ground.'
`No it want, mother,' replied the boy
confidently
,
`it want birds! It was something coming proper
fast along this way, by an open place in the trees,
and looked jist like folks running with white clothes
on.'
Aroused by this last remark, as well by the eager
and confident manner in which it was made, Mrs.
Story hastily rose, advanced a few steps, and sent
an anxious and scrutinizing look along the opposite
bank in search of the object that had so excited the
18*
boy's attention. That object was the next moment
disclosed to her in the partial view she obtained of
a small company of both sexes on horseback, urging
forward their smoking and jaded steeds with all
possible
haste towards the landing on that side of the
stream. She had been accidentally apprised that
the Hendee family were on their way south the day
previous, and having heard a distant, heavy firing,
in the direction they had taken, the fore part of the
present day, and coupling these circumstances with
the hurrying and alarmed appearance of the
approaching
company, a painful apprehension now
flitted across her mind; and, with an air of deep
concern, she stepped inside the door, took down her
rifle, and began to proceed, at a hurried pace, towards
the creek. Some doubt, however, seeming to arrest
her steps, she stopped short, and again gave eye and
ear to objects before and around her. The report
of several rifles, some hundred yards up the stream,
followed by the distant shout of skirmishers, at that
instant reached the spot, and at once resolved her
doubts. Turning hastily to her children, now
huddling
with looks of alarm around her, and ordering
them into the house, she flew down the path through
the woods to her landing, drew out her canoe from
its concealment, and springing in, pushed out boldly
for the opposite shore, at which she arrived just as
the fugitives, with soiled and torn garments, and
way-worn and troubled looks, came hurrying up to
the spot.
`God bless you for for this timely promptitude,
Mrs. Story,' exclaimed Selden, leaping from his
horse, and assisting the females and the infirm and
sadly jarred old veteran to dismount.
`You are pursued?' eagerly asked the widow.
`We are,' answered Selden, `and have been
every step of the way from the red field of
Hubbardton
.
We did not, however, intend to have
brought peril to your house. But striking across
the country to the creek, with the hope of escaping
up the road to Pittsford, we discovered the road to
be ambushed by a party of our outstripping foes,
and, as our only hope of escape, turned down stream
to find refuge at your abode. And even this we
never should have reached alive, but for the
protecting
rifles of that noble fellow, Pete Jones, and his
brave and trusty scouts, who are still keeping
fourfold
their numbers at bay till we can cross.'
`Well, heaven be praised for your deliverance so
far,' rejoined the widow, who still sat in her boat,
heading it up against the bank for the others to enter,
`but come, girls, jump in herewe will take you
over first.'
`Ay, ay,' said Selden, `there is not a moment to
be lost. And here, Neshobee,' he continued, as the
native, who had followed his friends on foot, now
arrived, `throw down your rifle, dash in there, and
swim across to bring back the boat, while I lead the
horses into a thicketperhaps they may be saved.
At all events there is no chance to swim them over
here.'
`The canoe will not carry us all safely,' said
Alma
,
in a quiet and sorrowful tone, as her
companions
,
who had first entered, seated themselves in the
boat.
`O, no dangernot the least; step in,' said the
widow encouragingly.
`No, let me remain,' replied the former. `There
will probably be no danger till the boat can return.
But if there should be,' she added in the same
plaintive
and desponding accents, `if there should be,
what matters it to me?'
`Alma Hendee!' said the widow, looking up at
the other with an air of mingled surprise and
expostulation
,
`how is this?where is your fortitude?'
The grief-stricken maiden made a slight effort to
speak, but the utterance died away on her quivering
lip, and the bright tear drops stood in her eyes.
`What has happened to her?' asked the woman,
looking round on the company with an expression
of wonder and concern.
`Warrington has fallen in battle,' replied Selden,
with an unsuccessful effort to speak without emotion.
`Now, Heaven forbid!' exclaimed the widow, in
accents which plainly told the shock which the sad
announcement had imparted to her feelings.
`Yes, the gallant fellow has left us,' resumed the
other. `The melancholy tidings were received from
a soldier, who joined us in our flight, and who said
he saw him fall dead from his horse in the last
moments
of the battle. But do not allow yourself to
despond, my dear Miss Hendee. You had better
go over now,' he added, soothingly, as he
approached
,
and gently urged the mutely sorrowful, but now
passive girl into the boat, which was instantly
headed
round, and, under the strokes of the strong
armed
widow, sent surging towards the other shore.
Stopping no longer than to see the females under
weigh, Selden sprang up the bank, seized the
horses
by their bridles, and whipping them into a lively
trot, led them into a neighboring thicket, tied them
to saplings, and flew back to the shore. The active
young Indian, who had readily undertaken to swim
the stream, had already returned with the canoe,
taken in Captain Hendee, and sat impatiently
waiting
,
with uplifted oar, to push again from the shore.
`There! now lay too with a will, my lad,' cried
Selden, leaping into the boat just as the scattering
fire of several rifles, quickly returned by that of a
much larger number, a short distance beyond, burst
from the bushes at a point now not more than a
quarter of a mile up the stream, apprising them that
the enemy were rapidly driving in Jones and his
party, who, as previously concerted, were retiring
before their pursuers in three divisions, each in turn
coming in front, discharging their pieces from their
coverts, and scudding on to the rear of the others
to reload and await the approach of their foes.
`If we can get one boat-load of men safely over,'
resumed Selden, `we shall be able, I trust, to
protect
the rest in crossing; and when all are over, I
hope to keep the rascals on their own side of the
river.'
`That may be done till dark, perhaps,' observed
Captain Hendee, `but with our small force, not
after
,
I think. No, Captain Selden, unless the
disposition
of these tories is less devilish than I rate it,
and the nature of their Indian allies has changed
since I used to deal with the hell-hounds, we may
as well prepare for a siege.'
`Let it come, then,' replied the other determinedly
`with the widow's Tother world for a
concealment
and strong hold for the women and children,
and those impervious logs of her cabin to protect
us while we fight, many a tory and red-skin must
take a leaden supper before they capture us. But
here we are, safe ashore. Neshobee, will you take
back the boat, or shall I?'
`Me go,no fraid,' answered the native, again
pushing out into the stream.
`Very well,I will remain to superintend the
transportation of the men. And you, Captain
Hendee
,
had better proceed immediately to the house,
and, if you will, be looking a little to the means of
defending it. An old soldier like yourself will
need no instructions in that duty. Hold out bright
hopes to the ladies, but see that they retire from the
upper world in season, and while they may,
undiscovered
,
if their passage to the lower, with which I
am unacquainted, is likely to expose them to the
sight of the enemy.'
`Ay, ay, I will see to it,' replied the other,
hurrying
off with unwonted activity to the cabin, where
he was met at the door by the widow.
`What is the prospect, Captain?' she asked in a
low, eager tone.
`The men will get over, I think, with few or no
losses, but'
`But what?'
`Those untiring fiends are after blood! Our men
have already to day made a heavy inroad on their
numbers, and they are determined on revenge. I
have no hope but that they will find means to cross
the creek and besiege us, as soon as it is dark.'
`Nor have I the least, since Alma has told me the
particulars of your disasters, and the conduct of that
wretch who has caused them. Hendee, I have long
known that Jake Sherwood, and have wondered at
your course.'
`I was dupeddeceived, Ann Story, but I have
been an egregious old fool even at that, I will own,
besides treating my own flesh and blood like a
tyrant and a brute. Furies! I could beat my own
brains out! If you were a man, and connected
with me as you are, you ought to curse me to my
face. A good round damming from a friendly
source would seem to relieve my feelings. But
where are the girls?'
`All within here. They have taken a litttle
refreshment
,
and seem getting up their spirits a little.'
`Well, we will not dampen their feelings at
present
;
but they, and you with your children, had
better
be on the move to your underground refuge.'
`That is easily gained now.'
`Why, you enter the creek, as formerly, don't you?'
`No, I have made a fine improvement this
summer
.
Come, attend me, and you shall see.'
`I will, but must first glance at the means we
shall have of defending the house, which we must
make our fortress, for beating off or weakening the
enemy. Your place of concealment below must be
the last resort of the men, if they enter it at all.'
They now entered the house and were met by
the anxious and enquiring looks of the girls, who
sat silently waiting to hear the news which the
Captain
might have brought from the scene of action.
`Has he'at length commenced Miss Reed,
unable
longer to repress her anxiety, but stopping short
and blushing at the exclusiveness of the enquiry she
was about to make, `hasthat is, is the danger
over?'
`We hope so,' replied the Captain, `at least there
can be but little danger for you females. Captain
Selden trusts to prevent the enemy from crossing.
He commands without, and I, for the present,
within
;
and I hope to find in you a brave garrison.'
`Jessy, at least, will prove no coward for herself, I
suspect,' remarked the widow a little archly.
`Well, both she and Alma are soldiers' daughters,'
resumed the Captain, `and should danger beset us
to-night, I trust they will bear themselves as they
have already done for the last twenty-four hours,
with firmness and fortitude. But now for the
business
on hand,' he added, turning to the hostess,
and glancing round the walls of the house.
`Very well, sir, and to begin, here is my double
plank doorbullet-proof, I think, and the fastenings
abundantly secure.'
`Yes, I have noticed, but what loop holes shall
we have to fire from, besides that window?'
`Here,' answered the widow, stepping up to one
of the walls, and pulling out a nicely fitting block
from a cone shaped embrasure cut through one of
the logs. `There are two of these on each side and
end of the house, and as many more just below the
eves in the chamber loft above.'
`Just the things for usand now if we had but a
long square block to fill that window'
`You have it at hand, with a loop like the rest, in
that block on which the children are sitting there.'
`Admirable! a regular fort, by George! Ann
Story, you ought to be the wife of a general. Let
us now proceed to your unfindable fastness below.'
`In an instant,' said the widow, going to the fire
and blowing up a torch. `Boys lift that door,' she
added, pointing to a trap door in the corner of the
room that opened into the cellar.
Followed by the Captain, the widow now
descended
through the trap in the floor on a short ladder
into the cellar, and going to the western side, and
removing a bundle of straw standing against the
wall, disclosed the entrance of a narrow, upright
passage, leading off into the earth, in the direction
of the river.
`Come on!' said the prompt and energetic
woman
,
plunging directly into the dark vaulted way
before her, as she held the torch partly before her
guest.
After proceeding several rods through this straight
and narrow passage, all smoothly cut through the
solid earth some distance below the surface, they
came to a lateral excavation, forming an arched
room about a dozen feet square.
`This is my half-way housemy innermost
recess
,'
said the widow, stepping into the center of the
room and holding up the light that the other might
see to examine. `This is a much stronger place
than the outer, or western room, which you have been
into before, I believe, as the earth is here much
thicker above us, owing to a swell in the surface,
over which, to make it still more difficult to dig
through, spread the widely branching roots of
several
large maples.'
`True,' replied the Captain, `and one man at
each entrance might defend the place against
hundreds
.
Ah! I plainly see that we old soldiers have
got to yield the palm to you, Ann: In all my
experience of twenty years among these northern
forests in fighting and dodging the enemy, and
planning, building, or seeking out places for forts,
defences and refuges, I never saw or thought of any
thing like this establishment of yours.'
`I can think of no way by which our foes can
rout us from this,' rejoined the widow, `unless they
storm us, or smoke us out. I believe I shall curtain
off this room with blankets for the children and
girls to night, while we give up the other room, if
needed, to our defenders. But you have seen
enough of this, let us pass on.'
They now entered the remaining part of the
passage
,
19
which, after running a few rods in a direct
line, and then winding round to the left, brought
them into the large partitioned room we have
formerly
described.
`This you have seen before,' said the widow,
pausing as they entered the room, `and there is
nothing new to show you here, except my stores;
those barrels,' she continued, pointing to two casks
standing just within the entrance of the smaller
room, `contain provisions, which, on the rumor of
the approaching invasion, I employed my neighbor
just before he left us, to purchase for me at Crown
Point.'
`Well, it is not impossible that we shall need
them,' remarked the Captain thoughtfully.
`Famine often follows closely in the footseps of
war,' resumed the other; `so I thought I would
supply
myself in season. Nor do provisions constitute
the whole of my supplies; for it occurring to me at
the same time that something like the present
emergency
might happen, I made another purchase, which
may be still more important to us.'
`What may that be?' asked the other.
`Stand back to the mouth of the entrance, take,
and hold up this torch, and I will show you,'
answered
the woman, proceeding to the opposite side
of the room, taking down a broad piece of bark,
which had been snugly fitted into the mouth of a
little, low chamber, or recess, excavated in the earthy
wall, and disclosing to view the ends of some half
dozen strongly bound casks, to which she now
directed
his attention with her finger.
`What have you there, Ann, so mysteriously hid
up,' said the old gentleman with a look of mingled
curiosity and surprise.
`Gun powder, with an abundance of loud behind
there to serve.'
`Indeed! but not all your own, surely?'
`No;only one is minethe rest belong to the
settlers, who live north of this, and who, expecting
that a stand would have been made against the
enemy
in this vicinity, had, it seems, amply provided
themselves for the crisis. But finding that resistance
would be useless, they concluded to flee; when,
getting wind of my strong hold, they brought their
munitions, which they were unable to carry with
them, to this place for safe keeping till they should
return or send for them.'
`Faith! that's lucky,' exclaimed the Captain. `It
may be wanted to supply the powder horns of the
men, andand'he continued partly to himself, as
he glanced about the room, with a look of wild and
exulting joy at the thought which seemed to strike
his mind, `and with the chance which these
underground
rooms and passages afford, as a last resort,
of blowing that infernal gang nearer heaven than
they will otherwise ever getbut time enough to
think of that when other measures fail.'
`What measures?' asked the widow, who, having
been busy in replacing the door of her magazine,
had not heeded the remarks of the other, except
two or three words at the close.
`O, nothing of any present moment,' answered
Captain Hendee, with the air of one willing to let
the words pass without being understood; `but let
us now see how you have fixed the outer entrance.'
Resuming her torch, the widow immediately led
the way through the passage to the entrance at the
bank of the Creek.
`There! having no further use for this entrance,
I have fastened it up,' said she, pausing as she
approached
the end of the avenue, which was blocked
up by a single layer of square short timbers, placed
horizontally across the passage and let into the
earth at the ends. `It can only be opened on the
inside, as you perceive, or at least, not easily; and
I have considered it a safe barrier, though, to be
sure, by considerable digging on the out sidebut
hush!hark! Do you hear that shouting out upon
the creek, or on its banks?'
`Ay; and it sounds as if there's trouble afoot too.
Cannot this top timber be removed without
danger
of exposing the entrance to the discovery of the
enemy from the opposite bank?'
`I should think so, as the mouth is pretty thickly
overhung with bushes.'
`Let us lift it out then, that we may see, or at
least hear, what is going on.'
The timber was accordingly carefully removed;
when through the crevice thus formed, a tolerable
distinct view was obtained of a long reach of the
creek above, and a short one below. The last boat
load of Selden's men had gained the middle of the
stream, and were pulling with all possible speed for
the hither shore, on which all those who had crossed
were posted behind their coverts, keenly watching,
with cocked and leveled pieces, for the first head
that should be raised on the opposite bank to fire
upon the boat. The boat's crew, as they had been
ordered, were all seated, save one man, who had
inadvertently
risen on his feet to point out to his
commander
on shore the object which had caused the
noise and stir that had reached the ears of the
widow
and her friend. The man's arm was still
extended
up the river with the motions of one trying to
count a series of some moving objects.
The widow, having the most favorable position
for the purpose, instantly turned her eyes in the
direction
thus indicated.
What can you see as the cause of the commotion?'
asked the Captain, after the other had gazed an
instant
in silence.
`Well, I confess, I don't know exactly what to
make of them,' replied the woman, as with a
puzzled
expression she still kept her eyes riveted on the
spot:`something is evidently crossing the creek,
nearly as far as I can see up the stream. At any
other time, I should think it must be a flock of
cranes with their long necks only above water.'
`It is the Indians!' exclaimed the Captain, in
low startling accents`it is the Indians, swimming
the Creek on their backs, and holding their guns
upright
on their breasts. I have seen their tricks
before
to day.'
At that instant a stream of smoke, accompanied
by the sharp crack of a rifle, shot out fiercely from
an old tree top on the opposite bank, while, at the
same time, the man standing in the boat fell over
backwards into the water, and sunk, to rise no more,
beneath its bubbling surface. An exclamation of
horror rose to the lips of the Captain and the
widow
;
but before it could be uttered, and while the
echoes of the last shot were yet ringing among the
neighboring hills, the stunning report of another
rifle
,
bursting from the bank directly over their heads,
and followed by a hollow groan, and a floundering
fall in the bushes on the other side, told that the
death of the victim was avenged.
`There! Jim Townley,' exclaimed the well known
voice of Pete Jones, on the bank above, `Old
Trusty has done the business for your murderer, I
19*
guess; though if he hadn't tore his coat so as to
make a white spot in his back, as he was slinking
away, I never could have got an aim worth firing
for. Well,' he continued, soliloquizing, as he appeared
to be reloading his piece, `that is the way with the
best of us. Jim was a fellow of first rate grit, and
I'd rather gin any thing but old Trustyyes, and
that too,than to have him gone so. But if spirits
can hear and see things, as some think, it will be a
grand comfort to one of Jim's spunk and pride, on
his way along up, to know that the bloody rascal
didn't live to brag on't.'
The survivors of the boat's crew, now reaching
the landing, sprang upon the bank, and took their
stations among their comrades along the shore, to
watch any further appearance of their foes. But
none daring to show themselves after the lesson just
received, a silence of some minutes now prevailed.
The calm was not destined, however, to last long.
Another cry of alarm was soon raised by one of the
men, eagerly calling on the rest to look down the
stream.
`O, the divils! the divils!' cried the shrill voice
of Jones, `they have stole our horses, and are
swimming
them across down there, with two of the
lubbers
on the back of every horse. By Judas! what
a chance to plug them, if I was only forty rods
nearer
!
Say, Captain Selden, what if I take two or
three men, and scud down that way a little?'
`No, Jones,' replied Selden, `our force is too
small to scatter. The Indians in a few moments
more will be upon us from above; besides, we have
not a man to lose in open fight. Let every one,
therefore,' he continued, raising his voice to a tone
of command, `retire from the bank, and, keeping a
tree in his range, repair directly to the house. Then
let them come with a welcome.'
`Well, the hour of trial is at hand,' observed the
widow with a sort of desperate calmness, `and may
God be merciful unto us. Assist me, Captain
Hendee
,
to replace this timber; and then I must
instantly
back to bring down my children and the girls.
The men will reach the house by the time we can
get there ourselves. There! that will doall safe,
I think. Now follow me as fast as your crazy old
limbs will let youcome onfasterfastercome
on! come on!' And with the old veteran, taxing
his powers of speed to the utmost to keep up the
fearless woman, though anxious mother, with her
torch streaming behind her, rather flew than walked,
till she had gained the cellar, and sprang up the
ladder
leading up into the room, where she had left the
objects of her solicitude.
`Here!' she exclaimed, raising her head through
the trap, and glancing round the room where the
females
,
ignorant of what had taken place without,
were unconcernedly sitting with the children,
hanging
about their chairs, `here, to the cellar, every
chick and child of you, to the cellar! And you,
girls, must follow, without a moment's delay,' she
added, seizing the little urchins by the waist, and
lifting them one by one in rapid succession down
the pass-way, as, alarmed by the startling tones of
their mother's voice, they ran huddling to the
entrance
.
`Is there any immediate danger?' asked Alma,
calmly, though with an expression of some surprise,
at the rapid and agitated manner of the widow.
`Not for us, if we are out of the way; but the
tories are crossing below, and the Indians, on this
side above, are, by this time, perhaps, within
gunshot
of us, in the skirts of yonder woods.'
`And Selden and his men?'eagerly said Jessy.
`Will be here in a moment to make this room
their fortress, for their own and our protection. And
a shower of balls, through that open door and
window
,
will probably salute them as they enter.
`True, true,' observed Captain Hendee, who
having
crowded by the widow on the ladder, and gained
the floor, now stepped to the door, hastily shut it, and
proceeded to bring the block for closing up the
window
,
`true, this danger to the girls and children did
not occur to me, as it seems it did to you, by your
leading my rheumatic legs such a deuced race
through the passage from the creek. Yes, girls,
down with you all, and on to the middle room, and
have no fears but that we will defend you.'
`But you, father?' said Alma, looking back as
she was descending, with an expression of
solicitude
,
`you are surely not to remain?youare too
are too oldinfirm'
`I am young again, girl. The thought of our
treatment, and the fate which our foes evidently
design
for us still, make me a soldier againgo down,
my daughter, and may God be with you, and strike
for us all,' said the old veteran, letting down the
trap upon the last of the retiring party.
Scarcely had the mingled voices of the women
and children died away, as they retreated along the
passage to their refuge under the earth, before
Selden
and his men came scattering along into the
house, fortunately not, however, with the danger
which the widow had anticipated. As soon as the
whole company, now numbering but twelve,
including
Captain Hendee and Neshobee, had gained the
room, they immediately proceeded to barricade the
door, and put every thing in the best possible
condition
for a defence.
While they were thus busily engaged, unmindful
of the severe fatigues of the day, in the excitement
created by the alarming prospects of the night,
which was now about to set in, the trap door was
pushed up, and the provident widow re-appeared,
ascending the ladder with a large loaf of bread and
a haunch of dried vension under one arm, and a
pail of water, in which floated the accustomed gourd
shell, slung on the other. With many a blessing on
the widow's head, and many an oath to defend her
and hers to the death, the famished and wearied
soldiers
eagerly fell upon the grateful repast, after
which they repaired with renewed spirits to the
several
stations allotted them above and below along
the walls.
`I wish the rascals would make themselves
manifest
,
if they are around us, as I suspect,' observed
Selden, after the company had stood some time at
their respective loop holes, silently awaiting the
appearance
of the enemy.
`That they will be cunning enough not to do till
the approach of darkness,' replied Captain Hendee.
`Then you will hear from them, I'll warrant you.
And as they can have but small hope of perforating
these logs with their bullets, they will probably
attempt
to beat down the door, or burn the house over
our heads.'
`They will find the latter a difficult job, I
imagine
,'
responded Selden. `These bare logs, after the
heavy rain of last night, and that, too, at the
distance
which we can manage to keep the knaves,
cannot offer much inducement for an attempt to
ignite
them with lighted arrows.'
`True,' replied the other, `but you forget the roof
these bark coverings are rather combustible.'
`No, I thought of that,' rejoined Selden, `and
was about to remark, that if they fired the roof we
must tear it off.'
`That can be done, perhaps,' replied the former.
`At all events, it will be time enough to think of it
when they arrive for the attack; for I doubt
whether
there is now one of them within a quarter of a
mile of us.'
`Now, I've a notion there is,' said Pete Jones,
who, in the mean while, had been keenly watching
every appearance within the scope of his vision,
`and I shouldn't be much surprised if some of those
stumps and log-heaps over in the widow's grass
yonder
,
if they could talk, would be willing to swear to
it.'
`Have you actually seen any of them, Jones?'
asked Selden.
`Why,' answered the scout, with his peculiar
comic twist of features, `I have actually seen a sign
or two, that I have never known fail, except in the
dryest of times. And with your leave, Captain
Selden
,
I have thoughts of an experiment, by way
of putting the question at rest, and doing something
more, perhaps, into the bargain.'
`Wellvery well'said Selden, pausing for the
other to explain the nature of his proposal.
`Here is at it, then,' said the scout, choosing to
answer, by actions rather than words, the enquiry
which the manner of his superior implied, while he
proceeded to strip off his coat, button it up, and,
with the brush of an old broom that stood in a
corner
,
distend the body, running the short handle into
one arm to keep the artificial limb thus made in a
horizontal position.
`What are you a going to do with your
scarecrow
,
now?' asked Selden, who, with the rest of the
company stood looking on, anxious to learn the
character of the proposed stratagem.
`I'll show you in a minute,' replied Pete, now
getting the poker and suspending his contrivance
upon one end of it. `There, Captain Hendee, I
want you should take charge of this concernyou'll
know how to manage it,while the rest of us, who
have keener sight for aim in the dusk, will attend to
our rifles. But mind ye, I have first got to deliver
a little bit of an oration for the benefit of the
gentlemen
outside, if so be that they're within ear-shot,
as I surmise.'
The scout, then, after pulling out one end of the
block in the window a short space, that his voice
might the better be heard by those whom it was
intended
to reach, commenced and carried on by
himself
a sort of ventriloquial dialogue, purporting that
a discovery had suddenly been made, that they were
out of bullets, and were wishing to obtain a bar of
lead that had been left standing outside under the
window, while the question seemed to be, who
should expose himself by reaching out his hand to
get it; but one at length appearing to be found
hardy
enough to undertake the task, the speaker
suddenly
dropped the discourse and turned to the
company
present.
`There, boys, have your muzzles to your loops,
and your eyes on the lookout for game,' he said in
a low eager tone. `And you, Captain Hendee, be
ready to pass the figure up to the window, which I
am about to lay open, and which all, as they value
the union of body and soul, must keep out of the
range of. Don't fire till I give the word. All ready?
well, here goes then,' he added, swinging out the
block and stepping quickly to his loop-hole.
Captain Hendee now proceeded immediately to
execute the part he had been requested to perform.
And while the company were waiting with
breathless
interest the result, he moved along the effigy
towards
the window, so as to show only one arm and
a portion of the bust to those who might be
watching
without, skilfully imparting to the figure the
cautious
and hesitating motions of a living actor, who
might be supposed to be conscious of the hazard
incurred, though determined to approach.
Scarcely
had the protruding arm entered the narrow
opening
,
bringing one side of the body in fair view to
the supposed lurking enemy without, when a bright
flash suddenly gleamed through the window, and,
with the almost simultaneous report of a dozen
guns, bursting from the surrounding coverts, a
shower
of bullets passed through the effigy, and buried
themselves in the logs of the opposite wall. There
was again a momentary silence, when, with the
lifting
smoke along the line from which the fire
proceeded
,
several dark forms became visible, peering
out from their respective coverts, and quivering and
dodging about in the dissipating vapor. Then came
the sharp word of command from the watchful
scout.
`Fire!'
Eight well aimed rifles from the loops along the
walls above and below, instantly spoke in response;
and the mingled screech of a half dozen voices,
followed
by a yell of rage and disappointment from the
whole band of the beseigers, plainly told the result
of the stratagem.
`Now, by Hokey! if I don't keep this coat to
brag onsix bullet-holes right through the body and
the owner still alive and kicking!' exclaimed the
scout, picking up the riddled garment and feeling
out the bullet holes with his fingers, as the loud shout
of exultation and defiance, which burst from the
little
band on the occasion, died away in the
surrounding
forest.
For nearly an hour, the besieged, who had closed
up their window and resumed their respective posts,
now strained both car and eye in vain, to catch some
sight or sound indicating the presence of the foe
around them. But fully aware of the desperate and
wily character of those with whom they had to deal,
they determined to suffer none of their vigilance to
relax. And but a short time elapsed before they
made a discovery which taught them the wisdom of
the resolution:As all stood watching at their posts
in silence, a low, short exclamation from the young
Indian, testified that something suspicious had at
length attracted his attention.
`What now, Neshobee?' softly asked Selden,
stepping noiselessly towards the native, who was
lying
on the floor in one corner, listening through a
crevice which he had found between the lower logs.
`Me no see nothing, but hark um scratch um
buttons
guess
um lift something,' was the somewhat
hesitating reply.
`I'll grant you the best harkum, as you call it,
boy,' said Pete Jones, who stood near, and, on the
exclamation of the Indian, had renewedly taxed his
vision to discover the cause; `but as to eye-shot,
you have got to knuckle to me, for I can see them;
20
and they are at some bobbery, toothough what in the
name of reason it can be,' he continued, pausing
and hesitating as he turned his head one way and
then another, to obtain a more distinct view; `what
it can be, I am dubious whether the divil himself
can tell,unless he contrived it for 'em. They are
moving down the path this wayI believeyes, and
in pairs, too, like new married geese. What?no
yes, they have got something upon their
shoulders
I
should think it was one of the corpses we
made for 'em, which they were carrying to be
buried
,
only it is as long as a sea-sarpent.'
`Aha! I understand it,' cried the young leader,
`it is some long timber which they intend to use as
a battering-ram to beat in our door. And thank
Heaven for the timely discovery, but for which, ten
to one, we had been lost,and even as it is there
is danger enough. Stand to your guns, boys,' he
continued, in a low thrilling tone, though
sufficiently
raised to reach every man within, `if we can but
drop two or three of the foremost, the whole,
probably
will be carried down by the weight of the
timber
cock
your gunskeep a steady eye on the
advancing
column, and be ready for the word.'
Slowly, and with noiseless tread, did the
performers
of this new mode of attack approach along the
path, staggering under the weight of the long heavy
pole, or rather the trunk of a closely trimmed tree,
which they bore on their shoulders, till within three
or four rods of the house; when squaring round,
and pointing the but end of their formidable
implement
directly at the door, they began to bear it
forward
with mighty force towards the object of its
aim, which the next instant must have given way
before the tremendous impetus which it was
gathering
for the blow. At that critical juncture Selden
gave the signal to his impatient men, and every gun
that could be brought to bear was discharged upon
the assailants. A cry of agony rose from the spot,
followed with a shout of hold on! for God's sake
hold on! Then was heard the sounds of
floundering
footsteps, and in another breath the whole
came thundering to the ground. Once more the
house rung with the triumphant shouts of the Green
Mountain Boys, and all again was silent.
Another long respite was allowed our little band,
and during the hour succeeding the last onset,
nothing
could be seen or heard to betray the presence of
the enemy any where in the vicinity of the spot.
They had evidently retired to some distance to hold
a consultation, and arrange some new method of
attack
.
At length, however, the occasional cracking
of a dry stick, as it broke apparently under
cautiously
moving feet in the field and woods around,
apprised the intently listening band within, that the
twice baffled foe were again stealthily drawing up
to the spot, still bent on renewing, in some shape or
other, the assault. After appearing to approach
to their line of coverts, reaching within five
or six rods of the house, a dead silence of
many
minutes ensued, leaving the besieged still
wholly
ignorant of the form, in which the threatened
attack
was to be made, and even, at length, in some
doubt whether it was to be made at all. All at once
a tremendous outcry broke though the surrounding
gloom, and the thrilling yells of the savages,
mingled
with the hoarser shouts of the tories, resounded
in one unceasing din through the forest. Startled,
but not dismayed by this sudden outbreak, the
Green Mountain Boys instantly cocked their pieces,
and stood straining their vision to catch a glimpse
of the foe. But they watched in vain. No living
object was to be seen, though the noise, which
seemed
not to be the regular war-cry sometimes raised
on the eve of an onset, but a promiscuous clamour,
was continued without the least intermission. And
together with the war-whoop and shout, the rattling
of guns and ramrods, the crashing of dry brush, the
beating of clubs against trees, the mimic hooting of
owls, the howling and bellowing of wild beasts, with
all imaginable noises, seemed to unite to swell the
strange uproar.
`Well, now, if I an't beat,' exclaimed Pete Jones,
as usual the first with his comments on the occasion.
`I wonder if the foolish satans expect to throw down
our walls of hard maple logs, and well locked
together
at the ends to boot, by racket and roaring, as
the Jewish militia did those of old Jericho, that I've
read of in the scripter? I rather guess they will
find it a hard go, unless they blow them down with
horns of powder, as I've sometimes kinder reckoned
must be the meaning of the good book, in that
business
I've just spoke of, seeing as how it was jest
as easy for God to make 'em gun-powder to do it
with, as 'twas manna to eat.'
`I think it must be a feint,' replied Selden, `to
cover some design of a more dangerous character
than mere noise. An attack of some kind is
doubtless
in preparation for us; but in what manner, or
place, the storm is to burst, I am wholly at loss to
conjecture. Keep a keen eye abroad, boys. And
you, Neshobee, go immediately down through the
passage to the western entrance, where you heard
Captain Hendee say he would repair, when he left
us a short time ago. Tell him to keep a strict guard
in that quarter, and if beset, send instantly for a
reinforcement
.
And now, my brave lads,' he
continued
,
turning to his men, `a crisis may be at hand,
which will require your coolness andbut staywhat
means this? Do my eyes deceive me, or is it
growing
lighter in the room?'
`It isit certainly is!' responded several.
`The moonthe rising moon!' suggested others.
`You needn't go to blaming the moon for this,'
cooly observed Jones, `for, according to my
reckoning
,
it wont be up this two hours.'
`True,' said the leader; though evidently
reflected
light, it is not from the moon. See! see! how
rapidly it increases!' he continued, as a sort of
flickering
suffusion of light, weak and scarcely
perceptible
at first, but growing stronger and more
distinguishable
every second, as if reflected from a
steadily
kindling flame in some unseen point in the
heavens
,
now began dimly to light up the grounds around
the house, and even render objects in the room
visible
.
`This light was never made by the enemy to
enable us to shoot them. There is mischief afoot
somewhere. Let every man, then, stand to his post,
and let every eye be strained to discover the cause.'
At that instant the appalling cry of fire! the
roof is on fire! resounded through the loft above,
revealing at once to the startled inmates below the
character of the expected danger, and the meaning
of the mysterious uproar, which had, it was now
evident
,
enabled the enemy to approach the house,
mount it at the corners, set fire in different places to
the roof with their ready prepared combustibles, and
descend and escape unheard and undetected.
`Cut the fastenings of the outside binders of the
roof, and stave off every bark of the covering that
20*
the fire has reached,' shouted the excited leader to
the men above.
`It will expose us to certain death from the shot
of the enemy, to make an opening while we remain
here,' was the reply.
`Rip up the floor between us, then,' promptly
said Selden, `to give us a chance to do it from
below
hereoff with the fastenings! up with the floor!
Hand us down two or three of those longest plank
for our purpose, and descend yourselves to our
assistance
.
Lively my men! As you value our
salvation
,
be lively!'
In prompt obedience to the command, the men
tore up the loose boards composing the floor, and,
after passing down to their comrades below such as
might be needed, hastily threw the rest together at
the ends of the loft, leaving all the inside of the
roof open to the lower floor; when swinging
themselves
down by the bare beams, they joined in the
operations already then in rapid progress upon the
frail covering above. The long boards having been
reared up endwise, and each one placed in the hands
of two strong men, were now thrust forcibly against
the roof at the different points where the fires were
supposed to be burning on the outside; and several
breaches were made, all expecting, that by the
removal
of a few of the barks the flames might be
extinguished
.
But appearances soon taught them,
that their hopes of thus conquering the element
were wholly delusive. The light above, instead of
dying awayas portions of the burning roof were
removed, continued rapidly to increase. Small
tongues of the lambent flames began to show
themselves
through the lateral crevices in the covering in
numerous places, quivering, and leaping from point
to point along the inner surface, while a general
crackling above plainly told them that the fire had
already spread nearly or quite over the whole of the
outside of the roof. Perceiving that nothing short
of unroofing the whole building would stop the
progress
of the flames, they now proceeded with
renewed
vigor in their operations. Piece after piece
of the broad barks were beat off, and hurled blazing
to the ground. And the work was continued with
unabated energy till the last vestige of the burning
material had been removed, and nothing but the
naked
rafters intervened between the lower floor, on
which all our little band were now assembled, and
the starry heavens above them.
`There, thank Heaven, we are freed from that
danger at last!' exclaimed Selden, in tones of
gratulation
,
as he threw down the implement with which
he had been assisting his men in their labors.
`That's right enough,' observed the scout, whose
attention for some moments seemed to have been
arrested by some appearance he noticed through a
loop hole. `All that is right enough mayhap; but
while we are putting up thanks for deliverance from
one danger, I am a little suspicious whether or no
we had'nt better join to 'em a small bit of a prayer
to be delivered from a worse one that we've got to
see to soon, I've a notionjest look here, Captain.'
Selden turned to the spot occupied by the
speaker
,
who stood silently and successively pointing to
the different loop holes along the walls, and the
words of the latter were explained. Flames, raising
from the ground on the outside, began to be visible,
and their flickering points were already darting up
in fitful leaps athwart several of the apertures,
announcing
to the dismayed inmates, that a fire was
in rapid progress on the outer walls of the house
from combustibles, which had been piled up against
them, doubtless, at the time of firing the roof, and
which had been kindled by fire placed there by the
enemy, or by burning fragments of bark falling down
from above. All saw at a glance that it was
utterly
impossible to arrest, by any means now left them,
the spreading conflagration, and that consequently
the house must soon be relinquished to the
devouring
element. And but a few more moments had
elapsed before they were warned, by the spouts of
crackling flames now beginning to shoot up above
the tops of the roofless walls, and by the sensibly
increasing heat in the room, to prepare for their
retreat
to their last refuge in the subterraneous abode
of their provident hostess. At that instant, the voice
of Sherwood, the leader of their foes, was heard
above the roaring of the flames, loudly calling on
the besieged to yield themselves as prisoners, and
come forth, lest they should perish in the fire.
`Is there a possibility of getting a glimpse of that
demon through the loops? asked Selden, in a tone
of concentrated bitterness. `If there is, let a rifle
bullet take back his answer.'
In pursuance of the suggestion of their leader,
the men made an attempt to get a sight of their
foes, who, now sensible of their advantage, were
heard shouting within a few rods of the house. But
it was useless; for the walls, by this time, were so
completely enveloped in fire and smoke as wholly to
intercept the view of every object without.
`Let us beat a retreat, then, for the widow's
strong hold below,' resumed Selden; `but let us
pause a moment to send a glance over yonder
treetops
,
lest they contain eyes which will discover, in
our movement, what I trust those exulting fiends do
not, and will not suspect,that this is not our last, nor
best resource for baffling their hellish purposes.
The last speaker had scarcely ceased, before Jones,
who seemed to have anticipated the object of his
superior
,
raised his rifle to his shoulder, preparatory to
an aim, while his eye continued intently fixed on the
body of a large hemlock standing eight or ten rods
from the house.
`What now, Jones?' said the former, who
noticed
the sudden movement of the scout.
`Hold easy!' replied the other, `there's
something
that acts mightily like a red-skin going up the
back side of that tree yonder. But he's so pesky
delicate about showing any thing better than toes
and fingersstaystay'he continued, in a low
gleeful chuckle, `there's a large limb just above
him, which, if he's fool enough to try to pass it,
must throw his body out of the track so far that
and, by Jethro! he is a going to try it. Now hold
still as thunder, all, and I'll be the chap to speak to
the red divil.'
Every eye now glanced anxiously from the long
and steadily poised tube of the scout to the tree in
question, and a moment of breathless silence
succeeded
;
when the sharp report of the piece rung
through the forest, and the dull, heavy jar upon the
earth, that instantly followed, told that another
foeman
was added to the long list of victims who had
fallen beneath the murderous bullets of the unerring
old Trusty.
`Down! down with you all, before the smoke of
the piece rises,' exclaimed Selden, as he now, after
hurrying his men through the trap into the cellar,
hastily descended himself and let the door down
after
him.
CHAPTER XIII.
The waves a moment backward bent
The hills that shake, although unrent,
As if an earthquake pass'd
The thousand shapeless things all driven
In cloud and flame athwart the heaven,
By that tremendous blast.
Leaving
the burning building to its fate, Selden
and his men immediately entered the dark avenue
below; when, after blocking up the mouth as well
as they could, with earth and stones taken from the
cellar wall, to keep out the smoke, as well as to
secure
it against the discovery and entrance of the
enemy
,
should they break into the house before the
progress of the flames in the interior should prevent
them, they proceeded directly to the middle
excavation
.
Here they they met their hostess walking with
restless steps and anxious looks to and fro before the
curtained apartment containing her family.
`Well, Mrs. Story,' said Selden, as he
approached
at the head of his followers, `I regret to inform
you that your house is irrecoverably on fire. We
have done our best to avert the catastrophe, but
have wholly failed, and even have been driven to
retreat to your refuge for our own safety.'
`I know it,' replied the widow, `I have been up
to the mouth of the passage to listen every five
minutes
,
and know all that has happened. But let the
house goallevery thing, and I am content if my
treasures here,' she continued, with a slight tremour
of voice as she pointed towards the curtained
recess
,
`if my treasures here can but be spared me.
The little fellows, thank Heaven, are now all a sleep,
and know nothing of the dangers that hang over
them. And God grant that they remain so till the
hatchets of the hell-hounds now yelling above us
shall,if it is so ordered of Heaven,shall be
buried
in their'here choking with emotion at the
horrid thought which her imagination began to
suggest
,
she stopped short and was for a moment silent.
`Captain Selden,' she at length resumed, `were
my own personal safety alone concerned, I think I
could follow you to the cannon's mouth without
flinching. But when I find the lives of my children
at stake, the mother instantly prevails within me, and
I become, in spite of all I can do, a poor trembling
coward. But enough of thishave you any reason
to suspect the enemy are aware of our place of
refuge?'
`None whatever; and even at the worst, we think
you have but little to fear. But where are the girls?'
`Alma and Jessy are in yonder room guarding the
hollow stub through which the smoke of our fire
place escapes, lest some of the enemy should
discover
that avenue to the room, and attempt to
descend
.'
`Nobly employed! But the duty shall now be
done by fitter hands,' said Selden, as, followed by
his men, he passed on to the main apartment.
On reaching the room they found the girls, as the
widow had named, stationed before the rude fire
place. Alma was sitting upon a block in an
attitude
which would enable her to hear the least sound
connected with the hollow trunk above; while her
more volatile companion, having chosen the part of
sentry, was silently walking back and forth before
the hearth with the widow's rifle in her hand. Non
was this weapon their only dependence: a quantity
of loose straw was lying in the fire place, and a slow
burning torch was at hand to apply and set the
combustible
material into a blaze the instant any one
should attempt to enter the cavity above.
`Bravo! ladies,' exclaimed Selden, as he
approached
.
`I don't now remember me,' he
continued
,
eying Jessy archly, `to have seen so heroic a
display of this character since whilom at the bloody
siege of the Lower Falls.'
`Now, Captain Selden,' replied the other with a
half resentful, half deprecating look, `if you ever
mention that affair again, I will neverpositively
never forgive you. Besides, how can you feel like
joking at such an hour as this?'
`For ourselves we tremble not,' interposed Miss
Hendee, rising and turning to Selden with her
usual
calm dignity of manner; `but think of that
distressed
mother and her helpless family, upon whose
heads we have brought this fearful peril!'
`Heaven forbid that we should be unmindful of
them,' rejoined the young leader, seriously, `and
believe me, Miss Hendee, there is not a man,not
a single man of us here, who, if need be, would
hesitate to shed his heart's blood in her defence.
But we will now relieve you of your charge here,
ladies. Retire, then, and, if possible, to rest and
slumber; for I well know your exhausted systems
must, by this time, require both. Go, girls,' he
added
,
conducting them to the entrance of the
passage
leading to the apartment of their hostess, `go,
keep up bright hopes, and rely on our disposition
and ability to defend you.'
As soon as the ladies had retired, a guard was
selected
to supply the place they had just
relinquished
,
and another was ordered to relieve Captain
Hendee
and his faithful attendant at the western
entrance
.
The remainder of the men, glad to seize
every moment offered them for rest, mostly threw
themselves upon the earthy floor, and fell asleep,
while Selden and Captain Hendee, willing to leave
them to what repose they might thus snatch from the
duties to which they were liable the next instant to
be called, repaired to the small partitioned room
adjoining
,
to hold a consultation, and be ready for any
movements which might be made by their persevering
foes. A brief interval of comparative silence now
succeeded, in which nothing was to be heard below
but the deep, heavy snoring of the wearied men,
and the low, dull roaring of the flames above. Slight
jarrings of the earth, however, showing that the
enemy
were again in motion, at length began to be
perceptible below; and soon the unexpected sounds
of the blows of axes or hatchets were added to
other
indications of some fresh project about to be
attempted
by the besiegers, the nature and object of
which the besieged had now no means of
ascertaining
.
`Now that jests settles the question; for I'll be
blest if I stand it any longer,' exclaimed Jones, who
had for some time manifested signs of uneasiness as
he sat listening to the movements above ground, and
who now, as the last sounds struck his ear, sprang
upon his feet, and began, with restless steps, to pace
the apartment. `To be cribbed and holed up here
like so many hunted foxes, with forty divils over our
heads, who may be preparing to send down one of
those great hemlocks to smush us like migets, for
any thing we know, or fixing some other contrivance
for us not much better, and all without allowing us
21
the least chance to know the how, when and
whereabouts
,
is a thing I don't fancy. And if I can get
out there at the creek, I swow by Lucifer's red
taffeta
jacket, I'll jest know what they are up to there
above ground.'
`What do you propose to do, Jones?' asked
Selden
,
who, overhearing part of the scout's soliloquy,
now entered the room; `not to go out, and alone,
surely?'
`I reckon I jest do, Captainthat is, unless you
swear right down I shant.'
`But consider the danger of its leading to a
discovery
of our refuge, and the fearful personal risk
you must encounter.'
`And then again consider the chance that the
satans
have smelt out that secret already, or, at the
best, that they will, when the house falls in, and
they find we an't there. And as to my own risk in
the matter, I think you hadn't ought to grumble
much, if I don't, considering,' said the scout taking
the other's remarks for a consent to his proposed
excursion
,
and moving towards the entrance.
`Jones, you shall not go aloneit shall never be
said I suffered that,' said Selden, calling after the
scout, and snatching up a rifle and following him
into
the passage.
Although Selden had given way to the proposal
of the scout with a mind nearly balanced between
the dangers which might be averted, and those which
might be incurred by the measure, yet having once
decided to permit and take part in it himself, he
threw aside all his doubts, and proceeded to carry it
into instant execution. And having ordered the
guard at this post to be doubled, and leaving the
command with Captain Hendee to act as
circumstances
should dictate, the two adventurers removed
a portion of the blockwork at the mouth of the
passage
sufficient for an egress, crept cautiously and
silently
out into the open air, and soon gained the
top of the bank above, unmolested. Here they
paused a moment to listen and reconnoiter; and
perceiving no signs of the presence of any enemy,
except in the immediate vicinity of the burning
tenement
,
and being thus relieved from their fears of an
ambush at this spot, which they considered the
greatest personal hazard that they would be likely to
incur, they again set forward towards the scene of
action, by separate and slightly diverging routs,
under
the agreement that each should return by
himself
,
and as speedily as possible, after obtaining the
best knowledge of the situation and movements of
the enemy of which the case would admit.
Carefully
keeping within the shadow of a tree or bush,
lest the light of the conflagration, which was
brightly
illuminating every open space in the woods around,
should expose him to the view of the enemy,
Selden
,
after leaving his companion, crawled
noiselessly
on to the border of the woods, where he soon
succeeded in gaining a position in a thick clump of
low evergreens, which luckily afforded him every
chance he could wish for observation. The greater
part of the enemy were still at their stations a short
distance from the house, where they stood peering
over their coverts with their guns leveled at the door,
which they were evidently each moment expecting
to see thrown open by the besieged, whom the
flames, they supposed, must soon drive from the
house. A small band were busily engaged in the
edge of the woods, some eight or ten rods to his
left, in trimming out with their hatchets a small
spruce tree, which they had just cut down, and
which, he at once concluded, was to be used as
another battering ram, the former one being found
by them, probably, too unwiedly for their purpose.
While Selden stood making these observations, he
heard the steps and voices of persons in the open
grounds, apparently approaching from the spot at
which the engine was preparing, and, turning his
head, he was soon enabled to see two men coming
from a nook in the clearing some rods to his left,
of which his situation had not permitted him a full
view. Passing along near the woods they soon
came between him and the burning pile, when they
slackened their pace; and finally coming to a stand
a little to his right, they turned their faces towards
the fire. With the first flash of light that fell upon
their features, Selden instantly recognized in one of
them, Sherwood, the leader of the band. The other
he rightly judged to be Darrow, the reckless minion
of the former. Selden's rifle was instinctively brought
to his face with an aim at Sherwood's heart, and
his finger was feeling for the trigger, when prudence
overcame the temptation of ending the life of the
villain, and slowly and reluctantly lowering his piece,
he gave his attention to the dialogue which now
ensued
between these two worthies.
`Yes, the tables are now turned, Darrow,' were
the first words that became distinctly audible to our
listener: `We have now, singularly enough, chased
them round nearly to the spot where this same
accursed
Selden was one of the foremost of the gang
to have me tied up and whipped like some scurvy
thief. And if he is the same fellow you saw in the
woods near Crown Point'
`That I can swear to.'
`And if you are right in your suspicions as to the
other particular'
`I am more and more convinced of it, Jake.'
`Well, I got one glance at his features to day,
and come to look at him with that object, I swear,
I believe you are right; and if so, both interest and
revenge demands his death while he is in our power.
But I should prefer to have this brought about
before
they surrender; and that was the reason of my
particular orders to the men to pick him off as soon
as possible.'
`Yes, and how the devil it has happened, that he
has so long escaped the effects of that order is more
than I can tell. I have had four fair shots at the fellow
myself in the course of the chase to day; and two
or three of the men say they have tried it with the
same luck. He stands fire like a salamander,'
added
the ruffian with a ferocious grin at his own wit,
`and, by hell! I am beginning to think they are all
of that sort of animals, to stand it out there in the
flames at this rate.'
`Well, the worst is there own, damn 'em,'
rejoined
Sherwood, with a demoniac laugh; `and if they
do get baked a little, it is no more than they deserve.
But the fact is, they must have been driven out long
ago, if they had not contrived some way to keep
out the flamesthe one, probably, which I
suggested
,
that of bringing earth from the cellar and
strewing
it over the upper floor.'
`And still they must know that in fifteen minutes
more they will all be buried beneath a blazing
log-heap
.'
`True; and I am surprized, I will own, that they
don't throw open the door and call for quarters. But
we will now very soon save them the trouble, as I
21*
see our men are just starting with their battering
pole to beat in the door.'
`I see, and I am glad they have got it under
weigh, at last; for that will tell the story devilish
quick; and to tell the truth, Jake, I am plaguy
suspicious
of some trick about this business.'
`Well, if there is, this will be the best way to
discover
it; but had not you better go and take the
command?'
`No, Remington will know how to manage.'
`Have you given him and the men their orders?'
`Yes,to let drive at the door with all vengeance.'
`And in case they rush out?'
`Why, shoot down the men, and spare the
women
for our use.'
`And supposing they cry for quarters?'
`Remington is to grant them; but three or four
of such marksmen as he shall select are not to
understand
the order till they have dropped Selden on
your account, the old Captain on mine, and that
long legged devil who has settled the fate of so
many
of their companions to day, on their own.'
`All right, Darrow; but come, let us move a
little
to the south, where we can get a fairer view of
the door, when they make the trial, and where, at the
same time, we shall be out of the range of the
bullets
,
should the rascals be desperate enough to
attempt
to fire upon us again.'
It was with no small effort that Selden restrained
himself from taking immediate vengeance on the
black hearted villain before him, as he listened in
silence
to the foregoing dialogue, and discovered the
extent
of his diabolical designs. The consciousness,
however
,
that the lives of many,and among them one
whose life was dearer to him than his own--might be
endangered
by the act, enabled him to master his feelings
to the end of the discourse. And the objects of his
indignation
having now withdrawn themselves from his
view, he gave his attention, in common with his foes,
to the operations about to be commenced on the
house, being anxious to witness the result, to see to
what discoveries it might lead, and to what new
movements it might give rise, among the enemy,
before
retreating from the ground: nor had he to wait
long for that object. The new battering implement,
when once fairly placed upon the shoulders of the
party immediately in charge of it, was borne round
to the front side of the house, where it was
transferred
to the shoulders of those selected to employ
it against the door. For the next succeeding
moment
,
as the engine was being poised and directed to
the object of its aim, a breathless silence ensued,
broken
only by the sharp clicking of cocking rifles,
now heard in every direction, while the dark forms
of the enemy were seen slinking behind the
different
objects of the lighted landscape, and protruding
their long death-commissioned tubes, in readiness for
the expected rush of the besieged from the house
the instant the interior should be laid open.
`All ready?ahead with it, then!' now shouted
the infamous villain to whom the command of the
assaulting party had been entrusted`ahead with
it, as if the devil drove it an end!'
Starting at the word, the men shot forward the
butt end of their engine with a desperate effort
towards
its object. It struck; and the massy door
flew nearly to the opposite wall of the blazing
interior
;
while the sides of the fabrick, already
loosened
,
and about to separate at the corners, from the
action of the fire, after tottering a moment at the
violent jar imparted by the blow, gradually swayed
inward, and finally came down in a mass of red
ruins
over the cellar, sending up to the tops of the
neighboring trees a broad gush of flames, that
flashed
far and wide over the surrounding wilderness.
The enemy, to whom this result was wholly
unexpected
,
looked on in mute astonishment, not
unmingled
,
apparently, with some feelings of horror at
the terrific fate, which they took for granted had
befallen
every soul of the besieged.
`The devil!' at length exclaimed Sherwood,
awakening from the stupor of the surprize, into
which he seemed to have been thrown by the event
`so they have all gone to hell together!'
`That don't follow, by a damned sight!' bluntly
replied Darrow.
`What do you mean by that, Bill?' asked the
former, turning hastily, and with an air of concern,
to his minion.
`They have escaped, Jake!'
`In the name of hell, how?'
`Don't know; but depend on't they have. Why, do
you think them such cursed fools as to stay there to
be roasted alive, when the worst they could fear
from rushing out would be the ten fold preferable
death by the bullet? Never! I tell you they have
found some way of escapeprobably by a drain, or
passage from the cellar into the woods. It began
to creep through my hair some time ago, but you
was so confident'
`Damnation seize me for a dolt!' exclaimed
the enraged leader. `Ho! there, men, the game
has slipped through our fingersto the woods! to
the woods for the trail!' he added, springing
forward
himself to take the lead in the execution of the
order. And so sudden, and unexpected was the
movement, that before Selden had become fairly
aware of the dangers of his situation, Sherwood and
Darrow had entered the woods but a few rods to the
South, and were rapidly approaching the spot where
he stood concealed. Deeming it impossible now to
retreat for his refuge undetected, and thinking there
might be a chance that they would pass by without
discovering him, which would still leave him time to
escape before others of the enemy could arrive, he
prepared his arms, and silently awaited the approach
of these two deadliest of his foes. They came
nearly abreast of him, and were passing by, when
the motion of his shadow, which was cast by the
bright flames of the burning pile across their path,
caught their sight, and caused them to stop short.
Turning round for the object, their eyes fell upon
the other, and they gazed at him an instant in
evident
doubt and surprise.
`The very fellow, by hell!' eagerly muttered
Darrow
,
in an undertone to his companion.
All three simultaneously raised their weapons and
fired. But in taking a hasty step forward, Selden's
foot, as fortunately for him, perhaps, as for one of
his foes, became entangled in a small bush, and, in
the act of discharging his piece, he fell to the ground.
The bullets of his foes whistled harmlessly over his
head, while his own, for the same reason, missed the
object of its aim. Leaping forward in the smoke,
the desperadoes both grappled with their
unprepared
antagonist before he could gain his footing, and,
throwing him back upon the ground, drew their
knives to dispatch him. As Selden was about to
shut his eyes in anticipation of the fatal blow, he
caught a glimpse of the well known figure of the
tall scout coming with tremendous bounds to the
spot. And the next instant, Darrow, as he turned,
and was starting up at the unexpected apparition,
received a blow over his head and shoulders from
the clubbed rifle of the former, that sent him reeling
to the earth; while Sherwood was seized by the
same powerful hand, and dashed against a tree with
a force that laid him nearly senseless by the side of
his disabled companion.
The surprise of Jones was equalled only by his joy,
as Selden, whom he supposed at least badly
wounded
,
and whom he was about to grasp and bear off in
his arms, now sprang upon his feet unhurt, and
drawing his rapier, turned to add the finishing blow
to his two still prostrate, but fast reviving
antagonists
.
At that instant the shout of rallying foes,
hurrying
to the rescue, and already entering the border of
the woods not twenty yards distant, broke upon
their ears, warning them of the necessity of
immediate
flight.
`By Moses! we must leg it, Captain,' said the
scout, as reluctantly relinquishing their object, they
both darted away from the spot, and, throwing each
a tree in the range behind him, commenced a rapid
retreat towards the refuge they had just left. In
another moment they had reached the creek, thrown
themselves over the bank, entered the passage, and
were in the embrace of their alarmed and anxious
friends, while the woods above were resounding
with the hideous yells of the disappointed foe,
running
about in search of the missing objects of their
rage.
Our band, having but little reason to hope that
their retreat would now long remain undiscovered,
immediately set about such preparations as were
deemed necessary for its defence. The short
timbers
,
composing the barrier near the mouth of the
passage, were more firmly secured; while convenient
loop holes were formed by raising some of the
upper
timbers and inserting, at intervals, flat stones
between
them. An efficient guard, with muskets and
fixed bayonets, were then stationed at the spot, the
charge of which was entrusted to the brave and
trusty scout. This and the other arrangements
being
completed, they awaited in silent anxiety the
approaching
crisis of their fate, all intently listening
from the different stations allotted them in the
rooms, or along the passages, for some sound which
should indicate in what shape and direction the
expected
assault was to be made. They were not long
left in suspense. The sound of suppressed and
eager
voices, and cautiously treading feet fast
gathering
on the bank above, soon apprised them, that the
entrance to their retreat was discovered. For some
time, however, the enemy seemed wary and fearful
about showing their persons in front of the passage.
But after appearing to listen awhile, first one, and
then another, ventured out abreast of the barricade
across the passage, which was situated about a yard
from its mouth. In the mean time, Jones and his
men stood within, holding their breath in
motionless
silence, with their bayonets in their loops, and
their eyes eagerly fixed on their marked victims,
who, feeling their dark way with the muzzles of
their guns, were slowly and cautiously approaching
within reach of the murderous blades of those of
whose dangerous proximity they were wholly
unaware
.
The assailants, now striking the barricade
with their guns, paused, and seemed to hesitate;
but after again listening a moment, they withdrew
their pieces, and coming up to the timbers, were
beginning
to feel with their hands, apparently to
ascertain
the nature of the obstruction; when the
death-doing bayonets were suddenly thrust forth,
and, with horrid shrieks, the pierced and recoiling
wretches sprang back, and fell over with a heavy
splash into the water below.
Warned by the fearful reception of their
comrades
,
the enemy ventured not again to appear
before
the mouth of the passage, but soon retired from
the bank, and for a long time gave the besieged no
further cause of alarm. So profoundly still, indeed,
was all above, that our little garrison at length
entertained
a strong hope that their assailants, grown
wise by the lessons they had already received, had
given up their design, and made a final retreat from
the place. The soldiers gradually relaxed from that
stern and determined air which the exigencies of
their situation had thrown over their war-worn
visages
,
and began to exchange the careless remark or
sportive jest. Mrs. Story and the other females,
venturing from their secluded refuge, came out into
the main room to hear from their gallant defenders
a recital of the various occurrences of the night, to
the deadened and imperfect sounds of which they
had been listening for many hours with the most
painful anxiety. These were accordingly narrated.
And every individual feat accomplished, or peril
encountered
,
was made the theme of praise or
gratulation
to the different actors of the occasion; while
to wind up, Pete Jones, with his characteristic
waggish
gravity, displayed to the astonished ladies his
bullet-riddled coat as a proof that his case afforded
a climax to all the hair-breadth escapes of the night.
As the attention of the company was thus engaged,
and at the instant when the eyes of all, including
those set to guard against the descent of the foe
down the hollow stub before described, were turned
upon the scout, a savage warrior dropped silently
upon the hearth, and rearing himself partially from
his crouching attitude, and throwing a keen, rapid
glance around the apartment, glided swiftly through
the assembled group, and darted into the dark
passage
leading into the interior room, where the
children
were left unguarded. So sudden, so noiseless
and shadow-like, had he entered, passed through
them, and disappeared, that few heeded, and still
fewer became fully aware of the character of the
apparition. The eagle-eyed vigilance of the
mother
was not, however, thus to be eluded. She caught
a glimpse of the flitting form of the savage, as he
entered the passage, and, with the heart rending
exclamation
,
My children! Oh! my children! she
sprang forward, like a maddened tigress, and
disappeared
in the passage after him.
`A light! follow instantly with a light!' shouted
Selden, drawing his sword and rushing into the dark
avenue to defend or rescue the frantic mother and
her periled children from the deadly knife of their
merciless foe. He had scarcely passed the
entrance
,
however, before he was met by the intrepid
woman, dragging back, with resistless force, the
struggling savage, who had been overtaken while
groping his uncertain way onward, and seized round
the waist from behind by the desperately grasping
arms of his captor. He had just succeeded in
unsheathing
his knife, which was fiercely glittering in
the light of the advancing torch, as it rose and fell
in quickly repeated, but as yet ineffectual, passes at
22
her body. A glance sufficed to show the young
leader the imminent danger of his unheeding
hostess
,
and, with the next breath, his weapon was sent
to the hilt into the body of the screeching foe.
`Thank God! thank God!' hurriedly ejaculated
the nearly breathless and exhausted woman, casting
from her, with a shudder, the gasping and gory
corpse, which, as she now turned and hastened
back to comfort her alarmed but untouched children,
was drawn away and covered up in a corner.
While this was taking place, Jones had placed a
quantity of the combustible material, already
prepared
for such an emergency, in the fire place, and
applied
the torch. And by the time Selden had taken
breath after his exploit, so as to turn his attention to
other objects, the rapidly kindling flames were
beginning
to flash and roar along up the cavity above.
`That was well thought of, Jones,' said the
latter
,
approaching the scout, who had dropped on one
knee in the corner of the fire place, and was
intently
listening to such sounds as he could distinguish
in the chimney above, amidst the roaring of the
fire,`well thaught of; but what do you hear up
chimney?'
`Why,' replied the scout, rising at the approach
of his superior, `I got down there to see if I could
find out whether there were any more of these
visitors
coming down the hollow, thinking that the way
they would scratch and scrumble up back again,
when the smoke and blaze met 'em, would be a
curiosity
.'
`And what did you discover?'
`Jest nothing but unsartinty. Though from some
noises that reached me, I rather guess there was one
or more of the scamps at the top of the stub,
harking
down, and waiting to see how the first one got
on, before venturing; but that want what I was at,
when you spoke'
`Well, what was it, then?'
`Why, I should rather guess there was a
considerable
party standing not far from over us, now,
kinder
consulting, or mayhap waiting to have some
contrivances made, as the rest appear to be at work
with their hatchets round in the woods as busy as
the divil in a gale of wind.'
`Ha! what now?feeling trees upon us?'
`Nolighter work than thatand, I'm thinking
whether it an't sharpening stakes, or possibly hewing
out wooden shovels. But hush! hark!'
Every voice was instantly hushed at the ominous
words and manner of the scout; and as the room
became silent, the sounds that had attracted his
attention
became distinctly audible to the whole
company
:
at first was heard a distant trampling of feet,
apparently approaching with slow, irregular
movement
,
from all directions towards them. Nearer and
nearer they came, pausing every few steps, and
stamping heavily upon the earth as they continued
gradually to close up to that portion of the surface
which extended over the room where our intrepid
little band stood silently awaiting the result of this
new movement, the object of which, they soon
conjectured
,
was to ascertain, by sounding the earth, the
exact position of their place of concealment before
attempting to dig or otherwise effect a breach through
the surface. In a moment more the advancing lines
reached the verge of the solid earth, on either side,
and began to step over the boundary upon the
hollow
ground above the room; when, seeming to
become
aware of the fact, they suddenly paused,
exchanged
a few words, and commenced a furious
stamping over the whole space covering the
excavation
beneath. As the trembling earth gave back the
hollow sound, thus affording unequivocal evidence
that the place of their search was at length
discovered
,
they rised a fierce yell of exultation, and fell
to work with their hatchets, and such rude
implements
as they had hastily prepared for the purpose,
in cutting away the roots, and loosening and
removing
the earth in such places as they had selected
for effecting openings.
As soon as it was fairly ascertained that the
enemy
had commenced operations for effecting a breach
through the earth above, our band, with one
consent
,
ceased listening, and began to prepare for
action
.
Every one seemed fully sensible that a
fearful
crisis was now indeed at hand, and carefully
examining
their arms to see that every thing was in
readiness for instant action, they arranged
themselves
,
at the command of their leader, in lines
around the sides of the room, while, in the
compressed
lip and sternly knitting brows of each, was
depicted the deeply breathed resolution to fight to
the death in defence of themselves and the fair and
tender ones whose only hope was now in their
bravery
.
`Give me a place among you,' cried the intrepid
widow, at this moment emerging from the inner
room, armed with her rifle and equipped for battle,
`give me a place, and see whether I am the first to
desert the post of danger.'
`But madam, dear madam,' began to expostulate
Selden, `do you know the peril that now awaits us?
Do you hear the sound of those busy fiends,
belaboring
the earth above to break through upon us?
and, there! do you see those fragments falling from
that jarring and trembling ceiling? Are you aware
that in ten minutes'
`I have heard allI see, and know all,'
interrupted
the woman, in tones of desperate calmness; `I
am prepared for the worst. I can never live to see
my children murdered before my eyes. Here,' she
continued, planting herself at the entrance of the
passage, `here I will remain, and if the enemy
enter
here, it shall be over my dead body. Nay, not
a word, Captain Selden, I will not be denied.'
At this moment Miss Hendee and Miss Reed
glided
past the widow into the room, and with looks
yet unmoved by the danger, which they well
understood
now menaced every individual of the
company
,
presented themselves before the admiring gaze
of the soldiers.
`Ah! girls, you missed the tread of your
centinel
,
did you? I meant to have escaped you
unnoticed
,'
said the widow with a melancholy smile.
`Aware that the hour decisive of the fate of us
all had arrived, we came to see if we could be of
any service here, or elsewhere,' replied Alma, in a
firm, but serious tone.
`God bless you, noble girls!' said Selden, with
emotion, advancing to the side of his lovely and
heroic
friends: `God bless you for this fortitude and
self sacrificing bravery.'
`Oh! let me die by your side,' murmured Jessy,
dropping her head on Selden's bosom.
Touched by this exhibition, so gratifying to his
feelings as a lover, and to his pride as a soldier, the
hero, gently putting her from him, gazed an instant
on the slight, symmetrical form, and the beautiful and
soul-speaking features of the fond and spirited young
22*
creature before him, with the mingled look which
imagination would naturally ascribe to a worshiper
of the goddess beauty, while kneeling at the shrine
of her image, and proffering the strangely blended
adorations which the nature of that worship must
necessarily have inspired.
`No, no Jessy,' he at length replied, arousing
himself from the momentary entrancement: `No,
girls, you two, at least, may notmust not remain:
to say nothing of the perils you must encounter,
your presence here might more embarrass than aid
us. Retire, then, and trust to us, under Providence,
for your deliverance.
`Is your father a sleep, Alma?' asked the widow,
as the young ladies were leaving the room.
`He is,' was the reply: `for, though when he
came to our room, and threw himself down among
the children to try to get a little sleep, he desired
me to awaken him on the occurrence of any new
danger, I yet could not find it in my heart to
disturb
him so soon.'
`Let him be instantly awakened,' said Selden,
`I would have his counsel.'
In a few moments Captain Hendee, who, nearly
ready to sink under the fatigues of the day, had
retired
to the inner room in the interval of quiet which
followed the repulse of the enemy at the western
entrance, had made his appearance. A glance at the
ceiling, now visibly shaking in two different places
under the rapidly progressing operations of the foe
above, enabled him, with the hasty intimations just
imparted by his daughter, to comprehend at once
the situation of both besiegers and besieged.
`This is a strait to which I both feared and
expected
we should be finally reduced,' he remarked
coolly, after a momentary pause, `but let no man
despair; I have been in situations more hopeless
than this, and yet escaped.'
`We can at least sell our lives dearly,' responded
Selden.
`True,' replied the old veteran thoughtfully,
`even in the method of defence which I see, from
your arrangement, you propose to adopt,that of
shooting the assailants as they attempt to enter the
breaches that they may make. But will you be
able thus to repel them long? Every foot of this
earthy covering, which now protects us from their
bullets, may be removed, or beat in upon us, before
we can bring our guns to bear upon them with
effect
.
And every surrounding tree top will, by that
time, conceal a foe, ready to send us death from
above; while fire brands and combustibles will be
hurled down upon us by those remaining on the
ground. And if we retreat into our narrow
passages
,
as we must, the same game will follow us there.'
`All these hazards, Captain Hendee,' replied the
young leader, `I am fully aware we may encounter.
But what other mode of defence can we adopt?
A sally from the western entrance, which is now
doubtless closely guarded by the enemy, with the
expectation that we shall soon be driven to make it,
must prove fatal to all who shall attempt it; while
the entrance at the other end of the passage is
blocked up by a red mass of burning ruins. What
other expedient, then, is left for us.'
`I had thought of one,' said Captain Hendee,
with some hesitation. `I had thought of one, as our
last resort, in an emergency like this. It may not
be without risk to ourselves, I am aware, but,' he
continued, with fiercely flashing eyes, `but it must
be swift destruction to the accursed gang above,
who are thirsting for our blood!'
`In the name of heaven, declare it, then,'
eager-cried
Selden, casting an uneasy glance at some
fresh demonstrations of the progress of the foe in
the covering above.
`I willhere, this way,' replied the former, as
stepping across the room, he opened the concealed
recess in the wall, and disclosed the widow's
magazine
to the wondering gaze of Selden and his men,
who being ignorant of its existence, did not at once
understand the nature of its contents, or perceive
the old gentleman's object in displaying it. `There!'
he addded, significantly pointing to the heads of the
casks thus brought to view, `there! that explains
my plan.'
How? What do those barrels contain?' rapidly
demanded Selden, with the varying expression of
doubt, surprise and alarm.
`Gunpowder!' was the emphatic reply.
`Good God! Captain Hendee, do you consider
our case so desperate, that, Samson-like, we should
all perish with our foes?'
`It does not follow that we shall perish with them.
I have seen somewhat of the operation of exploding
mines, and cannot believe that the effects in the
proposed one can reach far into that winding
passage
,
to the further end of which, if thought safer
than the inner room, we can all repair.'
`I'll be blest if I don't think the old thrash-the
divil is about right, Captain Selden,' exclaimed Pete
Jones, leaping about and snapping his fingers in
great glee. `Jest place them in that corner beyond
the fire there, and it must be a sort of powder that
I'm not much acquainted with, if it turns at a right
angle very far into that passage after mischief.
Well, now, the Lord be thanked for putting this
into
your noddle, old friend; I had about agreed to
say gone dogs for us all, but now I can see a
considerable
sprinkling of hope through them barrels of
thunder yonder.'
`And you, Mrs. Story, whose stake is the
greatest
in the result,' said Selden, turning to the widow,
after hastily running his eye over the different parts
of the room, as if calculating the probable extent
to which the explosion would affect the earth
laterally
,`what
do you say to the measure?'
`I don't knowI don't know,' replied the
distressed
mother, who had been mutely listening to
the startling proposition in a sort of wild
amazement
.
`The work of the element will be terrific
perhaps fatal to usbut the work of the
exasperated
foe, unless thus destroyed, will be, I fear, for all
we can do, no less dreadful. I leave it to you, and
may God direct the course which shall be for our
good,' she added with a shudder.
`It is a fearful experiment, but it shall be tried,'
said the young leader, turning away to begin the
required
arrangement.
At that instant a large fragment of earth was
suddenly
ruptured from the ceiling, and fell heavily to
the floor, scattering dirt in every direction around,
and disclosing in the place, from which it had been
detached, the point of a huge sharpened stake,
protruding
several inches into the room; while the wild
and exultant shouting of the foe above, as the stake
was drawn up, and the redoubled fury with which
they renewed their exertions, all loudly warned our
band that there was no time to be lost in preparing
for the execution of their purpose.
`Clear the room instantly!' cred Selden, in low,
but startling accents, `back! back! every man of
you, but Jones, to the further end of the passage
no remonstranceno offers!' he continued, as
urging
them with drawn sword from the room, several
began to persuade him to permit them to incur the
hazard of exploding the fatal mine, `not a word!
The match shall be applied by my own hand.'
As soon as the room was fairly cleared, Selden
turned, and, with rapid steps, proceeded to the
recess
,
drew forth the barrels, and carrying them to
the corner opposite to the entrance of the inner
passage
,
placed them firmly, and pulled out the bungs,
allowing a quantity of the powder to run out from
each on to the ground. He then laid a small
continuous
train of dry powder, extending from the
barrels across the room into the entrance in
question
;
while the scout, by his orders, after having
removed
the lights to a safe distance, wet a cartridge
from the contents of his canteen, and hastily
converted
it into a slow match to apply to the end of
the train.
`There! now leave the rest to me, Jones, take
care of yourself, and see that the passage is kept
clear for my retreat,' said the leader, receiving a
torch which was brought him by the other, and
taking
his station to await the fearful moment of
firing
the train.
The enemy in the mean time were making rapid
progress. Two breaches were already made through
the earth into the room, and these, as was evinced
by the almost constant falling of heavy masses of
dirt, were every moment widening; while from the
trampling of feet, all gathering up to the spot, the
mingled shouts, curses and commands of the
infuriated
gang and their leaders, it was obvious that an
attempt to descend was about to be made. At this
moment they seemed to perceive that the besieged
had deserted their room and retreated further into
the earth. Grown madly desperate by being already
so long baffled, and doubly infuriated by the
discovery
that their intended victims had still a further
refuge, they were now heard hastily throwing aside
their tools and resuming their arms preparatory to
entering the breach to follow up the pursuit, little
dreaming in the hellish joy of their anticipated
revenge
,
that the torch was even then suspended over
the train, and waiting only their first movement, to
send them, in an instant, with all the passions of
fiends raging in their bosoms, unannealed into the
presence of their God. But while the foe-trampled
earth was jarring to the hiedious tumult above, the
silence of death prevailed through the hushed vaults
beneath. The agitated mother was breathing
hurried
ejaculations over her clasped children. And
near her might be seen the huddling forms of her
shuddering female companions, with their fair hands
tightly compressed over both ears and eyes, as if to
shut out from their recoiling senses the noise of the
now momentarily expected explosion; while the
men in the dark passage beyond, stood motionless
and silent, listening in the attitude of intensely
excited
expectation for the awful denoument. Selden,
in the mean while, hesitating between his fears, that
the train would get disturbed by the entrance of the
foe into the room, and his anxiety to have the band
gather over, or so closely around it, as to bring them
all within the reach of the explosion, still held the
torch suspended in his extended hand over the train,
now lowering the point of the low flickering brand
nearly to a contact with the powder, at some
indication
of the expected descent; and now hastily
withdrawing it, as other and less decisive sounds
reached his ear. His hesitation, however, was soon
ended: at that instant a loud yell at the western
entrance, and the sounds of thickly trampling feet
that followed, told him that the enemy had forced
the barrier at the end of that passage, and were
rushing into the room; while another hurra from
the tories above, and the heavy, and quickly
repeated
jar of feet, striking upon the floor which
accompanied
it, further announced, that the latter were
beginning to leap down the breaches to join the
former
in the assault. At this critical instant, and
before
the mingled war cry of the savage and tory had
died away in the echoing vaults beyond him, the
young leader applied the brand to the fuse, and was
rapidly retreating along the passage towards his
friends. Having reached the curtained recess
containing
the women and children, and here
encountering
Captain Hendee and Jones, he turned round,
and with them, awaited, with palpitating heart and
suspended breath, the fearful result. With the low
hissing sound of the slowly burning match, came a
cry of horror from the scrambling foe, over whose
minds, now for the first time, seemed to flash the
dreadful truth. But too late. The next instant,
with a concussion that almost threw Selden and his
companions from their feet, the earth yawned and
opened along the passage overhead nearly to the
spot where they stood; when, through the long
vibrating
chasm, was displayed to their appalled
vision
,
the broad space of tree-covered earth over and
around the room beyond, leaping, in disrupturing
masses into the air, along with the diverging
column
of fiercely shooting smoke and flame, in which
were seen, commingling with rocks, earth, and the
limbs and trunks of uprooted and swiftly revolving
trees, a score of human forms, wildly throwing out
their arms as if for aid, and distending their mouths
with unheard screeches, as, with blackened and
distorted
features and dissevering limbs, they were borne
upwards with amazing force in the flaming mass to
the heavens. The chasm slowly closed over the
astounded
but unharmed band, and shut out from their
reeling senses the deafening din that was breaking
in crashing thunders above. A momentary stillness
ensued; when the returning shower of ruins came
thundering to the earth; after which, all again
relapsed
into a death-like, and unbroken silence.
Once more the morning light was springing in the
golden chambers of the east, heralding the approach
of the fiery coursers of the Day God up the
glowing
pathway of the sky. More and more brightly
broke the suffusing radiance over the mountains,
darkly gleaming, at first, upon the quiet surface of
the gently flowing Otter, and then, gradually
lighting
up, one after another, the bolder features of the
altered landscape, till the whole scene of the last
night's thrilling drama, and its awful catastrophe,
stood revealed to the sight. The humble tenement
of the lone widow, which the last setting sun left
standing unmolested, in her toil-wrought opening in
the wilderness, had disappeared; and in its place
lay a pile of black and smouldering ruins. Fences
were thrown down and scattered in every direction;
while the growing crops in the fields around, reared
23
by the hard labors of the indefatigable occupant,
and constituting her sole dependence for the future
sustenance of her numerous family, were scorched
and withered by the falling cinders thrown up from
the burning house, or prostrated and beat into the
earth by the trampling feet of reckless foes. The
breath of war had, indeed, passed over every thing,
and her little all, in one short night, had perished.
Near the banks of the stream, where stood a
thick growth of trees over and around the main
apartment of the subterraneous abode, now yawned
a huge, black chasm in the ground, in which
scarcely
a trace of the late regular room was discernable;
while the burnt and discoloured bark and foliage,
marking the standing forest around, and the broken,
splintered and uprooted trees, which had been
hurled
outward and prostrated with the earth for many
rods in every direction from the spot, and which
were now lying strewed over the ground in wild
disorder
,
intermingled with smoking rubbish, all told
the fearful power and extent of the terrific
explosion
.
Half buried among the wide scattered ruins
lay the torn, mangled and blackened corses of
savage
and tory,the fated victims of the mine, which
had so suddenly, so unexpectedly, sprung beneath
their feet, sweeping them, in an instant,
indiscriminately
away, with the cries of anticipated victory
and vengeance on their lips, like chaff in a
whirlwind
of fire.
As the increasing day-light began to fall more
broadly upon this scene of death and desolation,
two human forms might have been seen cautiously
breaking through the loose earth that closed up the
mouth of the long passage into which our little band
last retreated. The small, topling head, crane-like
neck, long body and limbs, and the peculiarly rapid
and shambling movements of the one, as, now
crouching
,
now rearing his tall form aloft and throwing
quick and wary glances around him, he glided round
beneath the sides of the broad black pit into which
they had emerged, sufficiently announced him as the
uncomparable scout. The swarthy and immovable
features, the short figure, and deliberate air of the
other, proclaimed him also to be an old acquaintance
of the reader, the trusty and faithful Neshobee.
Creeping out of the excavation, the two seperated,
and quickly disappeared in opposite directions in the
woods and bushes along the banks of the creek.
After the lapse of half an hour, in which they had
apparently made a reconnoitering circuit round the
opening, they reappeared on the banks of the
excavation
,
communed a moment, and, throwing aside
the air of caution that had marked their movements,
approached, with bold and confident steps, towards
the choked entrance, through which they had
forced
their way into the open air.
`Hurra, there, below!' shouted Pete, dropping
on one knee, and poking his head and long neck
into
the dark hole before him, `hurra! ye poor half
smuddered divilsasking the Captain's pardon for
the freedomdo you hear?'
`Ay, ay! what reportwhat news from the
regions
above?' responded several voices from the
dark, and, till then, silent recesses within.
`The coast is as clear as a hound's tooth,' replied
the scout. `Yes, all clear, and that, too, with what
I should call a considerable of a vengeance: so just
troop along out here, and see what God put it into
men's heads to make gunpowder for.'
This announcement seemed to produce an instant
effect. A lively bustle was immediately heard
among the party below. And in a few moments
more, the men, followed by the women and
children
,
came creeping, one by one, from their
crowded
and uncomfortable retreat, looking worn, haggard
and pale from fatigue, and more especially from the
want of fresh air, with which they had but imperfectly
supplied themselves by digging, with their bayonets,
small holes through the earthy covering of their
refuge
to the surface above. After reaching the open
air, the company stood a moment on the banks of
the chasm, viewing in silent horror the awful
spoctacle
that was here presented to their sight; when,
at the suggestion of Selden, the females,
accompanied
by himself, and all but the common soldiers,
(who were busy in searching for guns and other
spoiles among the ruins,) hastened to leave a scene
so revolting to the senses. And making the best of
their way over the tangled mass that every where
encircled the spot, with many a shudder at the
disfigured
,
and sometimes limbless bodies of the slain,
for which they were often compelled to turn aside in
their route, they proceed towards the open grounds
in front of the scite lately occupied by the house.
`Umph! look! jus look um up there!'
exclaimed
Neshobee, eagerly pointing up the trunk of a
large dry hemlock, which, standing some half
dozen
rods from the seat of the explosion, the
company
were unobservantly passing.
Arrested by the unusually excited manner of the
Indian, the whole party suddenly paused, and
looked
upward in search of the object to which he was
so earnestly directing their attention. About half
way up the tree, the doubling body of a man hung
dangling in the air, from a short pointed limb, upon
which he had evidently been thrown from the earth,
and literally impaled through the middle, by the
force of the explosion. His cadaverous face was
turned full towards the company, and a glance at
the peculiar cast of his death-set features explained
at once, to Captain Hendee and the girls, the cause
of the wild and gleeful interest manifested by the
native: it was the traitor, Remington, who first
betrayed
the family to their enemies, and who was
afterwards
discovered to be in full league with
Sherwood
and Darrow, and, to the last, in active
cooperation
with them, in the black designs which they
supposed themselves on the eve of accomplishing,
when thus awfully arrested in their guilty career.
Awe-struck and appalled at the strange and
dreadful
fate of the villain, the company, with one
consent
,
turned away from the sickening sight, and,
hastening from the spot, pursued their way in
thoughtful silence, till they had passed, as they
supposed
,
beyond the scene of these multiplied horrors.
Another trial, however, though of a different and
mingled character, still awaited them: a deep groan,
issuing from a small covert on their left, now
reached
their ears, and caused them again to pause in
their steps.
`It is a human groan,' said Selden, `and
doubtless
that of some poor wounded wretch, who has
crawled away from the scene of action. Perhaps
his life may yet be saved,' he added, as, beckoning
to Jones, he promptly set out for the place from
which the sound had proceeded. As the two
passed
round to the spot, they discovered a man lying
in a state of almost utter exhaustion in the weeds
behind a long log, by which he had apparently been
arrested in his course while trying to reach a small
23*
brook a few rods beyond. His face, with every
other
exposed part of his person, was thickly
besmeared
with dirt, gunpowder and blood, which last was
still freshly oozing from his mangled and broken
legs; and it was only by his hair, and the remains
of his burnt and tattered dress, that he could be
distinguished
as a white man. He seemed to be aware
of the presence of others, and his lips began to
move with some inaudible request.
`The poor creature is begging for water,' said
Selden, lowering his ear over the face of the
invalid
:
`let us remove him to the brook.'
Raising him carefully in their arms, they
accordinly
bore him to the bank of the rivulet, and having
placed him in a sitting position, with his back
against a large stump, they applied a gourdshell of
water to his lips, of which he drank eagerly and
deeply. They then washed the blood and dirt from
his face, when he considerably revived; and
opening
his eyes, he looked up in evident surprise on
our party, all of whom, having gathered round him,
now stood viewing his gory and lacerated limbs in
silent commiseration.
`Why! it is Darrowthe wretched and guilty
Darrow!' exclaimed Miss Hendee, starting back in
surprise, and with an expression of mingled pity
and abhorrence.
`Ay, guilty enough, doubtless,' responded Selden,
`but as deeply dyed in guilt as he is, there is
another
still more guilty,wretched man, what has
become
of your master?'
`He escaped unhurt from your accursed mine,
feebly muttered the wounded ruffian in reply.
`And has fled?' asked the former,
`Yes, fled, like a craven brute,' said the other,
with an angry scowl, `fled with the few who were
as lucky as himself, leaving me and the rest of the
wounded, with our cries for assistance ringing in his
ears, to die like dogs, alone here in the woods.
And they have diedsome of their wounds, some
by crawling into the river and drowning, and some
by plunging their knives into their own bodies to
put themselves out of misery. Yes, all gone, but
me; and I'
`But perhaps your leader went off after a
reinforcement
,
expecting soon to return with better
means of serving you,' interrupted Selden, with the
view of gathering from the other such information
as would enable him to judge of the probability of
Sherwood's return to renew the attack.
`No, damn him!' exclaimed the wretch bitterly;
`he supposed, as I did, that all of your band, as
well as most of our own, had perished in the
explosion
.
No! the infernal villain intended I should die,'
he continued, with an expression rendered fairly
diabolical
by rage, combined with the bodily anguish he
was enduring. `But he did not dream I should fall
alive in your hands, else he had finished me on the
spot to prevent it, the black souled devil! for he
is well aware that I know enough of him, and his
father before him, to make my revenge as ample as
it will be sweet.'
`What do you know of his father?' asked
Captain
Hendee, stepping forward with looks of eager
curiosity and interest.
`Enough,' replied the other`enough of both, to
my sorrow: for between them, they have worked
my ruin and death.In aiding the old man in his
villainy, I damned my soul; and in abetting that of
his son, I have lost my life, for I feel that I must go
now soon, though I might have been saved.Yes,
and what have they done for me? what can they
do now? Nothing! The old man has gone to his
place; and Jakeperdition seize him!'
`What do you mean?' sharply demanded the
Captain: `Is John Sherwood dead?Why, Jake
told me before he turned devil to us, and not more
than a week since neither, that his father was alive
and'
`And what if he did,' interrupted Darrow,
growing
restless and impatient from the pain which was
now evidently beginning to invade the citadel of
life,`what if he did? The old man made a will
too much in favor of your daughter here, or you,
he suspects; and all was to be kept dark till he
could bring certain things about.'
`Man, man, you are deceiving me!' cried the
other warmly.
`Father, I believe he is speaking the truth,'
interposed
the daughter, to whose mind the late conduct
of Sherwood, before inexplicable, was now
explained
.
`Truthtruth! Alma Hendee,' resumed the
wounded man, now breathing thick, and speaking
with increasing difficulty;`it is only the beginning
of truths, that concerns you all, thatthat I could
that I must and will tell, ifif soul and body will
hold together long enough for me to expose'
`Expose what? what can you reveal?go on!
speakspeak!' exclaimed the old gentleman,
impatiently
breaking in on the other, in a tone and air of
feverish excitement.
Waitwait,' resumed Darrow, grating his
clenched
teeth and writhing about in a fresh paroxism of
anguish.`I willwill tell allbut wait till this is
overO, that pain! Oh! God! that pain, that
pain!' and the poor wretch gasped for breath and
wildly threw about his arms in the insufferable
pangs of his agony.
`Captain Hendee,' he faintly, and in a softened
tone, resumed, after the desperate paroxism had
subsided
,
`did you ever mistrust that John Sherwood
played you foul in respect to your property, which
you was blind enough to intrust to his
management
?'
`WhyI thought strange,' replied the other,
`and yet I could not detectbut was he dishonest
then?'
`Yes,' exclaimed Darrow; `in that final settlement
he defrauded you out of more than half of what
was honestly your own: and, as the main instance,
you recollect a large landed law suit he brought in
you behalf?'
`I do,' said the Captain, `and finding he must
fail in it, and subject me to ruinous costs, he
compromised by paying a small sum, and withdrew
the action, as I understood.'
`Well, now, it is God's truth, Captain,' rejoined
the former, `that instead of paying any thing, he
received a large sum,his adversary, and not he,
finding he must fail.'
`The faithless villain!' exclaimed the astonished
Captain, `may the wrathbut I will not curse him,
now he is gone.'
`No, for you can revenge yourself more
effectually
,'
said the other: `the man with whom this
compromise
was made is still alive; and, though it was
agreed that the transaction should be kept a dead
secret, there is no doubt he will swear to the amount
he payed Sherwood, as he was not privy to the
fraud on you!'
`But how know you all this?' asked the Captain,
some new doubt seeming to arise in his mind.
`You will know directly,' replied Darrow`that
is, ifif I tell you the rest'he continued, pausing
and hesitating, as if irresolute whether to proceed;
but at length seeming to make up his mind, he
resumed
,
`Captain Hendee, you once had a darling
son, who was lost?'
`I did, I did,' responded the other with visible
emotion.
`And you have heard,' continued the former,
`that he was last seen with a young man in John
Sherwood's employdid you ever see that young
man?'
`No,' said the Captain, `nor do I know what
became
of him, or whether he is now living.'
`He is still living, but will not be long,' said
Darrow: `you see him in the miserable, shattered
and dying creature lying before you, Captain
Hendee
.'
`You! you!' wildly and fiercely exclaimed the
old man, `but what f my son? wretch! did you
murder the boy?' he added, raising his voice almost
to a frantic scream, as the suspicion flashed over his
anticipating thoughts.
`No, I was spared that,' answered the other,
`though my instigator, who was no other than that
same John Sherwood, expected it of me, I think.
No, I came across an Indian, who, for a bottle of
rum, was willing to take the boy where his friends
should never hear of him again.'
`And you agreed with the hell-hound to do it,
did you, monster!' again fiercely demanded the
Captain
.
`Yes, I did thatI own it! I own it! aye, I
confess
it!' exclaimed Darrow, eagerly repeating the
words, as if he had brought himself to this act of
penitence by some mighty effort. `There!' he
added
,
wildly and menancingly brandishing his fist at
some imaginary presence, as he began to draw up
his limbs and glare deliriously around him under
another and fearful attack of his pains, `there! I
have confessed it, you black fiend!' and with a
terrible
yell of seeming exultation and defiance, he fell
back convulsed from head to foot; and for many
moments, he appeared to be wrestling terribly with the
angel of death.
At length, however, he became calm, and again
opened his eyes upon the horror-stricken, but
intensely
interested company.
`I can't live through another like thatso let me
speak while I canyou would know more of your
son?' faintly said the reviving wretch, turning his
glazed and blood-shot eye languidly upon the
Captain
.
`Yes, yes,' replied the other in a softened and
imploring tone; `yes, if you have strength to go on,
tell me, if you know, for God's sake tell me,
whether
there is any hope for a bereaved and
sorrow-stricken
old man?Did you ever hear of the boy
do you think he is still living?'
`If that boy lived to grow up,' said Darrow, in
reply,if he be still among the living, Captain
Hendee, I believe he is now standing by your side.'
Wholly unprepared for a developement so
unexpected
and improbable, the company stood silently
gazing at each other a moment with looks of
mingled
doubt and astonishment; when Selden, who was
obviously the one alluded to by the confessant, and
who had appeared thoughtful and abstracted during
the latter part of the conversation, now turned to
the other, and, with the air of one trying to recall
some indistinct image of other days, observed,
`I have some strange dim recollectionsbut
what circumstances can you name to warrant the
belief you have just expressed?'
`Why, if I am right,' answered Darrow, `as I
still think I am, you must have had, for many years,
if you have not now, the proof on your own person!
For before I parted from the boy, I pricked two
crossed arrows, with lasting ink, into his skin, near
the elbow.'
A flash of joyous intelligence instantly broke
over the beaming countenance of the young officer,
and, as quick as thought, his arm was bared and held
exultingly aloft, disclosing the still visibly impicted
arrows to the astonished and delighted group around
him.
For one full minute not a word was uttered, and
the mute eloquence of the speaking countenance
alone told the springing emotions of those most
interested
in this unexpected but happy denouement.
`My son!' at length convulsively burst from the
trembling lips of the overpowered father: `God
blessblessbless'and his voice died away in
whimpering murmers, as father, son and daughter
rushed into one long, sobbing embrace.
Aroused in a short time from this absorbing
scene of gushing affections, by a noise from the
wounded man, the company turned toward him. A
change was passing over his face, and with the low
muttered words, `REVENGEDREVENGED ON THE
DESTROYERS OF MY SOUL AND BODY, AT LAST!' he
gave one long, quivering gasp and expired.
On the proposal of Selden, for such, for
covenience
,
we will for the present continue to call him,
the company now left the spot, and proceeded to
an open and unincumbered space by the road side,
where the whole band were soon assembled
preparatory
to a final removal from the scene of action.
At that instant a band of twenty armed horsemen
burst suddenly from the woods, and came pouring,
in gallant array, along the road from the south
towards
the spot. From their equipments and general
appearance, they were instantly discovered to be a
detachment of mounted riflemen from the
Continental
army, headed by a field officer of
considerable
rank.
`You are the day after the Fair, my hearties,
gaily remarked Captain Hendee, whose over
mastering
feelings at the recent joyful discovery, had
now settled down into a fine flow of spirits. `But I
am glad they have come, for I want the whole world
to know how proud I feel of my new found son.'
`Aye, but when they hear,' replied the young
officer
in the same spirit, `that we owe this victory,
and with it our lives, solely to the old veteran's plan
of blowing up the enemy by wholesale, ten to one,
they don't say, that the son has far the most reason
to pride himself in the happy discovery.
Seriously
,
however, the arrival of these men, at this
moment
,
is most opportune, as some of them,
doubtless
,
will give up their horses to convey you, the
females
and children from the place. But what ails
our merry friend Jones, yonder?' he added, pointing
to the scout, who stood in the foreground, eagerly
and with mouth agape, looking at the advancing
24
cavalcade, and holding his cap in his hand, as if
about to hurl it into the air, in some joyous
outbreak
.
`He is about to welcome them with a few cheers,
I suspect,' replied the captain. `And hang me, if I
don't join him; for if I don't give vent to my
feelings
in some way, I believe my old broken shell of
a heart will burst for very joy, like some old rusty
howitzer, charged to the muzzle with gunpowder.'
`No, no, father,' rejoined the other good
humoredly
,'
`joy rarely proves as explosive as that, I
imagine
.
But I must forward to attend to this
reception
myself,Jones,' he continued, advancing to the
front, `let us ascertain their object, and a little more
exactly who they are, before we make up our mouths
for much of a hurra on the occasion.'
`Well that's jest what I'm at, Captain,' said the
scout; `and I calkerlate I have about two thirds
found out both them particulars, already: for, if
twenty-four hours ago, I had seen a chap riding
towards me, with the make, and bearing of that
officer
,
who sits so splendid in his saddle younder,
I would have sworn, with a quarter of this
bothering
,
that it wasand, by the living Lazarus! I'll
swear it is nowso here's hurra for the unshot
Colonel
!
hurra! hurra!' he added, throwing his cap thirty
feet in the air, and leaping, in the extacy of his joyous
emotions, a yard from the earth at each of his
stentorian
shouts; in the last of which he was heartily
joined by the whole band of his delighted comrades,
as their beloved commander, the heroic Warrington,
whom they had mourned as slain, now came
dashing
up to the spot, bowing low in token of
acknowledgement
of this flattering mark of their esteem.
`Had you dropped down from the clouds before
our eyes, Colonel Warrington,' said Selden, after
the noise and bustle of this enthusiastic reception
had a little subsided, `your presence could have
scarcely more surprised us.'
`Indeed!'
`Yes, you was reported to have fallen in the last
moments of the battle.'
`I must then have been mistaken, I think, for
Colonel Francis.'
`Has that noble fellow then indeed been added
to the honored catalogue of martyrs in our glorious
cause?'
`I grieve to say it.He fell covered with wounds,
bravely fighting at the head of his regiment.'
`But you, and your men?'
`We yet mostly live to give Burgoyne a
thrashing
.
But here, overpowered with numbers, by my
own orders, we broke, scattered and fled, to meet
again at Manchester. Reaching Rutland last night,
and guessing at your course, and at your danger, I
collected this small force, and hastened to the
rescue
.
And now, Captain, for your report, which,
with these evidences of a conflict before me, I should
dread to hear, but for the merry looks of the men,
and the sunny faces of my fair friends whom I
notice
youder in the rear.'
`All in good time, my dear Colonel; but come,
first go along with me,' said Selden with a
significant
and slightly mischievous smile, as he took the
arm of his superior, and urged him forward to the
spot where the interesting group to which he had
just alluded still stood, in the agitation of their
joyful
surprise, with sparkling eyes and happy and
fluttering
hearts, eagerly waiting to greet him.
But over the touching and tender scene that
followed
,
marked as it was by the reuniting of long
estranged hearts, like the rushing together of kindred
waters, the surprising announcement of Selden's
recently discovered relationship, and the mad pranks
of the excited old veteran, now clamouring for the
curses of Warrington on his own head, for his
blindness
and folly, and now eagerly bestowing the hand
of his daughter, as a compensation and reward, with
many a sob-broken ejaculation for blessings on the
happy coupleover all this will we drop the curtain,
not caring to trust the pen to vie with the reader's
outstripping fancy in filling up the picture.
Before another hour had elapsed the whole were
mounted and in motion, on their unmolested way to
the older settlements in the southern part of the
Grants.
CONCLUSION.
The rolling seasons had nearly completed their
annual round since the stirriug incidents, which we
last narrated, transpired, and nature was again
enrobing
herself in the leafy glories of summer. The
great struggle on the northern frontiers was over.
The battle of Bennington had been fought and won,
immortalizing the name of the Roman Stark, and
covering with deathless laurels the brave Green
Mountain Boys. The whole of that proud army,
indeed, that swept, the last season, so vauntingly
along these desolated shores, had felt the vengeful
arm of young Freedom, and withered at the touch.
The inhabitants on the borders of Champlain, who
had fled before the tempest of war, had mostly
returned
,
and were now in possession of their
unmolested
homes. The seat of their country's strife
was removed to a distance. And the husbandman
was again following his plow in the field; the
peaceful
sounds of the axeman were heard in the woods,
and the hunter once more roamed his deer-trod
hills unsuspicious of hostile ambush.
At the pleasant, and no longer desolate cottage of
Captain Hendee, a company, evidently much larger
than the usual family circle, were assembled.The
old veteran, as was formerly his wont, was sitting in
his easy chair before one of the open windows of
the parlor, solacing himself with his old companion,
the pipe. The other window was occupied by a
fine looking military person, now in the full bloom
of vigourous manhood, richly dressed in the
lacetrimed
uniform, and the surmounted badges of a
field officer in the continental army; while by his
side sat a peerless girl, whose simple, but rich and
tasteful array of spotless white, surmounted by the
emblematic rose of the same color, instead of the
dumb, unspeaking jewel, told of bridal
preparation
.
They were gazing out upon the glittering
expanse
of the breeze ruffled waters of the Lake, and
the gratified eye of the officer was resting on the
bright folds of his country's flag, which was again
proudly waving in the distance over the walls of the
opposite fortress; while the delicately blended
fondness
and respect, that marked the blissful look of
each, and the tender pathos of their low
intermingling
voices, as they exchanged the occasional remark,
betokened the presence of mutual confidence and
love. There was another maiden in the room,
*24
scarcely less beautiful than the one just mentioned,
but though arrayed like her fair companion, in the
bridal garb, yet she sat unmated and alone, now
listlessly running over the leaves of a little volume
in her hand, and now anxiously and impatiently
glancing through the window along the road to the
south, as if expecting the appearance of some one
from that quarter. The only other person at
present
in this apartment, with whom the reader has
been made acquainted, was a modest, staid looking
female, who, though comely, and not greatly faded,
had yet evidently out-lived, by many years, the
freshness
and bloom of beauty's most favored period,
She was sitting quietly in a corner, partly screened
from the rest of the company by a door that swung
inward. She, also, had been companionless, and had
not, like the restless fair one last described, appeared
to expect to be otherwise. But at this moment a
singularly tall, woodsman-looking fellow came
stooping
through the door-way from the adjoining room,
where part of the company still remained; when
after
throwing a half sheepish, half mischievous look
around him, apparently to see if his movement was
particularly noticed, he sidled around the swinging
door, with a sort of hesitating, stealthy, air, and
sunk by degrees into a chair beside the demure
looking
damsel of whom we were speaking.
`Well, now, if this ain't curious fix!' were his
first words`I vow to Never-come-Jacka sort of
Saturday in the afternoon-chap that we used to
swear by in the armyif it ain't too bad! Don't
you think so, now, honestly, Miss Ruth?'
`What is it that you complain of as so bad, Mr.
Jones?' replied the girl, with a good natured and
encouraging smile, which seemed instantly to
re-assure
her somewhat flustered companion, as he
replied
.
`What do I complain of?Why, to be invited,
as I was, by the Colonel and Alma there, to be here
at 2 o'clock to see three weddings; when now it is
well along towards night, and one bridegroom don't
get on according to agreement, and no parson come
to fix them that are here and ready for it. Now I
like to see folks put out of their misery in some kind
of season; and so do the rest of them, I've a
notion
:only
jest look at the old Captain, yonder!
He is getting out of sorts at the delay rather rapid,
a body would guess, by the manner he is puffing
away at his old comforter there. And there is the
Scotch bird, too,may I miss my next aim on Old
Trusty, if I don't believe she'll fly away, if Major
Selden, as he has now got to beMajor Hendee, I
spose, you'll call him heredon't come soon.'
`Jessy does, indeed, appear rather uneasy,'
observed
the other, `and I really wonder Edward don't
come, myself: He sent us word, that he expected
to get the Sherwood property all settled so as to
start from Albany yesterday morning. But you
said three weddings, did'nt you?'
`Three, did I say, Ruth?' asked Pete with
waggish
gravity`Well, two thenthat is, if there ain't
raaly any chance to be another, no way.'
`Why what other could there be?' said Ruth
quite innocently.
`Well, now, I can't exactly say, but I was
thinking
it was rather a pity there shouldn't be another
match worked up here somehow?' replied the scout,
with a look at the other so significant, that it brought
the blood into her cheeks. `You hold to saving
time and expense don't you?'
`Why, it is well enough to think of that in some
cases, perhaps,' muttered the doubtful and confused
girl,'
`Then suppose when the priest comes,' said the
other with a roguish squint at her glowing cheeks
and down cast looks, `suppose you jest stand up
withwithwith old Captain Hendee, to be
noosed
the same time his children are?'
`O, nonsense! Mr. Jones,' replied the girl
greatly
relieved, and yet evidently disappointed at this
turn in the scout's remarks, which she supposed
were to terminate in proposing one much nearer
home`Captain Hendee! why he is old enough to
be my father!Besides he would not have me.'
`Yes he would.'
`No he wouldn't.'
`Well, if he should flummux at such a chance,
I know of a chapand not too old neitherwho'll
agree to take his place.'
`Really, Mr. Jones, I think you must be trying
to trifle with me?'
`Mayhap you've mistaken, now,' said Jones with
the air of one about to make some hazardous push,
but looking keenly about for some chance to secure
his retreat.
`Then how am I to consider what you say?'
asked
the other seriously.
`Whywhy'said Pete, hesitating, but finding
himself at a point where he must back out entirely,
or proceed directly with his object, he added, with
a sort of desperate resolution,`Yes, I willso here
goes for dead ruinyou may consider it, Ruth, as
good and earnest an offer as ever a man stuck an axe
in a tree.'
`Why, surely Mr. Jones!this is so suddenso
unexpected, that you cannot expect me now, as you
have never before spoken to me on the subject'
`No, but I've looked at you on the subject, Ruth;
and that an't all, I have thought on the subject,
and that too, ever since I left off sogering, after we
had used up that old trooper, Burgoyne, last fall.
But I didn't know how to get at the bothering
business
.
And now I have got at it, I want to do it all
up, while I've got the knack of it. Now all I've to
say for myself, by way of recommend, is jest only
this,I have a farm, and can love like a two year
old. And if you can go it on that, let us agree on
the spot, and go off with the rest.'
`Impossible, Mr. Jonesthat is nowifif I
had a little time for reflectionperhaps'
`Good! grand! glorious! I'll give you time, till
the parson comes,a good half hour, I'll warrant
you,' exclaimed the woodsman, leaping up in his
extacy
,
and, with a sudden bolt through the door,
bounding off into the fields, and giving vent to his
delighted feelings in his old chorus, `Trol, lol, lol,
de larly!'
At that moment a horseman rode hastily into the
yard, leaped from his saddle, and, with a few light
and joyous bounds, landed on the threshold.
`My brother!' exclaimed Alma, rising and
rushing
to the door.
`My son, God bless you!' said the Coptain,
hobbling
forward with extended hand. `But how came
you to be lagging at such a juncture as this, you
truant
?'
`O, Edward!' cried Jessy, bursting from an
adjoining
room, to which she had a few moments
before
retired, `O, Edward!' repeated the joyful but
wayward girl, flying to the open arms of her
betrothed
,
now dashing her hands about her to clear
her way among the advancing group, and now
shaking
her slender finger aloft in affected menace as
she went: `now, if I don't punish you for this, sir!
Back! back all of you, till I deal with the villain
for his conduct.'
`Fairly a prisoner, sir; you may as well
surrender
,
Major,' gaily observed Warrington to the
laughing
young officer, now enclosed on every side by
beseiging friends.
`Aye, aye, Colonel,' blithely replied the latter;
`but I shall be upon my parol in a moment, I think;
when I will pay my respectsI have a glad secret
for your ear, Warrington.'
`A secret! a secret to be kept from us, at this
hour!' exclaimed both of the girls at once,
summoning
a storm of affected indignation to their
pretty
brows.
`Ah! you little tyrranizers!' said the Major,
jocosely
,
`you are wise to make the most of your
power now; for your reign is short. I saw the
parson
falling into the road behind me, about a mile
back.'
The last intimation seemed to produce an instant
effect on the young officer's fair assailants. And
releasing him at once, they fled, in maidenly
dismay
,
to their private apartment to compose and
prepare
themselves for the happy, though half dreaded
crisis.
`Now, my son, tell us, in a word, what success
you have met with at Albany,' said Captain
Hendee
,
turning to his son as the girls disappeared.
`Very fair:the business is all definitely settled
at last.'
`Right glad to hear that; but first, I am curious
to know with what kind of face that black-hearted
imp of mischief, Jake Sherwood, met you, after all
that has happened?'
`It was not till after many fruitless efforts, and a
long negociation, carried on with him by a
go-between
of his own kidney, that he could be induced
to come from his lurking places to face me at all.
And when he did, it was with the same fawning and
cringing, the same dissembling and falsehood, that
has marked his whole career.'
`And what kind of a treaty did you at length
conclude with the arch villain?'
`Better than he had any reason to expect from
those who had both the right and the power on their
side: for, after taking from the estate that part
which Jake had counted as his own by Uncle's will,
when I was considered as disposed of, and which of
course became mine, on establisbing my identity as
your son,and after deducting also the legacies,
which old Sherwood's conscience wrung from him
in favor of you and Alma, together with the sums,
which the indefatigable Vanderpool had found
evidence
of having been embezzled by the old man out
of your property,even after counting your
legacies
as so much restitutionafter deducting all
these, there would have been a mere pittance in
equity, and nothing, probably, in law, left for the
miscreant. And as he had been apprised of this
by Vanderpool, whom he could neither intimidate
nor corrupt, he chose to throw himself on my
mercy
,
rather than contend with us in law.'
`Well, as skillfully as this web of iniquity was
woven, it is all unravelled, then, at last. But what
did you finally allow him?'
`A thousand pounds; for while I despised, I
could not but pity the abject wretch. He signed
acquittances, received his portion, in money and
drafts, and the same day, as I accidentally learned,
started off to join his tory brethren at the south.'
The conversation was here interrupted by the
arrival
of the parson, who had scarcely been ushered
into the house, before yet another guest was
announced
.
This was the amazon widow, who now rode
into the yard, attended by Neshobee, each having a
brace of her hardy urchins, disposed of behind and
before, on the cruppers and necks of the Captain's
thus trebly burdened horses, which had been
kindly
sent for that purpose early in the morning.
`Not at the eleventh hour after all,' said the
woman
,
as with stately tread she came sweeping into
the room, and gave her hand successively to each of
the assembled guests, who rose, and with looks of
mingled cordiality and respect, advanced to meet
her. `Well, I am gratified to find I am not too
late to witness the ceremony, though another
motive
mainly prompted my coming.'
`Another motive?' said the Captain, `what might
that be?'
`Gratitude,' rejoined the widow feelingly`to
offer, in person, the thanks and blessings of the
widow
and fatherless to these brave and generous young
officers, for their undeserved gift of fifty pounds.'
`Not undeserved, especially from us, permit me
to say, Mrs. Story,' replied Major Hendee. `And
our only fear was, that it would not even requite you
for the losses you sustained on our account on that
fearful night, which none of us can ever forget.'
`Not requite me? O, moredoubly so,' replied
the woman, mastering her grateful emotions, and
resuming her naturally free and easy manner: `Why,
gentlemen, if you would but visit us there now, you
would see a new house worth two of the old one,
flourishing crops, and a well provisioned and happy
familyand all from your bounty.'
`Our pittance, if you please,' observed the
Colonel
,
`and that too, under the management of one,
who, I must say, of all women'
`Has the least patience with a flatterer, Colonel,'
interrupted the widow with good natured bluntness,
jumping up and going to the window, as something
seemed suddenly to occur to her mind. `Now, I
should like to know, if you gentlemen can tell me,'
she resumed, after gazing out on the lake a moment,
`I should like to know the meaning of the great
stir I noticed over at the fort, as I came down the
road: one would think they were preparing for a
battle.'
`We heard a firing in the direction of
Ticonderoga
an hour or two ago, which we could not
account
for, but have noticed nothing unusual over
here, I believe,' said Captain Hendee, looking
enquiringly
at the two officers.
`Ah! your promised secret, Major?' cried
Warrington
,
perceiving a knowing and mysterious smile
upon the countenance of the other.
`You shall have it nowthe rest of the
company
will know it soon,' replied the Major,
approaching
his superior and whispering in his ear.
`God bless you for the news!' exclaimed the
Colonel, with a look of joyful surprise. `But where
did you meet him?'
`At Bennington, where he arrived but three days
ago amidst the roar of guns and the shouts of a
rejoicing
people. I persuaded him to come on with
me, as he did, to Skenesboro'; when he took the
25
water, while I came by land, having first
despatched
a runner to notify the garrisons at the two posts
of his approach.'
`Heaven be praised!' rejoined Warrington, `and
let the Green Mountains rejoice!'
`They will, soon; for yonder he comes, by Jove!'
exclaimed the Major, eagerly pointing out upon the
lake.
At that instant the house shook and trembled to the
reverberating roar of a twenty-four pounder,
belching
forth a cloud of fire and smoke from the grey
walls of the opposite fortress.
The surprised and startled company instantly
rushed into the yard. A light sail boat had just
made her appearace on the lake from the south, and,
with bellying canvass, was now scudding rapidly
before the freshening breeze, with her course
evidently
set for the fort. As she neared, a tall, erect,
military figure appeared conspicuously standing on
the forecastle, with folded arms, gazing steadily
forward
towards the works, around whose ramparts
were seen the long rows of the expectant officers
and soldiers of the garrison; while, at momentary
intervals, came the welcoming peal of the deep
mouthed
gun. At length the sails of the vessel were
furled
,
and she swept round and lay to, directly abreast
of the fort; which, the next instant, was suddenly
enveloped in a springing cloud of smoke, while the
tall forest around nodded to the united roar of a
dozen
cannon, among the broken echoes of which, as
they rolled from shore to shore and died away among
the far responding mountains, was heard the noisy
salute of drums, and the reiterated cheers of the
soldiery, once more making the welkin ring with the
name of `Ethan Allen!'
After a brief interval of silence, the same little
craft was seen, with hoisted sails, emerging from
the lifting clouds of smoke, and making her way
directly
across the lake towards the cottage. And in
ten minutes more the hero of the Green Mountains,
unexpectedly returned from a long and painful
captivity
,
was received, and ushered into the house
amidst the warm and unfeigned congratulations of
the rejoicing party.
`Well, Colonel Allen,' said Captain Hendee,
scanning the thin and worn person of the other, as
they all became seated in the room, `they have
rather worsted you in your captivity, I perceive: you
are now hardly the staunch and iron bound fellow
you was three years ago, when eight or ten armed
hirelings came here to seize you as a York outlaw,
but were fairly cowed out of the attempt till they
supposed you asleep, and a little worse off than that
too, perhaps.'
`Aha! my old friend, do you remember that
foolish
scrape?' replied Allen. `No, no, Captain, not
the man I was then,' he added, glancing over the huge
raw bones of his shrunken frame with a melancholy
smile; `no, the British could never forgive me for
taking old Ti; so with characteristic magnanimity
to a fallen foe, they took their revenge by battering,
hewing, hacking and starving the oldbody, till there
is scarcely enough left of it to furnish a habitable
tenement for the soul, which remains as whole and
sound as ever; for that, thank God, they could
neither
kill nor bribe.'
`Bribe! bribe! did they really try to do that?'
exclaimed the young officers, laughing at the thought
of an attempt to buy up Ethan Allen.
`To be sure, did the infernal fools!' said Allen,
`and that more than once; though the last, and
perhaps
the best offer I ever had to induce me to damn
myself, that is, to become one of them, was made me
by a high dignitary of the crown, who, in behalf of
his prince, as he said, offered me nearly half the
lands in Vermont, if I would enter his service
against my countrymen!the Christless knave! It
was well for him that I was handcuffed, at the time.'
`And what answer did you give him?' asked
Warrington, curiously.
`Answer?' replied Allen, smoothing his dark
brows, which had become fierce and stormy at the
remembered insult, `what answer? why, I told the
royal ape to go and tell his master, that he
reminded
me, in his offer to give me lands in America, of
a certain other prince, mentioned in scripture, who
took the Savior up into a high mountain, and
showing
him all the kingdoms of the world, offered to
give him the whole of them, if he would fall down
and worship him,when the fact was, the poor
devil
had not a single foot of land on earth to give!'
The subject was here dropped by common
consent
;
when, after a brief pause, Major Hendee
turned
a significant look upon his father, who seemed
readily to understand what was now expected of
him, and he accordingly observed,
`I suppose you have been apprised, Colonel
Allen
,
of the happy occasion, upon which, after all
our troubles, we have been permitted to assemble?'
`I have, sir,' gallantly answered the other, `and
I felt, that my peculiar notions, relative to the
certainty
of the earthly rewards of bravery and virtue,
were strikingly confirmed, when I learned, that my
two friends here were about to draw such rich prizes
in the lottery of life.'
`Ah! Colonel Allen,' exclaimed Jessy archly,
`you, too, caught playing the flatterer? I had
thought well enough of you to believe you an
exception
to the generality of men, in that respect.
But I'll expose you, my brave Colonel!What did
you say and predict, at the time you captured
Ticonderoga
,
respecting the intimacy which you were
then accidentally led to suspect existed between
your then Lieutenant Selden and Colonel Reed's
daughter?'
`Why, the deuce is to pay!' cried Allen, taken
rather aback by his fair antagonist`there has been
treason here, somewhere. I recollect something
about my misgivings in the matter. But I am not
a going to be tricked out of my compliment, at all
events: for, if the daughter of a British Colonel has
the independence to marry a Yankee rebel, she must
be, to him, at least, a prize richly worth the
winning
.'
`She is not married yet,' observed Captain
Hendee
,
with well assumed seriousness: `for before that
is suffered to take place, I, who stand as a sort of
sponsor for the girl, must be heard in the business:
and to this end, I beg leave to read a little from my
letter of instructions from her father; which I have
never before made known,' he added, producing a
letter, from which he proceeded to read to his
surprised
and wondering auditors the following extract:
Wi' regard to that wayward bairn o' mine, an'
that Mr. Nabody, her rebel lover, as I became
satisfied
he was, it is out o' the question I should be
consentin'
to a match o' sic a sort. Na, she must be
cured, an' in some sic way as I named to you.
An' that being done, then her old lover, Major
Skene, will come in for an easy conquest. But in
25*
your moves to this object, let me again caution you
to beware how you forbid this intimacy; for ever
since mother Eve's dido wi' the apple, the moment
you forbid, the Diel taks the woman.'
`Father, how is this, and at this late hour?'
exclaimed
the astonished son, glancing from the
former
to the no less surprised girl at his side, who also
began to open her lips in remonstrance, when,
detecting
a lurking smile on the old gentleman's
countenance
,
she stopped short.
`Perhaps we may as well read a passage from
another letter of a more rececent date,' said the
Captain, opening another paper, from which, after slyly
enjoying the perplexity of the party interested, a
moment, he read,
So, you sly old Yankee, you an' Jessy hae
contrived
to check-mate me at last! This comes o'
leaving a daughter in a land o' rebellion: nathless
I canna but say, I regret that circumstances will not
permit me to be present to take my stoup on the
merry occasion, which you say, wi' my consent, is
to tak place early the coming summer: weel, you
may tell the younker, wi'out hinting my good
opinion
o' him as aboon written, that, upon the whole, I
will own him as a son-in-law, provided he will tak
the crap o' wild oats which the chick, frae sa
plentifu'
a sowing, must now hae ready for the reaping,
as a portion o' the wife's dowry.
`Gad! I begin to like the humerous old fellow,'
said Allen; `and that stoup which he regrets he
cannot take with us, I will drink to his health as an
extra bumper after the ceremony. Though before
that takes place, I would ask if there are no more
cases which might be settled at this time?'
`We know of none,' replied the Captain and his
son, to whom the last part of the speaker's remarks
had been addressed in an undertone.
`I don't know about that,' rejoined the former, `I
have been looking about me a little, and it strikes
me that there are materials enough, at least. If you
will make me master of the ceremonies, with
powers
to draw out the parties?'
`Certainly, certainly, Colonel,' replied the others,
laughing, but shaking their heads dubiously at the
well understood suggestion.
`No faith, eh? Well, there is nothing like
trying,' rejoined Allen. `Jones,' he continued,
now turning round to the scout, who had resumed
his seat by the side of Ruth, `Jones, you have been
a brave fellowhow is it that you are not be
rewarded
,
at this time, as well as the rest?'
`Well, I've jest been thinking, Colonel, replied
Jones, screwing up his phiz, now queerly streaked
with blushes, `that it was rather a hard case,
considering
,
that I shouldn't have any share in the
loaves and fishes. But the fact is, that the fish that
I've had in my eye,' he added, casting a sheepish
glance at Ruth, `won't quite say, whether I'm to be
in luck to day, or not.'
`Aha! just as I thought. But she shall say,'
cried
Allen, advancing a step towards the confused and
blushing maiden, on whom all eyes were now
turned
in surprise, at this development of a courtship
so little expected; `she shall give you an answer, at
least, or, by the wrath of Cupid! she shall be
punished
for her cruelty by running a kissing gauntlet
through the company. And I'll have the first one,'
he added, still further advancing, as if to suit the
action to the word.
`It is so rediculous!' stammered the shrinking
Ruth.
`Perhaps you would rather say yes to my worthy
friend, here?' said the former, his lip slightly
curling
with a sportive smile.
`I shouldthat is, II should,' replied the girl,
dropping her head in confusion.
`Do you see that?' exultingly said Allen`I
have succeeded in spite of your faithlessness: nor
do I believe my triumphs need end even here.'
`Ah! I will knock under, Colonel,' observed the
Captain, laughing.
`Ay, ay,' responded the Major, gaily, `we must
now acknowledge your prowess in the court of
Cupid
,
as well as in the camp of Mars. But be not
over ambitious, lest your zeal be dampened by a
failure. Where will you find materials for another
triumph?'
`Here,' answered the other, pointing to
Neshobee
and Zilpah, who, for reasons best understood by
themselves, had also paired off in a corner together.
`I have been reading eyes, which are about the
only
book I ever read where we are sure of the truth;
and if those who control these persons should have
no objections'
`Never mind that, Colonel, if you have faith for
the trial,' exclaimed the old Captain, entering into
the full spirit of the game.
`Upon my word, Colonel Allen, I think you a
most incorrigible meddler; but you may proceed,
for aught I care,' said Miss Reed, pouting most
beautifully
.
`Ah, don't laugh, ye wise ones till you see,' said
the jovial matchmaker, confidently. `Well, Miss
Zilpah,' he continued, familiarly addressing the half
blood, `you see which way your young mistress is
about to travelnow, as you intend to follow her
fortunes, don't you think it would be more pleasant
and suitable for you to have some such brave and
trusty companion on the road as Neshobee here
would make you?'
`Ki!' exclaimed the girl, with a blush which
brought her cheek to a fellow redness with that of
the young Indian by her side. `He! you queer man!
But Neshobee, he no hab me.'
`Good!' cried the former, `there is a challenge
for you, my red friend. She says you wont marry her!'
`Umph!' uttered the still grave, though
evidently
delighted native, `me never know Zilpah tell lie
before.'
`There! you unbelievers,' exclaimed Allen,
looking
round triumphantly upon the company, `see
what a man can do. Now, parson, do your duty.'
Reader, our story is told, and, with a word upon
the subsequent career of those in whose destinies
we trust we have been able in some degree to
interest
you, we will bid you adieu:
Of that singular, bold, rough, versatile, yet
honest
and strong minded man, Ethan Allen, little more
need be said. The remainder of his public life was
devoted to the accomplishment of that object, for
which he had so fearlessly contended before the
revolution
,
the independence of his state. And her
history sufficiently attests to the importance of his
services.
The gallant young officers, after their twice
extended
furloughs had expired, leaving their lovely
and loving wives at the cottage of Captain Hendee,
to cheer and soothe the old veteran in his declining
years, and, in due time, to render his second
childhood
any thing but companionless, returned to their
posts in the army, in which, honored and
distinguished
,
they remained, till they had witnessed the
achievement of their country's independence; when
they retired to their homes in the Green Mountains,
to receive from their fellow citizens those substantial
memorials of their esteem which may still be found
recorded among some of the early acts of the
Legislature
of Vermont, granting valuable tracts of
land to certain individuals for important public
services
.
Pete Jones and his staid spouse immediately
repaired
to their little opening in the woods, where,
having renewed his acquaintance with his rusty axe,
he caused the forest to melt away before his
powerful
arm, till his labors were rewarded by one of the
best farms on the borders of the lake; while his
wife became one of the most notable of housewives,
having never had cause to regret her abrupt
connection
with the eccentric, though amiable woodsman,
as may be inferred from the opinions she was often
heard to express in favor of long men and short
courtships.
Widow Story remained on her farm, cultivating
and enlarging it with her own hands for many years;
when, her oldest son having at length been enabled
to butt his mother, to use a chopper's phrase, that is,
to get off his cut first, in a trial of skill on the same
log, she concluded to betake herself to household
duties, giving up her farm work to her sturdy little
band of foresters, who, in the process of time, let
in the sun on extensive tracts of some of the finest
lands on Otter Creek.
Neshobee and his yellow rib continued to reside
on the farm of Captain Hendee, in a log hut built
expressly for them, till the old gentleman's death;
when they removed to the woody shores of the
Horican
,
where they spent their days in a ceaseless
warfare
upon the beautiful trout of the lake, and the
dear; bear and other wild animals of its surrounding
shores.
And, lastly, the miscreant Sherwood, who, through
the inscrutable ways of Providence, was permitted
to live, Cain like, to old age, found his way, at the
close of the revolution, to the common refuge of
American tories in Canada, where he finished his
days in poverty and disgrace, always obtaining
credit
by flattery and falsehood, always abusing it by
fraud and treachery, and living, indeed, abhorred by
men and seemingly accursed of God.
THE END.From my heart I thank you for your kind note.
All as yet remains undiscovered,painful, painful
exigency! which compels concealment of so
important
a step from an only parent! And yet I regret
not my troth; and whatever of sorrow it may cost
me, I will not repine at the fruit of a tree of my
own planting. Heaven preserve you, my very dear
friend, in the hour of peril, and crown with success
your efforts in the cause of freedom.
Yours, but too truly,
A. H.Your few lines, my dear sir, have been
received
,
and read, I know not how many times over, and
with an interest which I dare not acknowledge.
Your propositions, too, have been all candidly, and
even anxiously weighed. And it is with many,
very
many regrets, my more than friend, that I am
forced to the conclusion that, at present, it were
better
,
that they be not complied with. You first
propose
to come here openly, explain to my father the
reasons which compelled you to that course, which
he pretends so much to censure, and claim the
privilege
of addressing me:all the explanations, which
it may be needful to make, would, I am satisfied,
with my father's present feelings and impressions,
be better listened to from me than yourself. And
most assuredly they shall be made to him as soon as
his mood shall be such as shall warrant the belief
that they will be received, without passion or
prejudice
.
And before you take the step you propose, I
could wish also to see to some change in his views
relative to the match he has marked out for me. And
changed, believe me, they sooner or later will be.
Reason will at length resume her sway; and, to say
nothing of your character, the character of one of
whom I would not willingly speak my opinion, must
soon be better known to him. And he will see, and
feel, for himself, that his present requirements are
neither wise nor generous. But do not, for my sake,
for your own sake, beloved friend, attempt to
accomplish
all this now, under circumstances so
inauspicious
:
for I feel it would be useless; and not
only
so, but lead, probably, to the defeat of the objects,
and consequently the happiness of us both. No,
Warrington, be patient, trust in Heaven to expose
guilt, and reward inocence, and rely on the
constancy
of her, who is resolved to bring about a state of
things when her lover can be received in her
father's
house with the kindness and respect to which
he is entitled.
As an alternative, in case I disapprove your first
proposal, you request to be favored with secret, or
stolen interviews,Warrington, Charles
Warrington
!
would you recommend such a course to a
beloved
sister? With your delicacy of sentiment,
with your admiration of exalted virtue, I know you
would not. Why, then, ask it of one whom you
propose to make more than a sister? Again,
dearest
friend, I must say to you, no! I have ever
disapproved
of clandestine meetings:there is an air
of guilt about thema something that seems to
imply
a consciousness of wrong, which innocence and
rectitude of purpose should never stoop thus tacitly
to acknowledge. And the same views, which have
led to the disapprobation of these, have, in most
respects
,
an equal application to the measure that you
hint it may be expedient for us, as a final resort, to
adopt,a private elopement. In some countries,
and in some states of society, such a measure may,
perhaps, be sometimes justifiable; but is it so in a
land like ours, where force is rarely, if ever, used, to
defeat the engagements of lovers? While armed
with the panoply of virtue and reason, and
possessed
of the moral courage which these should ever
7
impart, few females, I apprehend, need here resort
to this questionable practice. And were I to be wed
to you to day, Mr. Warrington, it should be done
openly, and, if permitted, in the presence of my
natural protector. But if the ceremony were
forbidden
,
I would then, after frankly apprising him of
my intentions, as openly depart with you to a place
where it would be allowed. And if force were
employed
to restrain me, I would then throw myself on
the protection of him who would defend, or deserve
to lose me.
You know not how rejoiced is my heart to hear
of your personal safety,how proud to learn your
brilliant successes, and how gratified at the
promotion
you have received. You say you are about to
proceed south, to make enlistments for an
expedition
into Canada. Go!deserve well of your
country
,
be true and constant, and, while you remain
what I now believe you, count me so, and be
assured
,
that all the reward that this poor heart and hand
can confer, shall be eventually yours. My prayers
will attend you amidst the perils of war. Apprise
me oftenas often as possible, of your situation.
And, notwithstanding I have declined your present
proposals, O, do not believe me now, do not
hereafter
think me, less devotedly yours.
Alma
.`Be astonished, O, ye heavens! and Alma
Hendee
,
be you thunder struck! as I know you will be,
when you learn, that we areevery man of us,the
Major and all, prisoners of war! Yes, I am a
second
time a prisoner to Mr. Selden! What means
it, Alma? There is some strange fatality about it,
that passes my poor comprehension. O, for some
one deeply skilled in scanning the futuresome one
gifted with the second sight, which is claimed by our
Highland seers in Scotland, to divine to me the
portent
of this singular happening! How very
surprised
*7
we all were when they landeda body of
armed menand marched up, taking possession of
the yard, and disarming our soldiers.
The Major was in the house, and never
mistrusted
,
I really believe, what could be their object, till
they had seized the sloop and batteaux, and by their
rapid movements in surrounding the men, put it out
of his power to make any resistance. All this was,
seemingly, the work of a moment. And before we
had recovered from the first shock of the surprise,
Mr. Selden, who appeared to be chief in command,
had entered the house, and, with drawn sword, stood
before us. The Major then, indeed, began to show
some symptoms of uneasinessmore, however, even
then, I thought, at the presence of one, whom he
evidently has both feared and hated, since the
former
visit, than because he really supposed he was in
earnest about capturing the establishment. After
Mr. Selden had politely saluted us, ladios, he
bowed
formally to the Major, who returned the
compliment
only by a vain attempt to get his organs of
speech in motion.
`Who?what?Hem!' he stammered, stepping
restlessly about the room, and looking daggers at the
other: `Why, sirI should like to know, siryes,
sirlet me tell you, sir, what I think of you, sir'
`O, never trouble yourself, Major,' replied Mr. S.
with a satirical smile, `it might take you a longer
time than I could possibly spare to devote to so
unimportant
a purpose.'
`Why, sir!' resumed my doughty warrior of a
lady's parlour,`dn you, sir! do you mean to
insult, sir?I'll just let you know, siryou'll just
please to walk out of the house, sir!'
`O, be patient, Major,' rejoined Selden, with the
most provoking coolness. `Let me explain to these
ladies the nature of our call, lest they be
unnecessarily
alarmed.'
He then informed us of the outbreaking of the
war, the capture of Ticonderogaand the
determination
of the Americans to possess themselves of
this post, also; and consequently the necessity of
our removal to some other place, to which he
assured
us of a safe escort.
`Now, Major,' said he, turning to the other, who
had several times broken in on Mr. S., `I have only
to say to you, that both you, and all your men are
prisoners of war.'
Even then the Major could scarcely comprehend
what had befallen him; for he again began to
bluster
and threaten. But Selden, at once cutting him
short, ordered him away; when they both left the
house together. I never saw creatures so puzzled
and confounded as were Marge and Merry Skene.
They neither knew what to say, or how to act. As
for myself, I could hardly hold in till the gentlemen
had left the room, when I fairly shed tears with the
laughter, which I could not repress, at the ludicrous
scene I had witnessed. In regard to the valient
Major, he will not, probably, make much more fuss
about the affair to day. To-morrow he will be
considerably
moved at the disaster; and by the next
day, he will have so collected his ideas and his wrath,
that he will be tremendously mad.
They took the place about noon;since which
we ladies have held our council of war. And it has
been decided that we take our departure to-morrow
morning for Albany, where we shall at present
remain
,
with a connection of the Skenes'. I should
have certainly preferred, for myself, to go and reside
with you. But I dare not name it to them; for the
girls are already as jealous of me as witches; and I
well knew, that should I make such a proposition, it
would be attributed to a secret wish to be where I
could see more of Mr. S. And further, I am not
quite sure, but they might be so kind as to
communicate
their suspicions to father; for I have a father,
who may claim a voice in some matters as well as
you. Now don't draw any inferences from that
observation
,
Alma; because, positively, there are none
to draw.
Mr. Selden handed me your letter, brought by
black Jack, till he fell into the hands of the powers
that be. I read it with much interest,the more
so, perhaps, as I thought of the possibility that we
may yet have cause to mingle our sympathies.
I shall probably remain with the Skenes till
father
returnsif he does return; for now we have
war, I am rather uncertain what course he will
pursue
.
Should he receive a commission that suits him,
he may engage in the war. This, however, is
doubtful
.
And I think it very likely he will remain
neutral
,
as I suspect he thinks the government have not
done him justice. At all events, I don't believe he
feels very bitter towards the Americans; but if he
does, I know of one who don't.
P. S. Mr. Selden is to escort us in person to
Albany
;
and what is better, the Major is compelled to
go with the other prisoners to Ticonderoga. His
face is most unreasonably long at this arrangement
I think he will be crazy by to-morrow. Marge is
secretly rejoiced, and I know of another who is less
sad about it than she might be. I have had a
conversation
with Mr. Selden, alone, which has shown
me that he can be serious when he pleases. But I
have no time left me to state particulars. In my
next I will be more explicit.
Adieu, adieu.
Jessy
.Major Warrington
,Our intimacy is forever
ended. As no explanations need be given, so none
will be received. I trust, therefore, that no further
communications on your part will be attempted.
Alma Hendee
.Miss Hendee, I guess, will remember, how, a
year or two ago, a man came to your house and
mended the things; and how he made some
statements
about Charles Warrington, the Colonel that
now is. Now, what I said at that time has worried
my feelings a great deal most ever since. Though
I then really thought what I said was justifiable, even
if it was not quite true, as I was made to believe it
to be for your good. But I soon after found out
what I told you was not so, for I didn't know
myself
,
and only said what I was asked to say. This
was the story of it. As I was going from house to
house, working at my trade there in your part of the
settlement, I fell in with a plausible sort of a man,
I don't think I had best call him by name,and we
after a while got to talking about Warrington, whom
I had seen often enough, though I knew nothing
about his private affairs. Well, he, in a smooth kind
of way, said there was one thing that hurt his
feelings
;
and that was, that Warrington was doing the
wrong thing by a relative of his, a very likely girl,
that he pretended to be courting for the sake of
getting
her family on his side in the York quarrel, when
to his certain knowledge, he had a young wife that
he had deserted down country. He said it was a
great pity to have the girl so deceived, and he would
give two gold guineas to any one who would break
up the courtship. But he said it would do no kinder
good for her relations to try; and they were very
anxious some one else should undertake to do it.
He then told me his plan was, that he and I, if I
would agree to do it, should first kinder secretly tell
folks this story about the deserted wife, so that it
should get to her, and make her begin to believe it;
and then I should go there and pretend to come
from where Warrington used to live, and let drop
some how, before the girl, that I was knowing
myself
to that business about his being married. Well,
he kinder drew me into this plan, and I being poor,
consented for the money to do as I did. But I soon
mistrusted that this man had some wrong design,
which I found out to be the case, and I feel very
sorry, and ask pardon for what happened; and shall
feel very bad if I done any mischief by it, as I think
Colonel Warrington a very likely man. I think I
shall feel easier now in my mind, but I guess,
considering
,
I shant sign my name, though I am not
ashamed of it, or at least I never was in any other
affair since I was born.
Your well wisher to serve.J.
Sherwood, Esq.
, Captain of His Majesty's
Loyal
Americans in the New Hampshire Grants,
It is one of the felicities of soldiership, and of the
gratifications of a commander, to award the meed of
approbation to fidelity in a common cause, and
fealty
to a common sovereign. This meed, Sir, I deem
it no flattery to say is yours, speaking, as I do,
from personal acquaintance, and on the voucher of
Colonel Beverly Robinson, a Loyal American officer,
of worth, and zeal, and activity.
The army under my command will now in a day
or two move southwardly, mainly by water, but
partly
by land on either side of the lake. To you, Sir,
and the brave and loyal men whom you have, and
may yet further induce to act with you, we look for
a hearty co-operation in all that can be effected on
the eastern shore, and, by the blessing of God, I will
effect much, while we proceed to the investiture, and
consequent capture of Crown Point, Ticonderoga,
and all other opposing obstacles, on our victorious
march to Albany. I send you by the bearer,
Lieutenant
William Darrow, a package of proclamations,
issued by me, and signed by the same, and
countersigned
by Robert Kingston, Esquire, Secretary.
They are addresses to the deluded and suffering
people
of your settlement. I anticipate great and
universal
effect from this appeal, made irresistable, as
it is, by offers of Royal mercy to the penitent,
arguments
of ineffable potency to the deceived by rebel
sophistry and falsehood, and by the palpable
shadowing
forth of the sword of justice, in the contingent
action of our red allies, to the perverse and stubborn.
You will cause one of these, my proclamations, to be
immediately left at every cottage and hamlet, if
possible
,
in the settlementto the protestations of which
proclamation, together with such pecuniary
inducements
as you may deem it expedient to offer towards
redeeming the land from the disgrace and ruinous
anarchy of an unnatural rebellion, and restoring a
government of laws, of honor, of legitimate and
happy sovereignty, you will add your own
attestations
.
With sentiments, believe me,
my very dear sir, of esteem,
J.
Burgoyne
.This may certify that David Remington, the
bearer hereof, is thought to be a true friend to the
States of America.
JOSEPH WOODWARD, Com. of Safety.
[1]
[1]
A literal copy of the original certificate, lodged in the public archives
of Vermont, and accompanied by another from the noted tory, Colonel
Philip Skene, certifying that Remington had taken the oath of allegiance,
and was a true Royalist. These papers, together with a receipt signed
by J. Sherwood, Captain, for two heifers procured for the British, by
Remington, all dated about the same time, are supposed to have been
found on the person of this or other tories, when subsequently slain or
taken prisoners.
Castleton,
June 2d, 1777.